VOL. I.1
CHAPTER I.
The country is in arms;
There's not a house but shelters stout adherents.
The Regent, a tragedy
.
More
than half a century ago, there stood in Darby,
a small village near Philadelphia, an humble inn,
denominated
The Hive;
which name the house acquired
in consequence of a rude sign, that yielding to every
blast of wind, creaked in front of the building; although
one who was not a connoisseur in painting, might have
mistaken the hive for a hay-cock, and the bees for
partridges, had not the ingenious artist, to prevent all
mistakes of this nature, judiciously painted, in capital
letters, the name of his design, which at once put an
end to the illiberal cavilling of such critics as could
decipher the alphabet.
Alice Grey, the hostess of the Hive, had evidently
been a sufferer by the vicissitudes of fortune; and
every line of her countenance denoted that she had
felt, in all its bitterness, the visitations of sorrow and
disappointment. She had arrived at the village a few
years before, totally destitute, accompanied by her
daughter, a child at that period apparently twelve years
of age. No one knew whence she came, and on that
subject her lips were most religiously sealed. She
lingered about the town a short time without any
definite
object, until several of the more wealthy
neighbours
,
from motives of compassion, placed her in the
situation in which she then resided, and where she was
enabled to gather sufficient from the weary traveller
and the gossipping politician, to support her little
daughter Miriam and herself, without having the scanty
meal embittered with the conviction that she was
indebted
for it to the labour and charity of another. An
unknown had contributed liberally towards the
accomplishment
of this object. Alice was about the age
of forty, tall of stature, and of a spare habit, as the
workings of her mind were too unceasing to permit
health to make its appearance. There were still the
traces of former beauty in that wo-worn countenance,
which is spite of her present condition, plainly
indicated
the class to which she once belonged. Her features
were regular, of the Italian cast; her eyes large, black,
and piercing, and her forehead high and smooth. Her
hair was still abundant, and glossy as the plumage of
the raven. Her countenance was inflexibly stern. The
only one who possessed the power to relax its severity,
in the slightest degree, was the gentle Miriam. There
was an occasional wildness in her actions, and
incoherency
in her conversation, that led the more
superstitious
part of the villagers to believe that Alice held
communion with the evil one, while others who
examined
her condition more narrowly, were of opinion
that these hallucinations were the result of long mental
suffering.
Miriam was at this time about sixteen; a pretty
black-eyed girl, bearing a strong resemblance to what
her mother must have been at the same age. Her
person
was tall and graceful. Her countenance was
naturally
sedate, still it possessed sufficient sprightliness
to dispel, in some degree, the gloom occasioned by her
mother's austerity. She was the core of her mother's
heart, and it is scarcely necessary to surmise that she
was quite as dear to several swains of the village as to
her unhappy mother. Among these, Jurian Hartfield
was secretly the most favoured; we say secretly, for
his passion was unknown to all save the being who had
inspired it, but the happy Jurian was not without a
rival
ever ready to assert his own claim to the beauteous
prize.
It was on the evening of the 11th of September, 1777,
that the gossips of Darby were assembled in the
tap-room
of the Hive, expressing their sentiments of the
dangers of the times, and searching for philosophy at
the bottom of their cups. They were seated around
the pine table, and Miriam was performing the duty of
an active bar-maid, while her stricken mother, with her
face bent to her lap, unconscious of the surrounding
scene, was either dreaming of the past, or
endeavouring
to penetrate the darkness of the future.
Miriam, brave lass, my can wants replenishing,
cried a short thick-set man, in a pompous tone, with a
weather-beaten countenance, and clad as if he had
stolen
his wardrobe from a gibbet. He had a coarse rifle
shirt about him, and his legs were kept in durance by a
huge pair of spatterdashes, which extended above the
knee, and gratified the vanity of the wearer, who
contemplated their remarkable dimensions with evident
satisfaction. One side of his hat was completely
covered
with a cockade, composed of white linen, which
added considerably to the military appearance of the
soldier, while upon the spatterdash of his left leg,
reposed
his well-tempered Andrew Ferrara, as if satiated
with blood and weary of the toils of battle. This
slumbering
weapon was of astonishing longitude, and of
such a polish that the owner did not apprehend its
being
tarnished either by the dews of the night, or the
blood of its numberless victims. A broken pipe was
stuck in the mouth of this self-important personage,
from which ascended volumes of execrable smoke, and
enveloped the rafters above him.
Miriam, fill my mug again, he cried a second time,
as no attention had been paid to the first summons.
Out upon you, corporal Drone, exclaimed one of
the company. We might have expected better things
from a soldier of your appearance than to call a pretty
girl to wait upon him,saying which, he pointed in
ridicule at the tattered apparel of the son of Mars, who,
whatever might have been his merit in the essential
part, it must be acknowledged did not possess a large
share of the commanding appearance of his god-like
prototype.
My rifle shirt is ragged, and the night is a cold and
dreary one; so child, fill up my can again. The
corporal
was one of that numerous class who never lose
any thing for the want of perseverance. As Miriam
approached to obey the summons, a countryman, with
a ruddy, open countenance, and of colossal stature,
interfered
,
and vociferated with an oath, that she should
not; if the corporal were so devoid of gallantry, he
himself would fulfil the office of tapster. As you
please, retorted the other gravely, at the same time
regaling his nostrils with an armoatic stream of tobacco
smokeAs you please; so that I mend my draught,
I care not who performs the office of Ganymede. But
drink I must, for this is the night of all others on which
I would indulge in potations.
And why on this night in particular? I imagined
all nights were the same to you, corporal.
Why, as to that, it must be a bad occasion, indeed,
that affords no excuse for drinking. But on this day,
a battle has been fought, and patriot blood has been
shed. I would drink to the brave. Hard, hard fate!
why was I absent at such a time!
Because you considered it safer than being
present
,
1*
cooly replied the man who had taken the mug
from Miriam, and which he still held in his hand.
Another such insinuation, master Jones, and I
cleave thee from the chine, and make mincement of
thee for a dog's festival. Jones smiled at the threat
of the corporal, and the gentle voice of Miriam was
heard inquiring of the latter, whether he had seen
Jurian
during the day.
It is not an hour since I met him beyond the
creek, was the reply. Was he not here this
afternoon
?
It is nearly a week since he was here, replied
Miriam, slightly blushing. Do you know whether
he has heard how captain Swain fared in this day's
conflict?
The old soldier escaped unharmed, and did his
duty like a man.
That he will always do. Praised be Heaven, my
mother's benefactor is still alive?
The old hot-headed fool had better attend to his
business of fattening cattle instead of marching about
the country in a bad cause, exclaimed Jones.
Don't speak against the cause, said the corporal,
cocking his arms akimbo, and throwing as much
fierceness
into his countenance as nature would admit
Don't speak against the cause, for it is as honest a
cause as ever sword was drawn in.
If you think so, replied Jones, why does that
terrible weapon of yours remain slumbering in its
scabbard? and why do you figure in a tap-room, instead
of upon the banks of the Brandywine, where you
would not be at a loss for employment at present?
The corporal touched the basket-hilt of his sword,
bit his under lip and frowned; and after making an
ugly face at the other, which was intended to convey
a proper sense of the contempt his corporalship felt at
the moment, he sneeringly said
Jones! you are as arrant a tory as old 'squire
Morton, your employer; and I would cheerfully fight
without rations for a week to see you strung up
together
:or
ifhe paused and half drew his sword,
which action was accompanied by an alarming frown.
But no! you are unworthy of a brave man's anger.
He sheathed his sword, threw one leg across the other,
leaned back, and smoked his pipe most vigorously.
No more, thou mighty man of war, exclaimed
Jones, you know my pacific disposition, and should
not trample on it.
Enough, said the corporal gravely, at the same
time relaxing, in some degree, the severity of his brow:
EnoughI am pacified.
One of the company, a diminutive old man, dressed
in quaker apparel, with a fox-like countenance, a
complexion
resembling scorched parchment, and a pair of
spindle shanks not unlike drumsticks, who had for
some time been contemplating, in silence, the striking
and manly countenance of Jones, now approached
him, and said in a hesitating voice as shrill as the
whistle of a November wind through a keyhole
Friend, unless I greatly mistake, this is not the
first time we have met.
Likely, likely, replied the other carelessly, at the
same time glancing his large gray eyes at the person
who accosted him. The man involuntarily shrunk
from his gaze.
Was thee not last Second day, about sundown, on
the Lancaster road? continued the man, retreating a
step.
Quite likely, said Jones, as I go to the city
every day or two to buy marketing and groceries for
the 'squire's family. But why do you ask all these
questions of me, neighbour?
Supposing thee had been there, replied the man,
taking another step backwards, and fixing his small
twinkling eyes intently upon the countenance of the
other, thee might know something of an outrageous
robbery committed on the person of Ephraim Horn,
a farmer, who had sold his crop, and was returning
home from the city.
Why, darn it, said Jones, it runs in my head I
heard a report of the kind. Let me think:Corporal,
didn't you say something to me about the matter?
You are right, said the corporal. I told you
that the person robbed had offered a reward of five
pounds, hard money, for the apprehension of Paul
Gordon, which you may see posted there against the
wainscot; and those five pounds will be in my
shot-pouch
before ten days pass away, or I will eat the hilt
of this weaponsaying which, he raised his eyes to
the smoky rafters, which were ornamented with pig
faces and other meat drying, and assumed a
countenance
that would have done credit to the sternest warrior
that frowned on the siege of Troy.
And I will pay it on the nail, said Ephraim,
should it take the last shilling I have in the world.
Then, likely, you are the man that was robbed,
said Jones, with a vacant stare.
I am, replied the other, and I reckon thee knew
as much from the first.
Anan! ejaculated Jones, dropping his lower jaw,
and looking the man full in the faceWasn't it Paul
Gordon, the highwayman, robbed you?
Paul Gordon, or Paul Devil, squeaked the disciple
of Penn, waxing warm, you look as much alike as
two peas.
For certain you don't take Jones, the ploughman,
for Gordon, the highwayman, replied the other.
Ho! ho! ho! roared the corporal, you might
as well be taken for the Dey of Algiers. Several
others, who were acquainted with the accused, joined
with the corporal in laughing at the absurd accusation.
What is it you laugh at? inquired Ephraim.
Never trust my eyes, if he is not the very picture of
the robber.
As much like him as chalk is like cheese, added
the corporal, in a decided tone.
Mayhap thee is acquainted with Paul Gordon,
said Ephraim, addressing the corporal.
You may say that, replied the other, and he is
acquainted with corporal Drone too. He is a man
much about my make, remarkably captivating in his
appearance.
Now, darn it, exclaimed the Quaker, he is the
illest looking dog I ever clapped my eyes upon.
Polite in his address, continued the corporal
daring as a lionpossessing the true mettle of a
soldierbut, withal, far inferior to me at the game of
broad-sword.
As he concluded, he drew his sword, flourished it
over his head, and made a tierce at Jones, who ran
alarmed into a corner of the room, where he crouched
and extended his hands for protection. Drone made
several passes at the trembling countryman, who
exclaimed
Lord, corporal, mind what you are doing; you are
so furious that you will be after hurting one.
Drone after amusing himself and the company for
some time in this manner, sheathed his rusty weapon
with an air of importance, saying
Fear not, poor fellow. This well-tried blade
drinks richer and nobler beverage than courses through
your veins; and then turning to Jones's accuser, said,
Is that the man who robbed you?
No! exclaimed Ephraim, somewhat abashed, and
scratching his head; I am a non-combatant, it is
true; but I was never robbed by the like of him.
Jones came sullenly from the corner, whither he
had fled before the sword of the blustering corporal,
and, approaching his accuser, muttered
Though the times are troubled, there is such a
thing still as law in the land, and some folks shall learn
that, though a man be poor, he is not to lose his
character
for nothing.
Ephraim made an awkward apology, while Jones
continued mutteringI am the best ploughman in
these parts, as 'squire Morton will testify, and all my
neighbours will give me as good a character for honesty
and civility, as any man of my calling need as for;
but to be torn up root and branch in this manner, and
all for nothing, is a notch beyond my learning; but I
reckon there are those who will be able to understand it.
Ephraim perceiving the charge to assume an
unfavourable
aspect, made every concession to appease the
dogged resentment of Jones, who finally, though
reluctantly, suffered himself to be reconciled to the
insult; and the Quaker, in order to drown all latent
animosity, proposed to drink with the countryman,
considering
the custom to have the same influence among
the christians, as that of eating salt among the Arabs.
The proposition was no sooner made than complied
with, and good-humour was again restored to the
company
.
This is all very well, cried the corporal; but
my mug wants replenishing. Miriam again advanced
to fulfil her duty, but Jones stepped before her, hastily
picked up the mug, and entered the tap-room. He
returned in a few moments, and replacing it before
Drone, exclaimed
Here, old thirsty-soul, moisten that weather-beaten
carcass of yours, and I will pledge you in a draught
much better suited to my palate.Saying which, he
threw his arms around the waist of the bar-maid, and
as she resisted his rudeness, a struggle ensued.
Alice was awakened from her dreaming by the noise
occasioned by the struggle between her daughter and
her rustic admirer. She arose from the low seat, where
she had remained in silence, during the foregoing scene.
A flash of animation passed over her countenance, as
she threw back from her high pale forehead the black
hair that hung in confusion over it. Every eye was
fixed upon her tall attenuated figure; she paused for a
moment, and then hastily gliding towards Jones, fixed
her long fingers in the collar of his shirt, and holding
him at arms-length, exclaimed
Insolent craven, hast thou the heart to insult the
widow's defenceless child? with which, she dashed
him from her, and Jones retired to the extremity of the
room, considerably abashed at the unfavourable result
of the amatory adventure. The lip of woman,
continued
Alice, should be kept as sacred as the holy altar,
for she who idly prostitutes its purity, trifles with her
soul's eternal worth. As she concluded, an
involuntary
shudder agitated her slender frame, and she
immediately
afterwards resumed her seat by the fire-side.
It was now growing late; Ephraim paid his score and
left the inn. He mounted his horse, and trotted off at
a round gait toward his residence, which stood north of
the Lancaster road about ten miles from Philadelphia.
As Ephraim left the inn, the trampling of a horse
was heard approaching, which was immediately
succeeded
by a knocking at the door, which on being
opened, a man indistinctly seen through the darkness
of the night, mounted on a spirited black horse, and
whose dress was concealed by a long blue surtout,
inquired
the way to 'squire Morton's residence.
Hellward you'll find the tory, shouted the
corporal
.
Jones approached and demanded of the stranger
whether he was alone, who returned answer that he
was.
Friend or foe, spy or open enemy, let him answer
that, growled forth Drone.
I am a benighted traveller, returned the stranger,
and ask to be directed to 'squire Morton's; will any
one oblige me by complying with my request?
Not I, cried Drone, if you are a friend I could
not find it in my heart to do you such an injury; if an
enemy, you are doubtless going to the devil fast enough
without that old tory's assistance; but here is a
red-haired
fellow of a different creed, who would guide you
to the gallows for a guinea.Jones now offered his
services, remarking that he was in Mr. Morton's
employ
,
and intended returning home in a few moments;
he then left the inn, walking beside the stranger's horse,
but before they had proceeded a great distance, their
conversation proved they were not entire strangers to
each other. They entered the lane leading to Mr.
Morton's mansion, which stood at a short distance from
the main road, and as they approached the house, a
figure was indistinctly seen, leisurely crossing the field
towards the village.
Who is that? inquired the stranger.
Look again, sir, and you will be able to answer
the question.
The stranger checked his horse and fixed his eyes
upon the figure grandually receding, and then
exclaimed
That reptile Jurian! Is it not?
Right: I knew you would hit the mark, said Jones
coolly.
Presumptuous rebel! By heavens, this very
instant
He turned his horse towards the figure.
Jones checked him, and said
Is a very unfit one for you to expose yourself. It
would not be altogether agreeable that he should know
that you are in the neighbourhood at present, for in
that case you might possibly make a longer visit than
you originally designed.
With this remark, he again turned the head of the
horse towards the house; the stranger did not oppose
it, but moved on, and in a few moments alighted at the
door and entered.
CHAPTER II.
Your patience, sir, while briefly I recount
Some passages of former times, that throw
A glaring light upon the events that follow.
The Sultan
.
Captain Swain
, as his name had been modernised,
was a descendant of the celebrated
Seven Schute
, lord of
Passaiung, who in the Dutch war, was obliged to yield
to the conqueror Stuyvesant, familiarly called
wooden-legged
Peter. Captain Swain prided himself not a
little
upon his ancestry; he was familiar with the history
of the Swedish settlements on the Delaware, for he
considered it the only history worth the trouble of
becoming
acquainted with, and the ten years siege of
Troy, the wars of Rome and Carthage, and the
contention
between the red and white roses of England,
were not to be mentioned on the same day with the
appalling
difficulties encountered by his valiant ancestors
in making good their settlement on the banks of the
Delaware.
Captain Swain, at the commencement of the troubles
in the colonies, was about fifty years of age, of short
athletic person, and inclined to become fat. His
countenance
was strongly characteristic of good-humour
and benevolence, while his conduct bore ample
testimony
as to the sincerity of his visage. Inheriting a
considerable share of military spirit from honest Sven
VOL. I.2
Schute, who commanded under governor
Risingh
the
Fort of the Holy Trinity
, our worthy raised a company
of yeomen, from the vicinity of Darby, to assist in the
defence of their native rights.
Jurian Hartfield, mentioned in the preceding
chapter
,
had, while yet an infant, been placed under the
protecting care of captain Swain, and as his wife had
at that time been deprived by death of a child of the
same age, she readily received the helpless babe, and
resolved to cherish it. The mystery concerning the
birth of the child had not yet been divulged, and as he
advanced in years, he became sensible of the odium
attached
to him on this account. Every scoff of the
unthinking
proved a barbed shaft that no skill could
extract
,
and it remained until it poisoned the very fountain
of thought. The restlessness of his mind was depicted
in his strongly marked countenance, upon which there
hung a settled gloom. There was decision of
character
in every line of his finished face. It indicated a
mind that disdaining the happy mean, would seek the
extremes of virtue or of vice. There was unwavering
determination in his piercing black eyes, which were
overshadowed by bushy brows. His hair was black
and glossy as the plume of the raven, and hung down
in Absalom ringlets over his shoulders. His mouth
was voluptuous, and his chin broad, and indicative of
firmness. His person was rather beneath the common size, but light and graceful, combining strength and
activity
.
Captain Swain having amassed considerable property
by his business as a grazier, determined to bestow
such an education upon Jurian as would lay the
foundation
of future eminence, and accordingly he was
placed in the academy at Philadelphia. Here he
contracted
an intimacy with Edward Morton, a classmate,
of the same age, which gradually ripened into
friendship
,
though the dispositions of the young men were
the antipodes of each other. Jurian's mind was as the
deep river that moves silently and darkly through the
wilderness
,
but that of Morton as the shallow brook that
ripples
through the flowery mead, and dances in the
sunshine
.
These young men were seldom separated;
throughout the week they pursued their studies
together
,
and as their parents resided within a short
distance
of each other, even during vacation there was no
interruption to their social intercourse. While at the
academy, every jest, or look, that Jurian could not
trace to an obvious cause, he imagined was occasioned
by his presence. He became a solitary being, and
seldom
opened his lips but to Morton, whom he
considered
the only one who felt an interest in his happiness.
At the age of eighteen he returned to the house of his
benefactor, with the reputation of a ripe scholar, and as
he resided but a short distance from Mr. Morton's
residence
,
he visited his friend frequently, and soon
obtained
a footing of intimacy in that family that did not
exist between the elder branches.
Mr. Morton was of English descent; his connexions
were wealthy, and some of them were titled in the
mother
country. His family pride was great; he was
ostentatious
of his pedigree, and he experienced tenfold
more delight in contemplating the rough escutcheon on
the side of his old lumbering chariot, than the most
enthusiastic
connoisseur of painting could possibly feel in
beholding the united splendour of the Italian artists.
Though an American by birth, he had been educated
in England; and as he became acquainted with that
nation at a time when his elastic spirits were ripe for
enjoyment, and having the means of gratifying every
idle pleasure, be embarked for his native shores with
feelings that might be compared to those of a convict
on his voyage to Botany Bay.
From his predilection for the mother country, he
viewed as open and unjustifiable rebellion the resistance
of the colonies against tyranny and oppression, and
those who were the most active in promoting the cause,
as traitors to their king, and deserving of punishment
upon the scaffold. Having in the early part of his life
served in the army, he became partial to the scarlet
colour, which prejudice was not only evidence in his
apparel
,
but also in his austere countenance, which was
illuminated by the libation of many pipes of good old
Madeira. The effects of this mode of living were not
confined to his countenance, for he was subject to
repeated
attacks of the gout, and while labouring under
this irritating malady, it was impossible for him to
restrain
the violence of his fretful disposition. His
family
consisted of his two childrenEdward already
mentioned, and Agatha his sister; and Miss Rebecca
Buckley, a maiden sister of Mrs. Morton, whose dislike
to matrimony had gradually changed into inveterate
aversion as she approached the age of fifty. Mr.
Morton's
system of domestic government was despotic.
True, Miss Rebecca would occasionally venture to
rebel against the arbitrary rule, while he was in perfect
health, and stirring about his farm; but as soon as he
was seated in his gouty chair, with his swathed foot
reposing on his scarlet velvet cushion, they were all
as obedient, and beheld him with as much terror, as the
submissive Turks do an absolute Bashaw with three
tails.
In consequence of the unconquerable pride of the
'squire, as he was commonly called, and as he viewed his
republican neighbours as beings of an inferior order, his
house was seldom visited, except upon business, by
those residing in the vicinity. Mrs. Swain had at one
time endeavoured to cultivate an intimacy, but found
the reception too cold and stately for the warm and
simple feelings of her heart, and accordingly desisted
from the undertaking, considering it utterly hopeless.
Jurian, as he was devoted to study, had acquired a
share of intelligence uncommon for a youth of his age,
which son recommended him to the notice of Mr.
Morton, who was astonished at finding such extensive
cultivation of talent in a plebeian and a base-born child.
The old man would occasionally condescend to
converse
with him on the subject of literature, and finding
his judgment sound and discriminative, and his memory
remarkably tenacious of the best passages of his
favourite
poets, in despite of prejudice, our patrician
condescended
to feel some interest in his conversation.
Agatha, from the daily habit of intercourse for many
years with Jurian, experienced a degree of regard for
him which increased as they advanced towards puberty,
and by his solicitude she was induced to believe that
her presence was essential to his happiness. There
was invariably a fervour in his manner towards her, that
could not escape her notice, and produced its effect. She
saw in his character traits which imperatively demanded
respect, and yet at times she fancied she discovered
others that it was impossible for her to reconcile with the
opinion she had entertained. Still towards her he was
invariably
the same devoted being. Their intercourse
was without restraint, for in the purity of heart there
was nothing to alarm her at the danger of her situation.
She admired his talents, and frequently had recourse
to them for assistance in her studies. Their days were
frequently spent in the library together, and at evening,
she and her brother would accompany their mutual
friend on his way home. Nor can it be supposed that
Jurian
,
under these circumstances, could remain
insensible
to her beauty and accomplishments. She had been
the object of his love from boyhood, and hope had
incessantly
whispered that she must become the partner of his
future destiny. He was aware of the many difficulties he
would have to surmount to accomplish his ambitious
views, but then what obstacle was he not willing to
encounter
to realize the glowing picture of coming joy,
that young love and hope had so temptingly portrayed.
Few artists have the faculty to paint the scenes of this
nether world in such glowing colours.
Captain Swain beheld with regret the bias of his
affections
,
2*
and strove to wean him from an attachment which,
he feared, must terminate in sorrow. He knew that
the stubborn pride of the 'squire would never
condescend
to a connexion with a family in their humble
station
,
while on the other hand, entertaining a proper
sense of what was due to a lineal descendant of the
lord of Passaiung, he felt indignant at the slight, and
shrunk at the bare idea of entering into a family that
looked upon him as its inferior. He made his feelings
known to Jurian, and represented to him the
consequences
that must inevitably attend his misplaced
passion
,
and concluded with exhorting him to estrange his
heart as soon as practicable, which advice was of course
obeyed in the same manner that it has been since the
days that the blind archer shot at Pyramus and
Thisbe
through a chink in a two-foot wall.
The character of Jurian suddenly assumed a new
aspect. Emerging from the gloom in which it had
been enveloped, it appeared in its native vigour. The
shade of melancholy, which in his boyhood had
weighed
heavily on him, was not thrown off, but
gracefully
worn as a mantle, and imparted such an air of
determination
,
that ordinary minds shrunk when in his
presence. Agatha perceived the change with wonder
and admiration. Her heart confessed that it had not
known him before, and trembled at the confession, but
knew not wherefore, since his love for her was still the
same, but there was so startling a difference between
the man of real life, and the child of her imagination,
that she could not behold it without deprecating the
consequences. The link that bound her to him was now
firmly rivited. Her feelings with regard to him
underwent
an entire revolution, and she trembled as she
discovered
the change. She had loved him, but
heretofore
her love had been timid, doubtful, and undefined. She
had viewed him as a flower bending beneath the weight
of the storm, and she felt desirous to protect the
flower; but now he appeared as the mountain oak,
spreading wide its arms, in defiance of the tempest.
Nearly a year had elapsed since Jurian had
returned
from the city to his benefactor's house, which
period
was passed in comparative seclusion from the
world. Still his time was not idly spent, but in
incessant
and abstruse meditation, which perhaps was worse
than idleness. Possessed of a vigorous and analysing
mind, yet knowing little of the world, he framed
theories
that could never be realized, and imbibed opinions
that run counter with the established order of things.
He viewed himself as an isolated being, and reasoned
without taking into view his relative situation with
mankind. He had been ushered into the world with a
stigma as indelible as the mark upon the forehead of
Cain. The means used by his allwise Creator, had
been scoffed at and stigmatized by the immaculate
institutions
of man. By those institutions he was
pronounced
degraded when he first breathed, and a life
the most exemplary, so far from obliterating the
remembrance
of his inherent shame, would only tend to
emblazon it. Man had sat in judgment on the act of
his God, and had arrogantly pronounced that it was not
good. He felt this truth in all its force, and as he could
not enter upon the social compact upon equal terms
with the rest, he saw no reason why that compact
should exact from him equal sacrifices. So far from
having been a blessing, it would prove a lasting curse,
then why should he contribute to the support of
institutions
,
which had embittered the very fountain of his
existence, on account of the aberration of others and
the will of the Most High?
He now perceived the necessity of embracing some
pursuit that would enable him to cope with the world.
The law at that period was the highway to preferment,
and from his long habit of reflection and patient study,
he was led to make choice of this as his future
profession
.
He accordingly made known his wishes to
captain
Swain, who rejoiced at the prospect of his entering
upon the world, where he believed him every way
qualified
to shine, and forthwith made the necessary
preparations
for him to pursue his studies in Philadelphia.
Jurian removed to the city, and for six months was
liberally
supplied with funds by his generous benefactor,
when on presenting him with a sum, he declined
receiving
it.
How is this, exclaimed the old grazier, why do
you not take the money, my son?
I have lived long enough on your bounty, sir, and
it is now time that I should try the strength of my
wings, was the reply.
It will be time enough for that when you have
completed
your studies, boy; so take the money.
Excuse me, sir, you have too long undergone
privations
for my advancement, and I cannot patiently sit
down with the knowledge of this fact. It must now
terminate. Care has been bestowed upon my education.
The world is before me. I feel myself equal to most
with whom I come in collision, and it is my humour to
fight my way through it.
Have a care, or in this same fight, boy, you will
meet with some hard knocks, which may spoil your
humour.
I expect them, and am prepared to meet them.
But you will take the money?
No.
Now, by the glorious memory of honest Sven
Schute, but this is wonderful.
Strange as it may appear, sir, it is my
determination
.
Zounds, Jurian listen to reason. I have lived
nearly three times as long in the world as you have,
and though I know less of Virgil and Homer, than I do
of fat cattle and pasture grounds, I tell you there is
nothing
to be done in this world without money.
I know it, sir, replied the other calmly, and,
therefore, wish you to keep all you have.
Zounds, but how do you mean to fill your purse, if
you refuse my offer?
Perhaps, sir, I shall carry none, he replied,
smiling
.
Ha! carry no purse! Even our Swedish ancestors
could not live without money. What do you mean,
boy?
The young man answered, half jestingly
Honest Iago remarks, `thus do I ever make my
fool my purse,' and if every fool be a purse, from my
slight knowledge of the world, I have arrived at the
conclusion that wise men need not encumber their
pockets
.
Then taking the other by the hand, he added,
in a serious tone, and his countenance became
clouded
as he spokeLet us dismiss the subject for the
present. You, no doubt, will hear of my proceedings
hereafter, but whether the world will report favourably
or otherwise, I know not, and it gives me little concern;
but rest assured of this, though you have scattered the
seeds of benevolence on what may be termed an
unproductive
soil, yet while I live, you shall never reap the
harvest of ingratitude.
Well am I assured, my son, that no weed of that
rank growth will ever take root in your bosom.
The old man pressed him affectionately by the hand,
and they parted. Jurian returned to the city; his
passion for study had in a measure subsided, and his
dislike of the world had lost somewhat of its austerity.
He mingled more freely in society, and by means of
his polished manners, intelligence, and impressive
demeanor
,
he became conspicuous and generally known.
His society was courted, and he was looked upon as a
young man of uncommon promise; but by no means
exempt from the follies to which youth is addicted. In
him, however, they went farther, and assumed the
complexion
of vices. He was extravagant, and it was a
mystery how he acquired the means of supporting
the scenes of dissipation in which he indulged. He
betrayed great quickness in attaining a knowledge of
most games; he was fond of play, but then, it was said,
he played merely for pleasure, and not for the purpose
of gambling. Rumour spoke mysteriously and darkly
concerning him. There was nothing definite; all was
in obscurity, and he was pronounced by the
grey-headed
to be a dangerous man; but why or wherefore they
knew not. Jurian felt that the eye of suspicion was on
him, but his was not a mind to quail at its glance. He
moved on in his course, and paid no regard to the hum
of those who surrounded him. He had already
marked
out for himself a line of conduct, and no slight
obstacle
could cause him to deviate; his mind had been
dispassionately made up, and it was not to be biassed
by the opinions of others.
Such was the state of affairs at the commencement
of the dissensions between the colonies and the mother
country, and captain Swain had no sooner joined the
continental forces, than 'squire Morton, in the pride of
royalty, viewed him and his whole race as traitors to
their king, and in the violence of his antipathy he was
not very choice in the epithets he bestowed upon the
continental soldiers, and Swain among the rest. He
daily became more reserved towards Jurian, and when
he discovered, what he was pleased to style, the
presumptuous
partiality of the boy for his daughter, his
reserve increased to rudeness, and finally he forbad a
continuance of his visits. The intimacy which had
continued
for years was thus abruptly broken off, and the
meetings which subsequently took place between the
lovers were secret and by stealth.
CHAPTER III.
Frisco
.
Who knocks?
Curvetto
.
Why 'tis I, knave.
Frisco
.
Then, knave, knock there still.
Curvetto
.
Whut! open the door.
Blurt Master Constable
.
At
this period there was a slight wooden bridge over
Darby creek, instead of the substantial stone one that
now occupies its place, and on the night that our
narrative
commences, the villagers were kept in a continued
state of alarm, occasioned by the troopers passing and
repassing. Corporal Drone, who was ever ready to
do a good turn, where there was a prospect of being
repaid tenfold, after quitting the Hive, had repaired to
assist Mrs. Swain in packing away and burying her
valuables, to protect them from depredators, in case it
should be necessary to remove to the city. Jurian also
assisted in this precautionary step, and towards
midnight
his fostermother retired, leaving our hero and
the corporal to give the alarm should the enemy
approach
,
not knowing at what hour the British troops,
flushed with victory, might direct their march towards
the metropolis.
Two companions were perhaps never more
ill-assorted
for a night-watch than Jurian and the corporal. The
latter, who held himself in high estimation, and had
arrived at the satisfactory conclusion, that man is still
no more than man, though his mind be highly cultivated,
and his coat of the finest texture, assayed repeatedly to
draw his companion into conversation, but the attempt
was fruitless. The mind of Jurian was employed upon
higher matters than the corporal, upon whom he
condescended
to bestow an occasional vacant look or a
monosyllable
at most. Drone at length became tired,
lighted his pipe, and as volumes of smoke encircled his
head, he was soon in that state which nearly constitutes
the mortal career of the mass of mankinda total
absence
of mental action, even while the physical powers
retain their functions unrelaxed.
In the midst of their dreamings, a horse was heard
crossing the bridge at full speed, and approaching the
house, which was immediately succeeded by a violent
knocking at the door, and a voice demanding
admittance
.
The corporal started up, and drawing his sword,
approached the door.
Who are you, he cried, who disturb us at this
unseasonable hour?
Open the door, you hound, and let me in.
Nay, answer me, or we parley with a two inch plank
between us. If you are satisfied with your side of the
house, I am with mine, so good night to you.
Curse your hospitality! Open the doorI am
M`Crea.
The door was unbarred, when a man of about fifty
years of age entered. He was dressed in a shabby
suit of regimentals, with an old three-cornered hat,
mounted upon the top of a foxy wig, which had a
singularly
comical effect when contrasted with a sedate
countenance, strongly marked, care-worn, and
indicative
of intense thought. He had a rapier by his side,
which, like that of Hudibras, had eaten its way through
the end of the scabbard, and his feet, which were cased
in a long pair of horseman-boots, evinced a similar
token
of their impatience. Still there were the remains
of former beauty in that austere countenance, nor was
he so far disfigured by his outre apparel, but that the
graceful movements of a polished man were
discernible
.
What, doctor, is it you? exclaimed Drone,
raising
his lamp to the stranger's face. Why are you from
Brandywine at such a time as this, sir?
Out of pure patriotism, for if some unlucky bullet
had brought me my quietus, half the army, you know,
must inevitably perish for want of my assistance, so I
reluctantly forced myself from the field of battle.
Humph! muttered Drone, he is disposed to
serve his country much after my fashion.
This room, continued M`Crea, addressing
Jurian
,
looks rather desolate, compared to its
appearance
when I last beheld it.
True, sir, the furniture has been stowed away.
Talking of my last visit;your worthy father and
myself became as merry on that occasion as Bacchus,
Silenus, and their crew, when they entered the city of
no matter for the name of the city. But, unless
my memory fails me, we did not more than half finish
the last bottle. I have had a weary race of it, boy,
from the field, without stopping at a single baiting
place. Old Pegasus flew like his namesake, with
Homer
on his back. He is in a foam, and I am as dry as
a cartouche-box. It is time to replenish the radical
moisture, or this human machine will soon become
disorganized
.
Every man has his hobby, and surgeon M`Crea
rode his as unmercifully as any philosopher since the
days of Paracelsus. Being something of a chemist, and
having a taste for literature, and tone of thinking of the
darker ages, he was not an absolute disbeliever in the
existence of the philosopher's stone, but as it was not
exactly in his line, he had not made many experiments
in order to its discovery. He contended that as every
thing in nature is created by combination, man would
be unable to maintain his reason before the omnipotence
VOL. I.3
of chemistry, if it were allowed him to discover the just
proportion of the different elements required to the
success
of his experiments. The creations and
annihilalations
he averred would be terrific in the extreme.
Our philosopher had for many years been studying to
arrive at the arcanum by which he would be enabled to
live forever, which he contended to be practicable by
admitting just such proportions of the various elements
into our systems as would mutually counteract any
injurious tendency that too great a proportion of one
might have upon the numberless organs necessary to
animal life. The philosopher, as he filled a cup,
remarked
to Jurian
The human system is nothing more than a
mechanical
machine, one part depending upon another; and
as long as each part be kept in repair the machine will
continue in motioneven to the end of time. The
only difficulty that presents itself is to keep the several
parts in repair, and this difficulty, I think, may easily be
surmounted by strict observance that the proper
proportions
of solids and fluids, and conflicting gasses, be
admitted into the system. To the neglect of this all
important point, may the unreasonable brevity of
human
life be attributed.
Still it is long enough for human purposes, said
Jurian.
Though i do not clearly understand his
philosophy
,
said the corporal, I must say, I never heard a
better excuse for drinking. Saying which, he finished
the contents of the bottle.
What news do you bring from the army, sir?
Melancholy. Our loss is a thousand at least, good
men and true. I spent the whole morning in plastering
up flesh wounds and extracting bullets. A sad vocation,
boy! Poor souls, every groan went to my heart. But,
mark me, and I will describe the order of battle to
you. Saying which, he poured a few drops of liquor
upon the table, and dipping his finger into it, began to
describe the position of the armies:Here, sir, runs
the Brandywinebut we will make it a little stronger
stream. Now, sir, here are the heights on the east side
of the creek, where we were encamped, in order to
command the fording place. Here is the opposite
height, where general Maxwell was posted with about
one thousand light troops, who last night threw up a
slight breastwork, with the limbs of trees. By
day-break
this morning we observed the enemy advancing
in two columns
Never mind, sir, the order of the battalia; I take
but little interest in such matters, and you bid fair to be
exceedingly minute, though I dare swear you lay
concealed
in a baggage-wagon during the whole
engagement
.
Had you lived in the days of ancient Rome,
replied
the surgeon, they would have sent you to
Delphos
.
I am right, then?
Half right; but that is more than any of the
soothsayers of olden times. I was concealed in the
place you mention, which will account for the accuracy
of my description. A cool spectator, you know, will
see more of the game than one who plays, but I
regret
to say, I was not lying
perdu
during the whole
engagement
.
At an early part of the day, I had the folly
to attend my corps to the field; you see the
consequences
.
An uncivil bullet came close to my ribs, and
has nearly destroyed the only coat that my doctorship
can boast of. I knew there was more lead where that
came from, but very few more coats where this came
from, so I leisurely marched off in search of a place
of safety, both for my coat and carcass.
Jurian smiled at the recital, knowing the singularity
of the surgeon, and at the same time his unquestioned
courage, while the corporal strutted about the room,
and muttered to himself
I am a plain man, with nothing more than a good
name to lose, but if corporal Drone had been there,
history would not have had to record that he was found
concealed in a baggage-wagon.
You would have found it a snug berth, for all that,
corporal, replied the surgeon, and doubtless it would
prove more satisfactory to be reported thus, than among
the slain. The corporal smiled as if in scorn of the
imputation; the surgeon continued,Go house old
Pegasus, who stands by the garden gate. I shall
remain
here to-night, and by times in the morning, remove
Mistress Swain to the city, for there is no safety in
this place for a soldier's wife. And mark you, corporal,
give him half a gallon of grain, and twice as much
waternot a drop nor a grain more or less.
Why, sir, I think a double mess would not hurt him
in his present condition.
Death! you would make him dog's meat in a week,
corporal.
Not quite so soon, sir. You forget that he has as
many points as a Swede's fence after a north-easter.
It would take a month at least to make him fit for the
commons.
It is all owing to the unscientific mode of foddering
in the army, replied M`Crea, as the corporal
withdrew
.
Now, Jurian, we are alone, I will proceed in
my description of the battle.
Really, sir, you might as well recount the affair of
Marathon or Philippi. I have, as you know, but little
taste for military tactics.
But your patriotism I imagined would have
awakened
a curiosity to learn the events of this day.
Sufficient for me, is it to learn the grand result
without troubling myself to glean the minute details.
But as to patriotism; it is a word more generally used
than understood, and the lives of very few of the many
who are held up to us as examples, present a practical
illustration of its meaning.
The name of the elder Brutus, alone, will refute
the position you have assumed.
True, he is often referred to as a character to
excite
our admiration and respect, but his claims to that
distinction, it has often struck me, are exceedingly
questionable, and that he is indebted for the halo that
surrounds his name to the talents of the historian, and
the imagination of the reader. Was the sacrifice of
Titus an act of justice, or was it not the object of his
executioner to gild his own name for posterity with the
blood of his dearest son? Did the safety of Rome,
or the justice of the cause, require the blood of this
victim at the altar of liberty? No; he might have
lived without endangering the safety of Rome, and of
this Brutus was fully aware, before the fatal axe had
fallen, and while hundreds were supplicating him for
mercy. If we admire him as an inflexible statesman,
we must condemn him as an unnatural father, and,
indeed, this prominent act of his life is sufficient to
lead us to question whether the assumption of idiocy
had not some foundation in reality. Bring forth another
model, for this, clothed in his gory robes, is not for me.
I will then ask you, in the language of a popular
poet, said M`Crea
Was not that Brutus;
I mean that Brutus, who, in open senate,
Stabb'd the first Csar that usurp'd the world,
A gallant man?
This question of Pierre's, replied Jurian, is
usually answered in the affirmative. He is lauded as a
patriot, philosopher, and virtuous man; but at the time
of doing the act that emblazoned his memory, he knew
that he was killing his best friend; nay, believed he
was planting a dagger in the bosom of his own father;
exactly reversing the nature of the crime that has
immortalized
the first of the name of Brutus;father for
son; son for father. Such being the fact, his speck of
patriotism is lost sight of when compared with his
unnatural
offence. Though I have never experienced a
father's love, and perhaps the best feelings of my nature
are still slumbering in my bosom, I must beg you to call
3*
forth another patriot from the tombs, for this last is no
prototype for me. Murder his own father, and yet
held up as a praiseworthy example to the world! I'll
none of him. As he referred to his own deserted
condition, his voice assumed a melancholy tone, that
did not escape the notice of M`Crea.
What think you, then, of Minturn's exile?
continued
the surgeon. From your opposition to
received
opinions, doubtless he was a patriot to your own
mind.
And so he was. The records of the world present
not a character parallel with that of old Marius. True,
those who peruse alone Plutarch's prejudiced narrative,
will pronounce him a monster in human shape, without
one redeeming quality, still we find that at one period,
he had his country's good nearest at heart; that the
people have seldom had a more thoroughgoing
champion
;
oligarchy a more determined foe. And if the
true patriot became a monster and a misanthrope, we
must attribute the change to the ingratitude of Rome,
for he was not such until a price was set upon his head,
and he was hunted by mercenaries through the very
land that his valour had saved from barbarous invasion.
So much for Marius; what of Catiline?
I am half inclined to believe the assertion of old
Renault, replied Jurian, smiling, that he was a
gallant
man, `though story wrong his fame.'
And upon the same principle, said the surgeon,
doubtless you will maintain that `Collatine's fair love,
Lucrece the chaste,' has built her reputation upon a
very problematical basis?
And so she has. Although her chastity has
become
a proverb, yet it must be admitted she sacrificed
the substance for the shadow, and preferred actual
pollution
to dying unstained, with a charge of pollution
attached
to her name. But she may have been an able
polemic in these matters, and supported the doctrine of
free agency, without which there can be neither sin nor
virtue.
Thy mind has been strangely warped, young man;
however, I do not like you the worse on that account,
for I am not disposed myself to travel altogether in the
beaten track.
Few flowers, sir, spring up in the common
highway
.
Give me the broad field to wander in, where I
may choose my own road.
The corporal now returned from the stable, and
M`Crea having satisfied himself that his instructions
had been carefully followed, rested his head upon the
table, and being overcome with fatigue, soon sounded
his deep-toned clarion. Drone, after examining the
bottle, and finding it empty, also prepared himself for
repose in a corner of the room, while Jurian threw
himself in the old captain's arm-chair, and soon was
lost in that doubtful state, between sleeping and
waking
,
in which the gloom of reality casts a deep shade
over the bright visions of unrestrained imagination.
CHAPTER IV.
The foe is fast approaching, and 'tis time
For women, children, aged, and infirm,
To seek for shelter.
The Sultan
.
Her words are sad as Philomela's strain,
While singing with her bosom to the thorn.
Ib
.
At
day-break the following morning Mrs. Swain
descended
the stairs, and was not a little astonished on
discovering the surgeon in the situation just described;
on awakening him, however, he explained the object of
his mission, and represented affairs in such a light that
it was deemed expedient to depart for the city without
loss of time. Accordingly a vehicle was hastily got
ready, in which M`Crea seated the wife of his friend,
and himself beside her, directing the corporal to follow
on the back of old Pegasus, having previously, with his
own hands, administered a morning feed to his favourite
horse. The corporal strenuously protested against
exposing
himself to public ridicule by mounting such a
garran, and concluded his expostulation by remarking,
that a seat in the pillory on a holiday would be
agreeable
pastime compared to it.
You speak from actual experience, I presume,
said M`Crea; if not, you will doubtless soon be
enabled
accurately to draw the line of distinction between
the two positions.
The corporal affected not to apprehend the peculiar
bearing of this remark, and continued to urge his
objections
to mounting the horse, for there is no weapon to
which our nature is so vulnerable as ridicule, and it is
not uncommon to see an affectation of pride floating in
a kennel, and to meet with a fellow who would defy a
whipping-post to make him blush, troubled with false
shame. The corporal's scruples, however, were soon
removed by that omnipotent talisman, a bribe; he
mounted old Pegasus, and before the sun was half an
hour high, was seen slowly pacing after the lumbering
vehicle towards the city.
Jurian had promised to follow. The vehicle was
still in sight as he led his horse from the stable, but
before he mounted he perceived a female approaching.
The first glance was sufficient to tell him that it was
little Miriam of the inn, and a change of countenance
indicated that the interview was not of his seeking.
She stood beside him a few moments in silence, and
then, without raising her eyes, said in a low tone,
Jurian, you are about to leave me?
For a short time only.
To you it may appear but a short time, but to
me!O! Jurian, I have a presentiment that the time
is fast approaching when we shall part forever.
What is it that has again created these idle fears?
I thought I had removed them at our last interview.
Silenced, but not removed. You go to join the
continental forces; it is so reported.
Such is my present intention; but why, dear
Miriam
,
should that circumstance create an apprehension
that we may meet no more?
You will be daily exposed to death.
In what situation in life are we not so?
True! and but for that, life would indeed be
insupportable
.
O! that his arrows flew in countless
numbers
across my pathway! How blythly would I walk
on without a shield, where they flew thickest!
You distress me.
Pardon me, I meant it not. I would be the last in
the world to occasion your bosom a single pang. I
once imagined myself a source of joy, but since that
dream is past, do not awaken me to the conviction that
I am a source of sorrow and shame alone. That
thought would exceed in poignancy all that I have
heretofore endured, and I trust that it is not in store
for me.
Fear not that, Miriam, thou art still a source of
joy to me, dearer if possible than ever.
He took her hand, and would have pressed her to
his bosom, but she gently repelled him, and fixing her
large black eyes steadily upon his face, replied in a
calm tone
I have already said that dream is past, and there is
nothing on earth can again create the delusion. Jurian,
our minds have been cast in the same mould, it is
therefore
useless to attempt to deceive me. I can gather
your thoughts more faithfully from the language of your
eyes than from the words that pass your lips.
And do they not, dear Miriam, speak of love?
They do; of ardent and, perhaps, of unabated
love. But they also betray another passion, before the
fierceness of which your love shines as the glow-worm
at noonday.
And what is that?
A passion, for the gratification of which Lucifer
lost heaven, and thou wouldst do the same
ambition
!
Surely, dear Miriam, there is sufficient room in
the human heart to cherish both love and ambition.
As well might you say, there is ample space upon
a single throne for contending kings. They are
passions
that brook no rivalry, and when they come in
collision, there is no temporizing; one must destroy
the other.
Do me then the justice to suppose that the
boundless
love I bear thee will obtain the mastery in the
conflict
.
She smiled, if a muscular motion of the lips,
indicative
of sorrow alone may be called a smile.
Duplicity is fruitless; I read thy thoughts as
plainly
as if they were in a written book before me. I am
still dear to you, though I have forfeited your esteem.
Even the coldest neglect could not convince me to
the contrary, and yet it avails nought; your dream of
ambition must be fulfilled, though at the price of my
happiness, and perchance of your own.
Beloved Miriam, if there is truth in man, I
swear
Hear me yet, she calmly continued: I have said
that our minds have been cast in the same mould. The
first hour we met, it seemed to me that we understood
each other by intuition. That our spirits had the
faculty
of communication, without resorting to physical
means. I had seen much of the world for one so young,
and experienced but little sympathy for those with whom
I came in collision. This apathy may have been
constitutional
,
or occasioned by my peculiar lot, which
prevented
my being recognised as an equal by those to
whom I felt myself superior. But the first moment we
met, Jurian, I felt as if our spirits had met in another
world, and were familiar and dear to each other. New
thoughts arose, and yet they were not new, for they
seemed
rather as reminiscences of nearly forgotten dreams.
Still those faded dreams belonged not to this world,
for in vain I endeavoured to trace them to their source.
The fountain was not to be searched; for until that
moment
we had never met, and strange as it may appear,
thy thoughts and thy appearance were to me as familiar
as if we had traversed the universe together.
Whither, dear Miriam, tends this unintelligible
discourse
?
I have asked myself a thousand times the cause
of this foreknowledge, but it defied the power of my
reason to give a satisfactory answer. I have spoken
to you repeatedly on the same subject, and there was
a time when you fondly cherished the idea of unearthly
ties subsisting between us. But since that time is past,
and we must part, it is better that I endeavour to forget
that we were ever bound together by ties created in this,
or in another world.
Why talk of parting?
Because that hour is near at hand. Our meetings
will henceforth be few and sorrowfulat least to me.
Coming events, 'tis said, cast their shadows before
themand if this be true, there can be no mistake in
my present feelings. There is but one event could cast
so deep a shade upon my mindseparation from thee.
Visionary girl! why will you suffer ideal fears to
render us both wretched?
As there is no shadow without a substance, there
is no effect without a cause, calmly replied Miriam.
Thy heart will tell thee, when I name Agatha
Morton
,
whether my fears are idle. Enough! I see it all,
and have long since foretold my destiny. I do not
reproach
thee, Jurian. Thy young heart was hers years
before we met, and but for me would have remained
hers undivided. I reproach myself alonenot thee,
not thee.
Her magnanimity awakened the better feelings of
Jurian's heart, and he exclaimed
I am thinewill be thinewholly thinemy
Miriam
!
And what is there is the poor and degraded Miriam
to gratify the aspirations of thy soul? The pathway of
ambition is too narrow and rugged for love, and I fear
too steep for safety. I may not climb it with thee.
Nor I without thee.
Not without me! as well might you place a
shackle
on the deer, and bid him run. You say you love
me, and I believe you; but mark my wordsmy corse
would be no more than a straw in your pathway.
Miriam, this is unjust, unfeeling.
Neither; for I say it not for the purpose of
wounding
.
Thy ambition may be termed revenge against the
world. You consider yourself as having been trampled
on, and would gain sufficient strength to trample on
others in your turn. To some there is no cup so sweet
as the cup of revenge!
True, Miriam, there is indeed no cup so sweet!
And you will quaff it, though happiness be the
price of the indulgence?
I shall not be the first, Miriam, who has purchased
it at the same rate. If my happiness were the only
forfeit required, how cheerfully would I lay it down.
You know how bitterly I have endured. I have been
marked, proscribed, by those whom the world
pronounced
more fortunate, though I despised them in my
very soul. Those only who have thus endured, can
conceive
of how little moment appear all considerations
that may interpose in the attempt to change the tone
of the world, in despite of its illiberal prejudice. True,
in the end, the victory and its trophies are nothing
more than the veering of a weathercock, and the
adulation
of those whom we contemna glorious
consummation
!
But even an ignis fatuus, of a dreary night,
may lead the traveller astray, my Miriam. The tone
of his voice betrayed the bitterness of his feelings.
And will you madly follow a false light, knowing it
to be such? He hesitated. Why do you not
answer me?
I blush as I avow it, Miriam, I have kept my eyes
so long fixed upon that solitary light, that I fear to
withdraw them, lest I be enveloped in utter darkness.
I long since foretold this hour! sighed the
wretched
girl. Happy Agatha! who at once secures
the love and crowns the ambition of him who obtains
her hand! Farewell. You are now another's, and
dear as you are to me, I can calmly say farewell!
VOL. I4
Nay, Miriam, look not so sad. Hope for brighter
days.
You plant a dagger in the heart, and smilingly talk
of hope to your expiring victim. She withdrew her
hand from his grasp, as she continued, hope for
brighter days! and so I do; but not in this worldnot
in this world!
Reproaches from those lips!
Forgive me, my heart is full. Farewell.
Farewell! Be more cheerful. We soon shall
meet again.
Never, on this side the grave.
She slowly directed her steps towards her home,
which was but a few hundred yards distant, and Jurian,
with a heavy heart, mounted his horse, and pursued
his way to the city.
The conduct of Jurian towards the devoted Miriam
no circumstances can justify, no sophistry palliate. It
is a crime, that in every age has received the universal
reprobation of mankind. The moralist has declaimed
against it; the unstained have called down execrations
on the head of the despoiler; human laws have been
enacted to heal the broken heart, and the pulpit has
resounded
with the laws divine in order to strike terror
to the conscience of the guilty. And yet, in spite of
the moralist, and the censure of the world
Where breathes the man who hath not tried,
How love will into folly glide,
And folly into sin!
Jurian from his childhood had taught his heart to
believe
that it was wholly devoted to Agatha, and his
dream of ambition tended to confirm this opinion, for
the possession of her hand would crown his earthly
hopes. Nor was it until some time after his
acquaintance
with Miriam, that he questioned the sincerity of
his passion. He was not slow to perceive that the
form and features of the stranger girl were fascinating,
and that her mind possessed many of the peculiar traits
of his own. She also evinced an acquaintance with
books possessing but few attractions for a girl of her
years. Her manners and conversation were superior
to her station in life, and Jurian felt that she was every
way his equal, but he also felt that a union with the
obscure stranger would utterly prostrate his ambitious
hopes in this world. Too frequently, man, while
deliberately
calculating his interest, neglects to take
happiness
into view.
We will now return to M`Crea. Although he had
but a ride of seven miles to accomplish, it was a tedious
journey, for many of the villagers and neighbouring
farmers had taken the alarm, and were moving in the
same direction, to escape from the approaching enemy.
Jurian overtook them at the Schuylkill ferry, for as
there was but one boat, some time elapsed before
it became M`Crea's turn, for the fugitives claimed
the privilege in the order they had arrived at the
ferry-house
.
During the delay, our disciple of Galen
became
very impatient, especially while the boat was
pushing from the shore with some one more fortunate,
but as it slowly returned, his good humour revived,
with the hope that by being on the alert, he might push
forward before his proper turn. This attempt he made
repeatedly, but as often failed, as all appeared as
anxious as the surgeon to cross the stream. While
remaining in this situation, the stranger already
mentioned
as having stopped to inquire his way, at Alice
Grey's inn, rode up to the ferry, and accosted Jurian,
who stood apart, so wholly occupied with his own
reflections
,
that he was unconscious of the scene passing
before him.
Well met, sir, said the stranger, I wish a word
with you, sir.
Jurian, upon being thus abruptly accosted, paused
for a moment, and looking the other intently in the
face, replied
Proceed, sir, I am at your service.
My business will not occupy your time, added the
other, but as my counsel is for your advantage
Your counsel! exclaimed Jurian, smiling, then
suddenly changing his tone, and expression of
countenance
To
the point, sir, and waive your
apologies
.
Then be it so, said the stranger. Last night,
sir, if I mistake not, you obtruded yourself upon the
presence of Miss Morton.
Obtruded! repeated the other, his face becoming
red with indignation.
Ay, sir, obtruded was the word, continued the
stranger, and this morning you had the effrontery to
attempt another interview, but I advise you to desist
from such fruitless procedure, before it becomes worthy
of punishment.
You are a right merry gentleman, by my faith!
And who, pray, is to inflict this punishment you talk
of?
You see the man before you.
Scoundrel! first receive a lesson from me,
exclaimed
Jurian, at the same time raising his whip to
strike the aggressor, who received the blow upon his
arm, and calmly replied
This may pass unnoticed for the present, but
remember
the advice I have bestowed, and observe it
strictly. Farewell.Saying which he dashed his
spurs into the flanks of his steed, and in a few moments
was out of sight.
During this strange interview, M`Crea was busy
wrangling with an elderly lady of immeasurable tongue,
on the point of priority of title to the boat. He had
drawn this fierce battery upon him, by proving the most
formidable competitor of our Xantippe, who in the heat
of argument could not spare time to be choice in
phraseology
.
Drone leaned on the neck of old Pegasus,
and listened with deep interest to the altercation, while
an arch smile on his rubicund face betrayed his inward
delight. A dish of scurrility was cakes and ale to the
corporal. In order to escape from the unceasing
volley
,
M`Crea attempted to enter into conversation with
Jurian, and called him to where he was stationed,
fearing
to stir from his place lest another should take
possession
of it. He commenced by inquiring who it was
he was just conversing with.
An exceedingly pleasant gentleman, sir, replied
Jurian, but a stranger to you, and to me also.
A stranger! why you could not have quarrelled
more expeditiously had you been acquainted for half a
century, said the surgeon.
The same remark is equally applicable to your
present
case, replied Jurian, smiling; the corporal
smothered
a laugh, and the unwearied scold discharged
another
volley of epithets at our disciple of Esculapius.
M`Crea immediately began to talk with great earnestness
to Mrs. Swain, but at every pause, he heard that the
clapper
of his tormentor was still going with rapidity. At
length the boat was hauled to the shore;
Now is your time to escape, said the corporal.
I give place to the lady, replied M`Crea, gravely.
She accordingly drove into the boat without meeting
with any opposition, and the surgeon considered himself
fortunate in getting rid of such a virago by yielding the
obstinately contested point of precedence, and at the
same time enduring her vulgar taunts of triumph, which
continued during the passage across the river.
That woman is by no means well bred, said the
corporal, and for my part I am glad we are free from
her company. Jurian smiled.
An exceedingly coarse woman, replied the
surgeon
.
I dislike vulgarity, continued the corporal,
especially
in a female. It is bad enough in our sex, but in
woman it assumes the aspect of crime.
Jurian laughed outright, but wherefore? I have
4*
heard worse sentiments from the pulpit, and on the
stage it would have been applauded to the very echo,
but in this strange world it does not become us to speak
even morally without a license. The next boat
accommodated
our travellers, and they proceeded to the
city without further molestation.
CHAPTER V.
He's craz'd a little;
His grief has made him talk things from his nature.
Valentinian
.
Since
Jurian had undertaken to depend solely upon
his own resources, he led a life of extravagance and
dissipation, which the gaming-table for a time enabled
him to support, but Fortune does not always smile even
upon her greatest favourites. A succession of losses
involved him in almost inextricable difficulties. Young
Morton was his companion in these scenes of dissipation,
and, when successful himself, had repeatedly
assisted
his friend in his emergencies, so that the latter stood
indebted to him at this time to a large amount.
Morton
had hitherto never asked to be reimbursed, or
indeed
alluded to the subject, as the liberality of his
father
supplied him with the means of gratifying his
wishes to the extent, and Jurian, being aware of this, did
not feel that anxiety to discharge the debt, that he
would have experienced under different circumstances.
His mind was at ease, as he knew that he was not
doing
his friend an injury by consulting his own
convenience
.
The time, however, had arrived when this
belief
was to be dissipated. The day after his removal
to Philadelphia, while patiently listening to a profound
dissertation from the lips of M`Crea on his favourite
theory, the art of prolonging human life, it was
announced
that a man at the door wished to see him.
He left the room, and found Jones in waiting, who
handed
him a letter and withdrew. Jurian recognised the
superscription to be that of his friend, and on breaking
the seal he read as follows:
Chad's Ford
,
September
11.
Dear Jurian
You may judge of the extent of my perplexities when
I apply to you for pecuniary assistance. Were you in
funds you would be the first I should apply to, but in
your present circumstances you should be the last.
But, as I do not know what fortune may have done for
you since our last interview, I have ventured to make
known my distresses to you. I have an insuperable
objection to my father's becoming acquainted with the
cause of my present embarrassment, and have
therefore
employed every means to extricate myself before
a knowledge of the circumstance shall reach him. To
change the subject, I feel that I should fight the battles
of my king with better heart, if my earliest and best
friend were still by my side. Reflect again upon the
nature of the contest; reflect, I beseech you, until you
view it in the light that it is viewed by
Your friend,
Edward Morton
.
This letter gave Jurian sincere concern. He was
not prepared for a demand of that nature, and it was
utterly
out of his power to answer it at that time. He
knew that Morton was cautious and calculating, and
conjecture was at a loss to account for the manner in
which he had become involved, and by means too, the
knowledge of which he wished to conceal from his
father
.
The whole affair was to him inexplicable, but
as his friend demanded payment of the debt he owed,
he resolved to spare no exertion until he should
exonerate
himself from the obligation.
During the night after the engagement at
Brandywine
,
the continental troops retreated to Chester, and
the following day entered Philadelphia, where they
remained
until the 15th to recruit their strength and
spirits
,
after the many hardships and reverses they had
recently encountered. On the 15th, general
Washington
recrossed the Schuylkill with his forces, intending
to give sir William Howe battle wherever he might
meet him. Fearful were the presentiments that arose
on that day in many of the brave hearts attached to the
little army, as it dejectedly withdrew from the
metropolis
of the new world. The citizens followed it in crowds
for some distance, bewailing their fate, for they felt that
the withdrawal of the army, was virtually the
deliverance
of the city into the hands of the enemy.
Jurian, until this period, had been nothing more than
an idle spectator of the grandest drama that has ever
been acted upon the theatre of the world; but now,
either ashamed of remaining inactive, or awakened to a
full sense of the magnitude of the cause in which his
country contended, he made known to captain Swain
his wishes to participate in the struggle. This
unlooked
for step, was a matter of rejoicing to the worthy
descendant
of the lord of Passaiung, who ordered the
fatted
calf to be killed, and celebrated the event as the
return
of the prodigal son. Jurian duly received a
commission
in captain Swain's company of volunteers, and
his partial commander predicted that in time, the new
recruit would become second only in arms, to him who
had figured so gallantly at the Fort of the Holy
Trinity
.
M`Crea remained in the city until the day after the
army had recrossed the Schuylkill, having been slightly
indisposed, as he contended, from having neglected to
weigh his food of late with the requisite precision.
Feeling himself sufficiently recruited, he started in
company
with the new proselyte, to join the forces. At the
river they found a crowd waiting to cross. The boat
was on the opposite side, landing a number of soldiers
who were following the army. Among those awaiting
the return of the boat, was one whose singularity of
appearance distinguished him from the rest of the
crowd. He was apparently about fifty years of age,
his form meagre and tall. His features were wo-worn,
harsh, and weather-beaten. His long black hair had
become slightly grizzled, and hung in confusion over
his face and shoulders. His beard was suffered to
grow, while his tattered apparel indicated the most
squalid wretchedness. Over his shoulders an Indian
blanket was cast, in which he folded his arms, and
silently watched the movements of those who were
engaged
in managing the boat, without paying the
slightest
attention to the many inquiries made by those who
surrounded him. After the fruitless attempts of several
to draw him into conversation, he was suffered to enjoy
his meditations without being further molested. The
rubicund face of corporal Drone was seen beaming in
the crowd. He no sooner espied Jurian and his
companion
than he hailed them, in a voice that attracted
general attention, and gave them a familiar nod of
recognition
.
The corporal had made it a rule never to
overlook an acquaintance, and what is more
remarkable
,
he acted up to it.
So, ho! boys! he cried, on your way to the army.
Right! the camp is the only place for your true man, in
times like the present. You may report corporal Drone
to the general, for I shall be with the liberty boys as
soon as my legs can carry me.
This speech was made in a loud voice, but called
forth no answer. As the boat approached the shore,
two or three horsemen rode up to the ferry, one of whom
was mounted on a restive animal, and evidently had
much difficulty to manage him. As they were about
to enter the boat, the horse became alarmed, and more
ungovernable, foiling every attempt to get him on board.
The rider spurred him, when he gave a sudden leap,
and darting rapidly forward, passed from one end of the
boat to the other, and plunged into the river with the
rider on his back. A shriek arose from the assemblage
on the shore, which awakened the attention of the
squalid
stranger just alluded to. He saw the struggling in
the water, and hastily throwing off his blanket, rushed
to the further extremity of the boat, and leaped into the
stream.
He stood upright upon the horse's back, and
laying
hold of the drowning man, raised him in his arms,
and endeavoured to extricate his feet from the stirrups.
The horse made a violent struggle to resist the
additional
weight, and after great exertion, sunk beneath
the surface of the water. They disappeared together.
The pause that succeeded was awful. Every eye was
rivetted to the spot where they sunk. A moment
afterwards
they rose again, the mendicant still clinging to
the body of the horseman, who was lifeless. The
struggle of the noble animal was terrible. Despair was
in his eye as he gazed towards the spectators. The
boatmen had by this time prepared a noose, which they
cast with the hope of fixing it around the neck of the
horse, and by that means drawing the bodies to the
shore; but as it was thrown, they disappeared a second
time. He who stood at the prow of the flat, with the
noose in his hands, kept his eye steadily fixed upon the
bubbles that arose to the surface, denoting where they
sunk. At length the head of the horse appeared.
Expiring
nature mustered all her strength in her last faint
struggle. He leaped above the water. The agonies
of death were on him. The mendicant still
maintained
his position. The
laso
was thrown, the eye of
the boatman was true, and his hand steady. The rope
had no sooner fallen round the neck of the horse, than
it was thrown to the bystanders, and the bodies were
in a few moments drawn to the shore. The feet of the
horseman were entangled in the stirrups, and the arms
of the other were firmly clasped around his body. Both
were lifeless.
The corporal, during this scene, was exceedingly
noisy and officious. He suggested many expedients,
but tried none, and issued countless orders, which no
one attended to. When the bodies were recovered
from the water, he strutted up and down, and modestly
assumed to himself the whole merit of the
achievement
.
We still occasionally meet with an individual
possessed of the same propensity. The race is by
no means extinct.
M`Crea dismounted, and applied the remedies
necessary
to restore animation to the bodies. With the
mendicant he succeeded, but the vital spark of the
horseman was totally extinguished. While bending
over the body of the former, and intently watching his
countenance for signs of returning animation, the
surgeon
was observed to shudder, and when the miserable
object opened his eyes, he started up and exclaimed,
God of heaven! can it be possible! and would have
fallen to the ground, had not Jurian supported him.
My dear sir, inquired Jurian, what is it that thus
suddenly overcomes you?
'Tis past, replied M`Crea, faintly. A sudden
weaknessI feared the case was hopeless. Joy for
this unexpected preservation of the life of a fellow
being
.
And yet it would seem the poor fellow is possessed
of nothing that he could so well spare. I question the
mercy of your beneficence. Death doubtless would
have been a blessing, replied Jurian.
Still it is an incumbent duty to prolong life while
we may, be our lot wretched or happy.
True, we must replenish the fire though it produce
nothing but smoke and ashes, observed Jurian. But
how is this, sir?an army surgeon nervous, whose daily
pastime it is to wrestle with death, and carve and
mangle his fellow mortals.
M`Crea made no reply, but kept his eyes intently
fixed upon the mendicant, who with the assistance of
Drone and another, arose and stood erect upon his feet.
His tall and emaciated figure, but partially covered
with the most squalid raiment, and from the waist
upwards
nearly naked; his matted hair, wet and hanging
about his face and shoulders, his short knotted beard
and his ghastly countenance scarcely half lit up by
returning
animation, together presented such a frightful
appearance, that he resembled rather a tenant of a
churchyard than a being of this world. As he stood
in this position, endeavouring to recal his bewildered
senses, M`Crea demanded
Who is he? can no one present tell me whence he
came?
His name is Corwin, answered the corporal, but
for my part, I call him Waterbrain, for his upper story,
as you may see, is in a leaky condition, and the tenant
has been washed away.
Whence came he? demanded the other.
I know not, but from the south, I judge, replied
the corporal.
Why from the south?
We are told that the wind is tempered to the shorn
lamb; and if so, he must belong to a warmer climate.
His fleece is not yet grown.
The corporal would have his joke, though the
misfortune
of another was the subject of it. He was not
singular in this particular, and in spite of all that has
been said to the contrary, that world must be a merry
world indeed, in which grief affords amusement.
M`Crea appealed to Jurian for information in relation
to the mendicant.
I have seen him but seldom, was the reply, and
for the first time, about a month ago, strolling along
the highway, in the same condition as at present.
Did he speak to you?
He asked charity, and when I bestowed an alms,
he demanded my name, in order, as he said, that he
might not forget me in his prayers.
You gave your name?
VOL I.5
I did. He repeated it over and over. Invoked a
blessing on me, wept and passed on.
He wept, say you?
He did, long and earnestly. But why should that
move your wonder? A smile or a tear may spring
from the same source, as the whim governs those
who are thus afflicted.
True, true, it may be so. They smile without joy,
and possibly they weep without pain. A hollow voice
re-echoed
Possibly they weep without pain. M`Crea turned
at the sound, and beheld a ghastly smile on the
countenance
of the mendicant, who perceiving that he had
attracted the attention of the surgeon, added with a
sigh
At least I smile without joy.
Poor creature! exclaimed Jurian, if this be one
of the unalterable conditions upon which we accept of
life, what has man to boast of!
Death, nothing but death! replied Corwin, in a
tone scarcely audible.
Let us begone, cried the surgeon, in evident
agitation
.
What ails you?
I have been for years endeavouring to discover the
means of prolonging life, and imagined that I had
perfected
my theory. But in the presence of such a
commentary
upon its futility, the mighty fabric falls to the
ground. They prepared to pursue their journey.
Go not yet, cried Corwin, addressing Jurian
What would you?
The mendicant fixed his eyes steadily upon his
countenance, and after a pause solemnly pronounced
Hear the voice of one of another world. He is
not of this, for all its ties are broken. There is a drop
of poison in thy heart, young man, that will corrupt thy
nature. The fatal wound is given that must corrode to
death. There is no cure, unless you have the courage
to prefer the benediction of the good to shame and
execration.
Jurian was confused by the solemn manner in which
Corwin addressed him, and his confusion was increased
as he was conscious that all eyes were on him. He
turned to M`Crea, and said in a careless manner
You have heard the prophecy, will it be fulfilled?
Though some of the prophets of old have been styled
inspired madmen, it does not follow that all madmen
are prophetic.
It does not follow, said M`Crea, gravely, still
keeping his eyes fixed upon Corwin.
If all the visions of old Waterbrain, were to be
realized, said the corporal, we should soon live in a
world of dreams.
And is it not, after all, a world of dreams? said
Jurian to M`Crea.
So it has been styled, but the dream to some is an
eternal nightmare, rendered more terrible from a full
consciousness of what is passing around, replied
M`Crea.
Thy dream is over! said Corwin, approaching the
dead body. Thy dream is over, would that mine
were too!
The boatman cried out that the boat was ready, upon
which M`Crea and Jurian entered it, the former having
first handed a purse to the corporal directing him to
procure such comforts as would expedite the recovery
of Corwin.
I will be your almoner, said the corporal,
pompously
,
at the same time pocketing the purse. It is
not unusual for charity to find a channel similar to that
selected by M`Crea. When the boat had reached the
middle of the stream, the corporal called in a loud voice
to the boatman to hold on to his oars; the progress of
the boat was arrested, and on being asked what he
wanted, he called out to M`Crea not to neglect to
report him at head-quarters, as he should, without fail,
be in the American camp in a day or two at
farthest
.
These important instructions being received,
the boat again moved forward, while Corwin, who still
bent over the body of the drowned man, chaunted in a
low hurried voice the following verses:
Thy dream is over, thy dream is over,
Thy weary task is done;
Thoul't go to thy rest, with the sod on thy breast,
And no more shall the morning sun
Bid thee awake and thy burden take,
And speed thee on thy way;
No fearful dream shall thy slumbers break
Till the morn of the endless day.
False man no more, shall spread before
Thy heedless steps, the snare;
But thou shalt rest, with the sod on thy breast,
Released from a world of care.
For since at last, life's dream is past,
And thy weary task is done,
Alike to thee is the wintry blast,
And the heat of the summer sun.
Thy dream is over.
A litter was prepared, upon which the dead body was
placed and carried to the city. Corwin followed in the
train, supported by the corporal, and thus terminated
the brief career of Monsieur de Coudray in the cause
of freedom. How uncertain is all human calculation!
Instead of the brilliant page in history, which doubtless
in his ardour he aspired to merit, his melancholy fate
is recorded in a single line, seldom read, and his name,
already, is scarcely remembered. And this is fame!
CHAPTER VI.
Alas! good sir, are you grown so suspicious,
Thus on no proofs to nourish jealousy?
Grim, the Collier of Croyden
.
As
they rode along, the surgeon gradually became
more thoughtful, and as Jurian did not feel disposed to
interrupt his meditations, he finally lost sight of his
companion, and jogged on several miles without
making
an observation. At length he exclaimed, as if
speaking to himself, I have witnessed death in many
fearful shapes, but this was an awful scene. The
struggle
of the noble animal, the gasping of the drowning
man was terrible! And the poor lunatic, Corwinyes,
Corwin was the namehow desperately he strove to
do his duty as a man! He rode a few yards farther
in silence, as if awaiting a reply, and then continued;
The heart of that man has been finely disciplined, for
if, when deprived of reason, he still retains the better
feelings of humanity, what must have been its worth
before the blight of the world came over it! Having
allowed due time for common courtesy to make some
comment, M`Crea raised his head and vociferated
passionately
,
are you asleep or dead, sir? but on
casting
his eyes about he could discover no object to vent
his rising ire upon. He stopped, and standing erect in
his stirrups, stretched his neck to an inordinate length
to command a view of the surrounding country, and
5*
gazed impatiently a few moments for the stray youth,
who not appearing, he pronounced him an incorrigible
rebel, and clapping spurs to his horse, continued his
journey. We will suffer him to pursue his solitary ride,
for the present, and look after his lost companion.
Jurian had no sooner mounted the hill after crossing
the Schuylkill, and beheld the road leading to the
scene of his former happiness, than a thousand
pleasing
and bitter recollections came to mind, and each
remove
redoubled his inquietude. He was within half an
hour's ride of those dearest to him, and if the present
opportunity of seeing them was permitted to pass, he
knew not when another might occur. The unhappy
maid of the inn was uppermost in his thoughts. It was
in vain that he strove to disengage his mind from the
influence of their last interview. There was no
cheering
sun to dissipate the clouds, and repeatedly the
words Poor Miriam! broke from his lips in sounds
almost inarticulate. More than once did he resolve to
abandon all hopes of Agatha. But then, as there was
evidently a daring rival in the case, would not such a
step, at this juncture, be attributed to pusilanimity,
especially after the threat that had been used? That
thought checked the virtuous resolution, and he
determined
to see Agatha again, and ascertain from her
upon what footing this rival was received. The hope
of again meeting with the gentleman himself also had
its influence.
As Jurian was well acquainted with the country, he
had not proceeded more than a mile or two before he
recognised another road that led diagonally to the
village
.
M`Crea was at this time absorbed in meditation,
and his companion silently turned the head of his horse
towards the lane, and withdrew without the other being
conscious of his absence. As Jurian rode rapidly he
found himself in a short time on the highroad to the
village, where he overtook a countryman, well
mounted
,
trotting along at a slow pace with a pair of well
filled saddlebags thrown across the back of his horse.
Whither in such haste, master Jurian? exclaimed
the countryman. Change your gait and I will
accompany
you. Jurian checked his horse. I have
been, continued Jones, for it was he, to the city to
purchase a few necessaries for the 'squire's family, but
the times are so hard, that little is to be had for either
love or money. Every thing is dealt out by the small
measure now, but blood and confusion, and those we
have had by the quantity long enough.
You speak truly, Jones, but I fear much more blood
must be shed before the times grow better.
And you, I perceive, sir, intend to try your hand at
it, replied Jones, pointing at his sword. Have you
too turned soldier at last?
Even as you see. I shall sleep in the camp
to-night
,
replied Jurian.
A merry time attend you, sir; but from what I learn
there is not much merriment in the continental camp
at present. I was at the crossing of the river
yesterday
as the army passed, and though their drums
resounded
,
and their fifes played briskly, upon my faith,
I have seen more merriment among the mourners at a
funeral.
Your comparison is a just one, said Jurian, for
were they not mourners also?
True, I had forgotten that; so their gloom was
quite natural, said Jones, smiling sarcastically. I
presume, sir, you intend paying Miss Agatha a visit,
before you put on sackcloth and ashes?
Sackcloth and ashes!
In other words, join this train of mourners as you
call them.
Jurian was somewhat startled at the bluntness of the
question, but replied with an air of carelessness, that
it would give him pleasure at all times to see Miss
Morton, and especially then, as he might not have
another opportunity for a long time. There was enough
of the courtier in Jones to prefer flattery to offence,
whenever an occasion offered sufficiently robust for
his rude mind to seize upon. He accordingly replied
And I dare say, sir, she would have no dislike to
seeing you at present.
I hope not; but what reason have you for this
supposition?
Why, sir, continued Jones, you know the rugged
arbour you made with the branches of trees, two years
ago, in the grove on the bank of the creek, where you
all went of an afternoon with your flutes and books,
and had such merry times of it.
Those happy hours cannot easily be forgotten;
but pray what do you argue from all this?
That Miss Agatha's memory is as fresh as your
own, sir. She still frequents that arbour, and often do
I hear her playing your favourite airs upon her flageolet,
and then she returns to the house thoughtful and
melancholy
.
She is not the same person she was a year
ago. She was then gay and light of heart, but now
she avoids a smile as carefully as if it were high treason
to be otherwise than sad.
It was pleasing intelligence to Jurian, that his
mistress
experienced some pain at their separation, and
Jones, who was quick to perceive the effect of his
statement, true or false, continued
Such is her liking to that spot, that I would wager
an even bet that she is there at this moment.
You would have a desperate odds against you.
O, sir, I understand calculating chances as well as
some who have had more experience. She was there
yesterday, and the day before at this hour, so you
perceive
,
a bold gamester might prudently venture on a
more desperate hazard.
Jones discovered, from the expression of his
companion's
countenance, that he admitted his reasoning to
be as logical as the unravelling of a problem in Euclid.
Jurian replied, smiling
You would make a desperate gamester, indeed, if
willing to trust fortune with more than the colour of a
card, or the turn of a die.
Fortune! exclaimed Jones, I have no faith in
the jade. She has played me too many slippery tricks
in my time. I should make the bet upon my confidence
in dame nature, who is always the same, whether clad
in a rough outside, or a smooth one.
Education, then, in your estimation goes for
nothing
?
replied Jurian.
A stone, sir, is but a stone, polish it as you may;
and even the most brilliant is but a worthless pebble,
after all said and done, replied Jones.
Jurian's opinion responded to this sentiment.
Various
,
we may say countless, as are the works of the
master-hand, each belongs to its own particular species,
and no matter what imaginary value man may be
willing
to concede to it, there is no human act that can by
any possibility change its original nature. The
sparkling
diamond and the dull granite bear an affinity in
their formation; the link between the lordly lion and
the foolish ass is not to be broken, and disguise the
truth as you may, beneath purple and gold, the monarch
of a world of slaves, at last, is nothing more than the
brother of the beggar starving by the highway. This
is a truth that the world has been slow to discover, but
when discovered, it will be as slow to forget. Man,
from the days of Aaron, has been willing to contribute
his mite to the formation of a golden calf, and then fall
down and worship, unmindful of the material of which
it was composed, and the hand that fashioned it. That
day of darkness, it is to be hoped, is now passing away.
Our hero and his companion rode for some time in
silence, which was abruptly broken by Jones
There is a matter, master Jurian, has been upon
my mind for some time, and though my heart has ached
to make its feelings known, I could never pluck up the
courage to speak to you.
And why not, Jones? No man should be afraid
to make his thoughts known to another, for as you say,
even a brilliant is but a worthless stone at last.
Fortune in men has some small difference made;
One flaunts in rags, one flutters in brocade.
You will be astonished, no doubt, sir, continued
Jones, when I tell you that you have injured me, and
are daily continuing to do so; but as I believe it to be
unknowingly, I am encouraged to speak to you on the
subject.
If I have wronged you, it was unwittingly, I assure
you, and should be glad to know in what manner, that
I may avoid repeating it. Jones hesitated. Of
what have you to complain?
O, sir, the cause is nearest my heart. So delicate
a one that I scarcely can trust my tongue to give it
utterance
.
The rude and manly features of Jones were
overcast with sadness as he spoke. Jurian was struck
with the change, as he had always appeared to him a
light-hearted careless fellow, with a constant smile on
his lips, which the natural sternness of the upper half
of his countenance could not dissipate. Still it was
plain to see there was no sympathy between the eye
and the lip. His eye never smiled.
Tell me in what manner I have wronged you?
repeated Jurian.
You can answer that point yourself, sir, when I
mention Miriam Grey.
Miriam! what of Miriam? exclaimed Jurian,
endeavouring
to conceal the interest that her name had
excited.
The merest trifle, sir, cannot escape the eye of
jealousy. I have discovered your apparent partiality
for her, though it is a secret to the rest of the village.
I also fear that your views are such as may not result
in her happiness; and attached to her, as you must be
aware I am, you can judge how wretched your
overtures
have made me.
You are a fellow of some discernment, I find,
replied
Jurian, forcing a smile, and are disposed to see
more than the rest of the world.
I am glad to see you treat the matter so lightly,
sir, continued Jones, as it convinces me that I have
been mistaken. Had I reflected for a moment on your
avowed attachment to Miss Morton, I should have been
convinced that my fears were groundless. And
moreover
,
as Miriam can never by any possibility become
your wife
And wherein lies the impossibility? demanded
Jurian, in a tone that betrayed his feelings.
The inequality of the match. You aim at
something
higher, replied Jones.
Is this all? more was implied by your words and
tone of voice. Go on.
Your long attachment to Miss Agatha.
Jones you prevaricate. More I am certain was
intended than met the ear. Explain your meaning.
His dark eye kindled and his face became flushed.
Jones replied, with downcast look, and in a low
voice
Fate has destined her to become mine.
Fate! you speak in riddles.
She was fair game, sir, and the best marksman was
to have herthat is all.
Villain, have you wronged her?
Mr. Hartfield do not press this matter any farther,
If I had thought your feelings were so deeply enlisted
I should have been as silent as the dead. Rest
satisfied
,
she must be mine.
Must be! Answer me, have you wronged her?
The wrong is such, said Jones, in a low faltering
voice, as shall be repaired in a few days. I intend
to marry her.
As he pronounced these words, Jurian leaped from
his horse, and exclaimed, damned calumniator! His
frame seemed to enlarge, and the passion of a fiend
was depicted in his countenance. He seized upon the
colossal figure of Jones, who astonished by the sudden
transition, was, for a moment, as a child in his grasp,
and was dragged an unresisting mass to the earth.
Jurian
bestrode him, and drew his sword.
For God's sake, what do you mean to do! Not to
murder me? cried Jones.
Ay, to murder you, wretch, said Jurian, in a
solemn
tone, or be satisfied that you have not traduced
that unhappy girl. Do not attempt to deceive me, for
it is as much as your life is worth to belie what you
have saidand I fear, he added in a low voice, as
mine is to prove it true. Proceed, and bear in mind,
it is a matter of life and death between us: so speak
truly.
What evidence can I possibly have of the truth of
my assertion? What stronger proof would you have
of her attachment than being daily with me?
Do not prevaricate, but give me such damning
evidence
as will remove all doubt. My sword is drawn;
trifle not, or it may soon be sheathed in a bloody
scabbard
.
Do not, I beseech you, continued Jones, drive
me to the unpleasant necessity of exposing her whose
reputation is dearer to me than life. He still lay on
the ground, without making even an attempt at
resistance
,
while the expression of his countenance
indicated
that his passiveness was rather assumed than the
effect of fear. He lay as one who felt confident that
the power was in his own hand, whenever disposed to
exercise it.
Wretch, do you hesitate! exclaimed Jurian,
seizing
him by the collar, and raising his sword in a
threatening
posture. Every muscle of his face was swoln with
passion, and his light frame seemed to be endowed
with supernatural strength. He raised the huge mass
with one arm, and dashed it violently to the earth again.
Jones endeavoured to release himself, until apparently
overcome with the struggle, he faintly said
Unhand me, and you shall be satisfied.
Jurian released him; Jones sullenly rose from the
ground, and after searching his pockets, produced a
paper, saying, Since you will have it, there it is in
black and white. If you know her hand, I fancy the
evidence will be conclusivebut, as you are a man of
honour, it must go no farther.
Jurian snatched the paper as it was extended towards
him, and his hand shook violently as he opened it. His
agitation increased as his eyes wandered hastily over
the lines, and he murmured to himself, O God! these
characters are too familiar to me to be mistaken. He
then proceeded to read as follows:
I am wretched and heart-broken. From your
coldness towards me, when we last parted, I have too
much reason to fear that the loss of innocence will
quickly be followed with the loss of your affection. If
so, I feel I merit it, but I shall never be able to support
the loss. I do not reproach you with unkindness
towards
me; I do not blame you for having wronged one
so vile; I reproach myself alone. But see me once
again: in mercy see me, for if this suspense continues
much longer I shall lose my senses.
The paper was not signed, but the handwriting was
that of Miriam Grey. Jurian stood aghast as he
perused
it. He glanced over it a second time, as if to be
assured that there was no deception, and then tore it
into pieces. This act was unaccompanied by any
outward
evidence of passion. Had it been a blank piece of
paper he could not have betrayed less feeling. Still the
volcano was raging within. Jones had removed a few
paces from him, and leaning against his horse, he
smiled
,
and his large gray eyes kindled with delight as he
beheld the misery he had occasioned. They remained
silent for a few moments, during which the flushed
countenance
VOL. I.6
of Jurian became more placid, but ashy pale.
Jones, with his head bent, kept his eyes fixed upon
him, and demanded whether he was yet satisfied.
Perfectlyperfectly satisfied, calmly replied the
other.
I am glad of it; but you have forced me to an act,
Mr. Hartfield, for which I will despise myself as long
as I breathe. I have betrayed a trust that I should have
suffered you to have torn from my heart before it passed
my lips.
You have.
The fault, sir, was yours. Do not betray my
baseness
to Miriam, for she would despise me, and never
forgive me.
Your secret is safer in my bosom than in your
own.
You will not betray me, then?
I have said your secret is safe, for I would not
have that infatuated girl know how unworthily she has
chosen.
Jones was astonished at his placid manner, and the
calmness of his voice. He had expected to encounter
a torrent of violence, and it was beyond his skill in
metaphysics
to reconcile this sudden transition from one
extreme to another. He gazed at him in silent
wonder
a few moments, and then continued
There is one thing more, sir. Do not designedly
throw yourself in her way. You can readily conceive
my fears, and the reason of this request. She has
betrayed
her frailty, and is in your power.
A slight glow passed over the ashy cheek of Jurian,
but he suppressed the indignation he felt at the
insinuation
that he was capable of using that power to her
injury
.
He calmly replied, while a smile of utter scorn
curled his lips
I understand your meaning. Set your mind at
rest; you will have nothing to fear from me.
I must feel satisfied with a pledge thus given, said
Jones, knowing that Mr. Hartfield would neither
compromise his own honour, nor that of another. The
submissive manner of Jones during the foregoing
conversation
,
could not altogether conceal the sarcasm
contained in this remark. He continued
Your frankness, sir, has relieved my mind from a
heavy burden. I rejoice to find that my fears were
groundless.
Have you any thing more to say?
Nothing.
Then in my turn I have one request to make. Do
her justice, I mean that miserable mockery of justice
which is all that now lies within your power to perform.
Make her your wife.
Friendly advice, indeed, thought Jones, but not
exactly
even-handed justice. One word for me, and two
for himself, as he gets rid of his wench by the bargain.
He replied
I promise you whatever is due from me to Miriam
shall be scrupulously performed. They then
remounted
their horses, and each pursued his separate
way.
CHAPTER VII.
You make a right fool of me
To lead me up and down to visit women,
And be abused and laugh'd at.
The Captain
.
When
passion holds dominion, and we attempt to
decide upon a supposed injury, instead of
endeavouring
to satisfy ourselves that none has been sustained,
we ingeniously search for argument in support of the
opposite side of the question. Passion becomes the
advocate, passion is the judge, and scarcely a whisper
is heard in behalf of the party arraigned. Jurian,
astounded
as he had been by the exposition of Jones,
instead
of reasoning for one moment to test its falsity,
brought all the energies of his mind to convince
himself
that it could not be otherwise than true.
Numberless
circumstances were adduced to strengthen the
argument
,
and though, in themselves `trifles light as air,'
to his mind they were `confirmations strong as proofs
from holy writ.' True, when he recalled the last
interview
with Miriam, her sorrow and apparent devotion
to him, awakened self-reproach for having believed the
evidence of his own senses to her injury; but then she
had of her own accord released him from all his vows,
acknowledged the superior claims of a rival, and
dispassionately
spoke of his probable union with another,
and why was this? If her heart were still sincerely his,
her affections still uncontaminated, could she relinquish
without even a tear, the only object that rendered life
worth possessing? Was it in the nature of woman to
make such an appalling sacrifice, and of her own accord
encounter shame and the scoff of the world? If from
devotion to him, she was disposed to sacrifice her own
feelings, to remove every obstacle that lay in the way
of his advancement, could it be supposed that she
would also sacrifice her reputation to attain that end?
No; she must first have been assured of protection
from that most dreadful of all evils, in the arms of a
more favoured lover. Thus he reasoned; and even
the fault that he himself had occasioned, stood forth
and cried aloud for judgment on the accused. Passion
was the advocate, passion was the judge, and the
decree
was against Miriam.
It is not uncommon for some minds, when under
excitement
,
to pass from one object to another without
diminution of the existing fervour. When Jurian had
reasoned himself into the belief of the inconstancy of
Miriam, his thoughts hastily conjured up the beauteous
form of Agatha; he recalled the most prominent
incidents
of their lives from childhood; dwelt upon her
charms, accomplishments, and spotless virtue, until she
appeared as a milk-white dove, compared to the raven,
by the side of Miriam. His enthusiasm on the one
hand, and exasperation on the other, tended to their
mutual increase, until his feelings were wrought to such
a degree that he imagined himself the dupe of a
designing
woman, and he smiled with bitter irony at the
remembrance of the remorse he had long experienced
for the wrong he had done one apparently so devoted
and so innocent. These virtues were now placed to
the account of hypocrisy, and for a time he felt that all
the ties that had subsisted between him and one so
artful
and debased, were violently rent asunder, and by
her hand. He endeavoured to dismiss the faithless
fair from his mind, and direct his feelings into another
channel. Need we say, that channel led to Agatha?
6*
In the tumult of his mind, the hint of Jones that
Miss Morton was at that time in the arbour, was not
forgotten. Its improbability occurred to him, still it
was possible, and he is a phlegmatic lover indeed, who
is not willing at times, to take possibility for certainty.
Having secured his horse, he directed his steps towards
the arbour, and before he arrived in sight of it, he
heard the soft notes of a flageolet, upon which was
performed an air, too familiar to his ear for him to
mistake
the musician. His heart beat with delight, and
he exclaimed with joy, she at least is true to me!
and he reproached himself for having suffered another
to dispute her claim to his undivided affection. And
when he reflected on the worthlessness of that other,
his reproaches were accompanied by a poignant sense
of shame. Miriam, however, was soon dismissed from
his mind, he quickened his step, and in a few minutes
stood at the entrance of the arbour.
Agatha, he exclaimed, my heart was not
mistaken
;
we meet again. She arose, and extended her
hand towards him, which he eagerly seized, and
pressing
it to his bosom, repeated, no, no, my heart was
not mistaken.
Agatha was one of those sylph-like beings, which
nature seems to have formed in her most prodigal
moments
,
as if to inhabit a purer orb than thiswhose
presence calls forth the better feelings of our nature,
and who seem to be surrounded by a heavenly
atmosphere
,
that maintains an influence over all by whom it
is inhaled. As in the vegetable kingdom there are
various
flowers that appear to have been formed for no
other use than to blossom for a day, impart their
fragrance
,
and die, so it is in the human race, we meet
with many who are to the world at large as flowers to
the vegetable kingdom. To this class of beings did
Agatha belong.
True, we meet again, she replied, smiling, but
perhaps
it would have been as well had it been otherwise.
And why so, my little fairy? said Jurian.
My father, when he heard of our last interview,
replied Agatha, assigned a reason that I may not
readily forget, and have but little desire to hear again.
And what was that?
A lecture on disobedience, delivered in no very
temperate tone, she replied. But when Jones
informed
me that you were in the neighbourhood, and
would probably visit this arbour, I know not why, I
felt a strange desire for a stroll, and the spirit of
disobedience
guided my steps in this direction.
Was it not a more amiable spirit? said Jurian,
still holding her hand.
You vain creature! she exclaimed, no doubt
will assign another cause, and I am reduced to the
awkard dilemma, of suffering you to enjoy your opinion,
for nothing that I could say, would convince you, that
vanity is sadly given to romancing.
Still few possess the faculty of telling a tale so
agreeably, replied Jurian, and even the most highly
coloured are, in some measure, founded on fact. They
are seldom altogether fiction.
And in the present instance, you have wove a tale
to please yourself, from slender material, replied
Agatha. I read it in your face, and I must say I
have little reason to be pleased with the colouring.
You have a fervid imagination, Jurian, and if the world
were as easily pleased with your fictions, as yourself,
I should advise you to turn poet by all means. The
playfulness of her manner betrayed that Jurian's
construction
was not as unfounded as she would have it
appear.
I will turn poet, he replied, or whatever else
may render me acceptable in the eyes of Agatha.
The slight tinge on her delicate cheek was heightened,
and she averted her deep blue eyes from the gaze of
her admirer. It has been the study of my life, he
continued, and hope has whispered that I have not
been an unapt scholar. I care not what new task you
now impose; I am ready to undertake it, though it
should be to turn poet in spite of nature.
You speak as if that were a task, replied Agatha,
when you are aware that it has been undertaken
voluntarily
time out of mind. If a fear of ridicule should deter
you, pray dismiss it, for you will certainly be lost sight
of in the multitude. Nothing short of preeminent
success will expose you to the shaft of ridicule.
And to that I should be invulnerable by this time,
said Jurian, if there be any truth in the remark of
Wycherly.
And what, pray, has that naughty writer said,
worth repeating?
He tells us, that love makes a man more ridiculous
than poverty, poetry, or a new title of honour,
replied
Jurian.
The heretic! exclaimed Agatha, and is that the
opinion of a man who made love the business of his
life? But your professed wit will have his jest, though
at the expense of his best friend. She now
perceived
,
for the first time, that Jurian carried a sword. Her
animated countenance and tone of voice underwent a
sudden change, as she inquired the meaning of the
weapon by his side.
I have caught the fever of the times, and turned
patriot too, dear Agatha, replied Jurian.
In other words, she replied gravely, I must
hereafter view you as the enemy of my brotherthe
foe of my father and all his race. A rebel to your king
and country. Is it not so?
Rather the champion of my country, said Jurian,
or our statesmen have declaimed to little purpose.
But the name can only be decided by the result. If
we are successful, we shall be handed to posterity as
heroes and patriots; but if the reverse, rebel will be
considered almost too mild an epithet for the pages of
history. The child must be born before it is
christened
.
Patriot or rebel, then, said Agatha, were there
not already obstacles enough to our happiness, without
wantonly increasing the number. You know my
father's
inveterate prejudices, in despite of which he still
entertained some kindly feelings towards you; but this,
I fear, will be a death-blow to all.
Let the blow fall, replied Jurian, if fall it must.
It matters not, how soon, provided his daughter imbibe
not similar prejudice.
It becomes the child to tread in the path of the
parent, replied Agatha. There is little safety for
those who unadvisedly depart from it.
Agatha! can this be possible, exclaimed Jurian,
his countenance becoming darker as he proceeded.
Our lives have passed togetherfrom childhood our
hearts have been open to each otherthere has been
no concealment of thought or action, and yet you are
ready to imbibe the prejudices of another against one
whom you so thoroughly know. Is it just? Have I
not reason to complain?
Agatha fixed her mild blue eyes upon him, and her
cheeks became of a deeper hue as she repeated his
words, in a tone of interrogatory
No concealment, Jurian?
No question could possibly have been more
startling
.
It assumed so great a latitude, that Jurian was
at a loss to discover the particular point to which it was
directed. From her manner the question was
evidently
pregnant with meaning. His thoughts were all in
action, and with the rapidity of lightning, they recalled
countless deeds that he wished might never come to
the knowledge of Agatha. He was himself startled at
the number, and his perplexity increased as he
attempted
to select the particular one to which she referred.
There was one, however, more alarming than the rest,
and upon that his mind finally settled, for it is a
principle
with the guilty, when brought to trial, to believe
that their worst offences have been discovered. The
question repeatedly recurred,can it be possible that
she has heard of my conduct towards Miriam Grey?
Still he was too well schooled in the ways of the world
to betray his fears. All this passed through his mind,
as we have said, in an instant, and he replied to the
perplexing quere by another
In what, dear Agatha, have I used concealment
towards you?
There is much has reached my ears in vague
reports, replied Agatha, much that has given me
painand yet your lips have been sealed upon the
subject
,
when perhaps a word would have vindicated your
character.
This remark gave no additional clue to conjecture,
and Jurian was still as much in the dark as at first. He
again asked
Of what, pray, am I accused?
Of being a reprobate, replied Agatha; of
spurning
aside every principle that adorns the human
character
.
A prodigal, a gambler, a man to be shunned.
The gentle voice of Agatha became tremulous, and she
paused. Jurian replied
And all these calumnies are believed, by her who
is familiar with the whole tenour of my life. And she
whom I have loved for years as my own soul, has
become
my accuser. Then where may the injured hope
to find an advocate!
A slight flush suffused the pale features of Miss
Morton
.
The colour came and disappeared in the same
moment. Collecting herself, she replied, in a subdued
tone
That you love me, Jurian, I feel convinced,
without
an avowal. It would be unnatural were it
otherwise
.
Our lives have been passed together, and from
infancy we have been almost as brother and sister to
each other.
As brother and sister! exclaimed Jurian, and
have I enjoyed no more than a brother's place in your
heart, while you have been the very core of minemy
brightest hope in life; my constant theme, dreaming and
waking!
Agatha became alarmed by the earnestness of his
manner. She had been taken by surprise, for although
it was not the first time that he had expressed his hopes
in her presence, she had invariably possessed sufficient
address to change the subject. This she found, at
present
,
impracticable; and overwhelmed with confusion,
she was tottering towards the rustic bench in the arbour,
when he extended his arms to support her. She
reclined
her head upon his shoulder, and scarcely
articulated
You wound me to the soul.
Then say you love me, he continued. Let me
be satisfied. Pass my doom.
After a pause, during which Agatha struggled to
control
her feelings, she raised her head. Her pale
features
were even more pallid than before, and her large
blue eyes, that shone so brilliantly at their first meeting,
were now suffused with tears, while her glossy hair
hung in disorder over her shoulders. She gazed upon
Jurian's face intently for a few moments, and then
replied
This is a dangerous subject for us to touch upon.
We have heretofore avoided it, for it can tend to no good,
and our feelings are already sufficiently laceratedit is
useless for us to irritate the wound.
Then calumny has done its work, and I have lost
the heart of Agatha. There has been malice in my
destiny from the hour of my birth, but little did I
suppose
that it would reach me in this way. The worst
shaft has been sped, and henceforward I have little
either to hope or fear.
Agatha was touched by the plaintiveness of his tone,
which, whether assumed or natural, had its effect. Well
did he know every avenue to that gentle heart, for he
had studied her character through its various changes,
and such was his address, that Agatha herself was not
aware of the extent of the influence he maintained over
her. Her mind, although naturally independent, was
as unresisting as that of a child when it came in contact
with his.
I said not, Jurian, she faintly replied, that I
gave credit to the reports circulated to your
disadvantage
.
Still you must be aware that there are such
reports
,
and it appeared strange to me, that you never
denied their truth.
Because no charge had ever been made in a
tangible
shape, replied Jurian. True, I have been called
reprobate, by old men and beldames who have just wit
enough to imagine a devil in every shadow they do not
comprehend. To answer such would be about as
profitable a task as witch-shooting in New-England.
I meant not that, replied Agatha. I spoke for
myself. My anxiety should have been satisfied.
And so it should, my Agatha, had I been aware of
its existence. But let us dismiss the subject, for since
you believe not the odious slander, I care not if fame
lend her trump to every old woman in the land to blast
my character. You have said that the reports are not
crediteda thousand thanks, dear Agatha, for that
assurance
!
Still, as you doubted, I must ask you to
breathe but a single word, that will satisfy me that you
are sincere.
Most cheerfully. Name this potent word, replied
Agatha.
Love!Say that you still love.
That I love you, replied Agatha, it can scarcely
be necessary for me to avow. My thoughts and
feelings
have ripened in your presence, and in a measure
they have been moulded by yourself. My happiest
recollections
are associated with your image, as with that
of a brother in the days of childhood; then why ask if
I still love?
Either you do not, or will not understand me,
Agatha
,
replied Jurian. It is not a sister's love that I
desire, in return for the burning thoughts that prey
upon my mind. It is not a sister's love can
repay
the years of anxiety I have passeddevotion like
mine. We have attained an age when the lambent
passion of our childhood must cease to exist. No
longer indulge the idea that we can be as brother and
sister to each other. That dream must pass away as
they daily pass in our progress through life, and it remains
for you to say whether a brighter or a darker shall
succeed
it.
Spare me. You have hurried me to the brink of
a precipice, and my brain grows dizzy as I gaze upon
it. Spare me now, Jurian.
Your doubts, I see, are not yet removed, said
Jurian, and you still believe me the creature that
slander
has depicted.
O, no! you are still the same to me as you have
been for years. You, only, have the power to change
my opinion. You, only.
Then I see it all, replied Jurian. My fears are
realized. There is another who has met with favour
in your father's eyes
But not in mine; not in mine.
Children should tread in the path of their parents,
replied Jurian, with a bitter smile, for there is no
safety for those who depart from it. Those were your
words.
Agatha sank upon the bench, and hiding her face in
her shawl to conceal her emotion, scarcely articulated,
This is cruel at your handsdoubly cruel at such
a time, and unmerited. He approached her, and
endeavoured
to soothe her feelings. Leave me, she
continued, it is time we part.
But not in anger?
No, not in anger, she murmured, but in the
bitterness
of soul, as those who yield to folly should
separate
.
VOL. I.7
Every action, every word, Agatha, said Jurian,
convinces me more fully that you love me. Your
lips have avowed it, and this trembling hand betrays
that it is so. Quiet my fears, and say that you will be
mine.
For pity's sake urge me not to that.
Then promise that no earthly power shall compel
you to bestow this hand upon another. If fate denies
me the blessing, spare me that additional pang.
I promise, murmured Agatha.
Enough! then thou shalt be mine, my Agatha, in
spite of the world. He raised her light frame to his
arms, and passionately imprinted a kiss upon her pale
forehead. He gently drew her closer to him, and she
fell unresistingly upon his bosom. Mine! only mine!
exclaimed Jurian rapturously.
Thine, and thine only, greeted his ears, in a
whisper
scarcely audible. Such is woman's resolution when
she loves! At this moment a gun was discharged close
to the arbour, upon the report of which Agatha started
from his arms, and exclaimed,
Ah! my brother. Farewell.
Do not leave me yet, said Jurian, I cannot bear
the thought of losing you the moment you have become
mine.
Absent or present, still I am thine. Farewell.
She extended her hand to him, which he eagerly pressed
to his lips, she then darted through the back part of the
arbour, and in an instant disappeared among the under
wood of the grove.
A wounded bird fell near the entrance of the arboun,
and in a few moments the sportsman ran to the spot to
secure his game. He was apparently about twenty-five
years of age, tall and well-proportioned; habited in an
undress uniform, with a sword by his side. Jurian, at
a glance, recognised the features of the person who
had accosted him at the Schuylkill ferry, as related in
a preceding chapter. Lifting the bird from the ground,
and leaning on the barrel of his gun, the stranger
exclaimed
,
with an air of satisfaction, see, Morton, I have
winged him! at the same time holding the bird at arm's
length, for his comrade to have a view of it.
You are a good shot, replied Morton, ascending
the hillock, and a true sportsman. You gave the bird
a fair chance, but unluckily it was not swift enough on
the wing.
True, replied the other, the chance was a fair
one, for I hold it barbarous to shoot at game sitting, and
he is unworthy of the name of sportsman who would
take such an advantage. But really I fear the report
of the gun has alarmed your sister, for see with what
haste she is returning to the house.
Do not be concerned on that score, replied
Morton
,
she is a girl of more spirit. There was a time
when she took delight in my amusements, and would
not have hesitated to fire the gun herself; but of late
she has assumed a more serious mood.
And really she has chosen a very romantic spot for
her meditations, added the stranger, approaching the
arbour, at the entrance of which he was met by Jurian.
Notwithstanding his astonishment, which he could not
conceal, he calmly said
Well, sir, we meet again, but from what has passed
between us, I did not think so soon to have the honour of
another interview.
I dare say you did not, replied Jurian, or you
would have been less insolent when last we met.
Quite cavalier! replied the other, his accent
betraying
his Scottish origin. Your language well
becomes
your character, for I perceive you have picked up
a sword in your late travels. But bear in mind, young
man, and his voice assumed a tone of sarcasm, it is
not the cowl that makes the monk, and it requires more
to the formation of a soldier than a gay cap and
feather.
I readily admit your position replied Jurian, and
notwithstanding that frown, will offer another
illustration
.
The ass was still an ass in spite of the
lion skin.
The sword of the fiery child of the North on the
instant
leaped from its scabbard, and Jurian coolly
followed
the example.
For shame, gentlemen, exclaimed Morton.
Such language is rude and unbecoming.
His sword is out, replied the Scot, from which
I conclude he intends to cut short all argument. It
were shame so much valour should end in smoke, so
come on, sir, and I will give you a lesson that will
mend your manners for the remainder of your life.
Well spoken, said Jurian, his lips curling with
contempt, but you appear to have forgotten the
conclusion
of the fable.
The fable! exclaimed the angry Scot, at a loss to
comprehend the coolness of his adversary.
We are told, continued Jurian, that the ass
brayed lustily, but no sooner were his ears discovered
than he ceased to alarm the forest.
This insolence is beyond endurance, cried the
Scot, placing himself in a posture of attack. Defend
yourself.
Are you mad? said Morton, interfering.
Not yet, replied the Scot, but stand out of the
way, or I may become so. Within a day or two, sir,
he continued, addressing Jurian, you honoured me
with a blow, and thus I repay it with interest.
He made a furious attack upon Jurian, who coolly
stood upon the defensive. The weapons they used
were broadswords, and the Scot, who was both active
and skilful, soon discovered that he had no novice to
deal with. The one was all fire and impetuosity, the
other cool and collected. The Scot evidently had the
advantage on the score of science, while the superior
strength and self-possession of his antagonist placed
them nearly upon a footing. The furious clashing of
their weapons denoted the determination of both. The
Scot, who had depended upon his superior skill, finding
himself so repeatedly thwarted, became more enraged
as the contest continued. His face was red as scarlet
and his eyes inflamed, which strongly contrasted with
the smile on the countenance of Jurian, who seemed
to read what was passing in the mind of his antagonist.
This self-possession did not escape the notice of the
Scot, and tended to increase his rage. He shifted his
ground, and renewed the attack with redoubled vigour.
Jurian turned to receive him as systematically as if he
had moved upon a pivot, still maintaining the ground
that he had first assumed, and acting upon the
defensive
,
as he had done from the commencement. The
clashing of the swords was loud, and the strokes
succeeded
each other with the rapidity of lightning. This
time the attack was more desperate and of longer
continuance
than before. At length the Scot, finding himself
foiled in every attempt to touch the body of Jurian,
retreated
a few paces, while his antagonist still remained
stationary, and but slightly discomposed by his exertion.
The same smile was still on his lips, that had excited
the indignation of the Scot.
Desist, Balcarras, exclaimed Morton, for by
heaven he is but playing with you.
He shall play a bloody game, replied Balcarras,
before it is ended.
Well said, Hotspur! replied Jurian, with that
provoking
smile. Shall I repeat to you another fable,
as applicable as the first? I am learned in fabulous
lore, as Morton can testify.
Still you had better listen to the fable, coolly
replied Jurian.
No more trifling, but defend yourself, exclaimed
the Scot.
You won't listen to the fable, then?
The clashing of swords was the only answer that the
question received. Balcarras appeared to have been
7*
endued with additional strength and skill. He fought
with the fury and activity of the tiger. Jurian still
maintained his ground and self-possession, but the smile
had disappeared from his lips, and his face was flushed
even to the forehead. Every muscle of his light frame
was called into action, and he stood more firmly, and
his blows were dealt with more determination. His
eye was rivetted on that of his antagonist. Morton
looked on in breathless suspense. The fight lasted
long before the fury of Balcarras abated. Still Jurian
remained
stationary, but no sooner did he perceive that the
blows of the Scot were not dealt with their usual force,
than his face became of a deeper hue, the muscles of his
mouth were drawn so as to bare his teeth, which were
firmly clenched, his eyes kindled, and he made one step
towards the Scot. He now in his turn became the
assailant, and it required all the science of Balcarras to
protect himself from a shower of blows dealt with
terrible
force and rapidity. This change in their relative
positions, in an instant altered the opinion that the Scot
had entertained of his antagonist, and he abandoned all
idea of acting on the offensive. He had been nearly
wearied out, and self-preservation was now the only
thought that occupied his mind. Jurian read what was
passing in his thoughts, and the blows fell thicker and
thicker. His face was now almost purple, his eye grew
sterner, and his teeth were still bare and clenched.
Balcarras would now have given any thing on earth to
have seen that dark countenance again illuminated by
that sarcastic smile that had provoked his ire. Even
the sound of his voice, he felt, would have rendered the
conflict less terrible. But Jurian was silent, stern,
resolved
.
He pressed forward, the Scot wavered, and
his flushed cheeks had become ashy pale, as blow
succeeded
blow, with undiminished force.
For God's sake desist, cried Morton, do not
kill the man.
His voice was lost amid the clashing of the steel.
The Scot reeled and retreated. The light frame of
Jurian seemed to brace itself for one mighty blow. He
grasped his sword with both hands, and advanced with
his weapon raised. The next instant it fell with a
fearful
crash, and Balcarras reeled beneath the blow.
Have you no mercy, cried Morton, and hastened
to the spot where they stood, but his fears were soon
quieted, for Jurian held a bladeless hilt in his hand.
Balcarras perceiving the advantage that fortune had
given him, was about to avail himself of it, as Jurian
sprang forward, and seized the uplifted arm. He took
the sword from his grasp, and hurled it into the creek
that flowed at a short distance. He held the Scot at
arm's length, as though he had been a child, and gazed
upon him in silence for a few moments, during which
his distorted countenance rapidly resumed its usual
expression. The smile also returned.
And now, my fiery Hotspur, he cried, you will
have leisure to listen to my fable.
Balcarras was astounded, and Morton exclaimed
No more of this folly!
O! by the Lord, replied Jurian, he must listen to
my fable, for there is much sound morality in sop. I
at times have questioned whether Solomon, though a
king, possessed as much practical wisdom as the
Phrygian slave. O! by all means, he must listen to
my fable.
Then let us hear it, said the Scot, sullenly, and
evincing a desire to be released from the iron grasp of
Jurian.
Listen, continued Jurian. A hungry raven once
in quest of prey, pounced upon a serpent that was
harmlessly basking in the sun. He seized him with
his horny beak, but the venomous tooth of the serpent
soon made the aggressor repent of his folly. You have
wit enough, I presume, to see the application?
Certainly; so far as respects the glossy skinned
serpent, replied Balcarras.
That I supposed could not escape you, replied
Jurian, after the practical lesson you have just
received
.
Still you will find the serpent a harmless
creature
when unprovoked, and, take my word for it, he is
but a fool, who, in obedience to the written law,
wantonly
puts his heel upon his head. Then turning to
Morton, he continued, in a more lively tone, Edward,
I beseech you to lose no time in procuring for your
friend here a copy of sop. It will make him a wiser,
and a better man. There is much sound moral in
these apologues, and if ever I form an Utopia, children
shall imbibe them with their milk. Farewell,
gentlemen
,
he cried, and his smile approached almost to a
laugh, farewell, and by all means do not neglect little
sop.
He hastily withdrew, and, until he was out of sight,
the mortified Scot stood gazing after him in mute
astonishment. Morton recalled his wandering senses,
and they returned to the mansion-house, not a little
chagrined at the unexpected termination of the
rencontre
.
Jurian hastened to the spot where he had
secured
his horse, and found the scene quite changed
during
his short absence. A detachment of British and
Hessians
had halted near the village to refresh themselves,
he accordingly kept aloof until they again took up the
line of march, when he mounted his horse and pursued
his way, equally satisfied with the result of his interview
with Agatha, and that with his rival.
CHAPTER VIII.
Every man will be thy friend,
Whilst thou hast wherewith to spend;
But if store of crowns be scant,
No man will supply thy want.
Passionate Pilgrim
.
The
success of the British arms at Brandywine,
induced
their commander to believe that another such
meeting would be fatal to the cause of American
independence
,
and accordingly he determined to bring it about
as speedily as possible. Part of the British forces in
their march from Chester, passed through Darby
village
,
and young Morton finding himself in the vicinity
of his father's house, concluded to pay a passing visit,
at the same time requesting colonel Lindsay and major
M`Druid to accompany him.
Colin Lindsay, the young and handsome earl of
Balcarras
,
had already gained a footing in the family. He
was a gentleman in his manners and personal
appearance
,
and being at the head of a noble family of
Scotland
,
possessed more pride than any one individual can
conveniently carry through life without having it
repeatedly
mortified.
Major M`Druid was a liberal minded Hibernian,
possessing
a tall and graceful person; he had entered the
army when young, and after undergoing much actual
service in the Indies, he had the unspeakable
satisfaction
,
at the age of forty-five, of being promoted to a
majority. He considered Great Britain the greatest
nation that ever existed, and was proud of his
birthright
.
He was loyal to his king and the existing
administration
,
no matter who was in, or who out, for as
he was fed by the government, he was in duty bound
to support it, without regarding the clamours of those
who wished a change.
The major had never put himself to the trouble of
investigating the right and wrong of the American
cause; this point he prudently submitted to cooler
heads than his own, and men who were liberally paid
to argue and decide upon the subject. It was the same
to M`Druid whether he served a campaign in Asia or
America, for fighting was his trade, and it remained
solely with his king to select his antagonist. If his
majesty chose a wrong one, he was to blame and not
the major, for, as he fought in obedience to the orders
of a superior, he considered himself fairly relieved from
all responsibility, provided he fought as lustily in a
wrong cause as a right one.
M`Druid from the long habit of living in camp or
garrison, had much of the roughness of the soldier
about him, though he seldom, in his most boisterous
moments, permitted his hearers to forget that he was
proud of the title of gentleman. Like most men of
his nation and profession, he was an ardent admirer of
the female sex of all ages, from fifteen to threescore;
and of all complexions, from the fair cheeked lass of
Erin's isle, to the dusky-skinned damsel of Bengal.
So she wore a petticoat, it was enough to insure the
major's respect and services. Such universal gallantry,
it must be admitted, was attended with a considerable
deal of drudgery, but like Job in the midst of his
disappointments
,
he would exclaim, man is born to
trouble
as the sparks fly upwards.
The proposition was no sooner made by young
Morton
to visit his father's house, than accepted by the
officers
.
The army had halted in the neighbourhood, and
the young men availed themselves of this opportunity,
to execute their design. Being well mounted, it
required
but a few minutes to carry them to the 'squire's
mansion, which was seated on an eminence to the west
of the village, and surrounded by the lofty oaks of the
forest. In front of the building was an extensive lawn,
around which ran the road leading to the mansion. To
the left of the lawn flowed a creek, the banks of which
were thickly covered with maple and underwood. In
this grove the arbour mentioned in the last chapter was
erected.
We shall now suppose the officers fairly arrived;
their horses transferred to the care of the trusty Jones,
and the major formally introduced to the 'squire and
his antiquated sister-in-law, Miss Rebecca Buckley.
Miss Morton was absent at the time of their arrival,
which diminished, in no slight degree, the anticipated
pleasure of colonel Lindsay. After waiting some time
for her return, Edward proposed to his young
companion
to sally forth in pursuit of her, leaving the major
to entertain the 'squire and the old lady until their
return
.
As they passed through the hall, young Morton
perceived his fowling-piece, which he took hold of, and
they directed their steps towards the oft-frequented
arbour
on the banks of the creek; not doubting that he
would find the stray one there. He was not wrong in
his supposition, as the result of the last chapter has
already made manifest to the reader.
Before we proceed, it may be proper to introduce the
reader to Miss Rebecca Buckley. She had passed her
life in single blessedness, and had now arrived at that
stage of her journey, when, if there be any truth in the
proverb, a miracle alone could save her from leading
apes in a certain place, which we will not shock the
delicacy of the reader by mentioning. Whether this is
the punishment allotted to the hard-hearted fair, we
are not at present prepared to say, but leave the point
open for discussion to more learned theologians than
we pretend to be; however, be that as it may, Miss
Rebecca, from her own showing, should in justice be
exempt from so severe an infliction, for she had done
little else than lead apes since she commenced her
peregrinations here. Like all damsels of an indefinite
age, she had had in her time, a long list of devoted suitors,
and she was as prone as the vain-glorious Macedonian
in his cups to talk over her numerous conquests.
The father of Miss Buckley had passed his life in
trade, in the stately city of Philadelphia, and had
travelled
through the various gradations of commerce, in
acquiring a fortune. He was wholly illiterate, vulgar
in his manners, and possessed of scarcely an idea,
beyond
those he gathered from Cocker's Arithmetic.
Being gradually elevated by fortune, he felt proud of
her favours; and never having heard the old proverb,
nec sutor ultra crepidam, and which he would not
have understood had he heard it; our trader began to
play a part for which nature never designed him, and
like many others in a similar situation, made himself
ridiculous. The house which was a palace to the petty
dealer of small wares, was all too small to contain the
ostentatious and purse-proud merchant:accordingly
such a building must be erected as would impress the
public with a due sense of his importance. An
expensive
equipage was purchased, and every thing
necessary
to support the outward appearance of this new
created being; but in despite of all the gifts that
fortune
had so abundantly lavished, the old gentleman
remained a striking illustration of the homely proverb,
concerning a silk purse and a sow's ear. But as gold
is the only true touchstone of a man's worth in this
world, our merchant was not only countenanced, but
caressed; his company was sought after, while his wine
sparkled, and his table groaned with sumptuous viands;
and while presiding at his board, his coarse ribaldry
was not only applauded, but universally acknowledged
to be pungent and classic wit.
Miss Rebecca was his eldest born; and as she came
to light some years before her father's affluence, her
education was such as by no means qualified her to
figure in a ball-room, among those composed of pure
porcelain. When our trader became wealthy, he
endeavoured
to remedy this defect; but as the most
skilful
lapidary cannot bestow a lasting polish on a piece
of granite, the labour of her preceptors was entirely
thrown away, for what little she retained of their
instruction
appeared like gilding upon gingerbread, or
rather rich Valenciennes lace stitched upon an Indian
blanket.
Mr. Buckley had a second daughter, who, being
several
years younger than the first, received that
instruction
at a suitable age, which her father's circumstances
had obliged him to withhold from his first-born. Her
mind, unlike that of her sister, was a fertile soil, in
which the seeds of knowledge early blossomed; and as
she took delight in cultivating her understanding, she
did not fail to reap a productive harvest. In addition
her mental accomplishments, she possessed a
fascinating
person, and a sweetness of disposition, that called
forth the respect and admiration of an extensive circle
of acquaintance. It was not long before a rumour of
her attractions reached the ears of Mr. Morton, who
at that time had just returned from England, a dashing
blade, and a star of the first magnitude in the galaxy of
fashion. He saw her; and as the merchant gave good
dinners, and imported his own wine, he saw her
repeatedly
,
although his pride occasionally took in
dudgeon
the vulgar familiarity of his host; yet, he would
say, Mark Antony lost the world for a woman, and
he is an ass who would not sacrifice a little pride for
a much finer girl than Cleopatra, and plenty of wine
in the bargain. Besides, it is the old man's humour,
and it is very hard that a man cannot have his humour,
who is both able and willing to pay for it.
As the young'squire became more thoroughly
acquainted
VOL. I.8
with the character of Miss Louisa, which was
her name, he found that what he at first considered
nothing
more than a mere
penchant
and frivolous
gallantry
,
was likely to ripen into a serious passion. He
became alarmed. He called his pride to his assistance;
but his pride positively refused to have any thing to do
in the matter. He called upon his long line of
ancestors
to instil nobler thoughts into his mind; but they
were just about of as much service to him, in this
instance
,
as a man's ancestors usually are. Finding these
appeals to avail him nothing, he determined to try what
efficacy there would be in absenting himself from the
fatal atmosphere that encircled the trader's daughter;
but unluckily this remedy, like medical prescriptions,
had the effect of heightening the disease. Having
ascertained
this fact, he sagely concluded that by
increasing
the frequency of his visits, it could not fail to have
a contrary effect. He now almost daily drank the
trader's wine, and chatted with his daughter for hours
together, and felt perfectly well, and imagined himself
rapidly recovering; but it somehow happened, before
he had pronounced himself convalescent, he had
called
a clergyman to his assistance, who by means of
a few cabalistical words, terminated his
unaccountable
disorder.
Some time after the 'squire's marriage, his
father-in-law
discovered that dame Fortune is but a slippery jade
at best; and that he whom she has once favoured, need
not expect to engross her smiles, for it is not
unfrequently
her greatest pleasure to behold those at the
bottom
of her wheel, whom once she delighted to elevate
to its summit. Our trader lived expensively, speculated
largely and injudicously, and of course was a much
shorter time in squandering his wealth than he had been
in amassing it. He was soon worth a very considerable
fortune less than nothing; and then the ephemera, who
had sported in his sunshine, vanished and left him to
enjoy
his meditations alone. Such has been the way of the
world ever since the days of Job! That patient man had
few comforters in his misery; but no sooner did the Lord
give him twice as much as he had before, than all his
brethren, and all his sisters, and all they that had been
of his acquaintance, came and feasted with him, and
comforted him, for he was able to comfort them tenfold
in return. And because the measure of his wealth was
full, every man also gave him a piece of money, and
every one an ear-ring of gold. As this is recorded in
holy writ, the present race of mortals fulfil their duty,
and most religiously emulate the example herein set by
the patriarchs. So wags the world, and so it has wagged
from the beginning, and so it will wag until time shall
be no more.
After the bankruptcy of Mr. Buckley, his
son-in-law
found out, what many discover at too late a
period
to remedy, that in marrying a wife he had married
a whole family; for as the old trader was unable to
supply
his domestic wants, this duty, in conformity with the
custom of all christian countries, devolved upon the
'squire, who submitted with as good a grace as the case
would admit. As our merchant had, during his
prosperity
,
unhappily acquired an unwholesome practice
of mixing his liquors, which practice seemed to increase
since his misfortunes, he did not favour the squire
many months with the light of his countenance. He
had just drawn the second barrel of cognac to the
lees, when, melancholy to state, he lost his relish for
drinking, and in the bitterness of disappointment,
exclaimed
with the Preacher, all is vanity,and went
out like the snuff of a candle, that glimmers in the
socket. Out of respect to his memory, the squire
wrote his epitaph, and had it chiseled on a marble
slab, deposited over his grave; but either the 'squire
was not acquainted with his character, or was not
expert
at writing puffs of this nature, for had not the
epitaph commenced in large lettersHere lies the
body of Barnabas Buckley, the devil himself would
not have found it out by the fanciful description. The
'squire, in the benevolence of his heart, had made him
sober
, which he certainly was after death;
wise
, which
by the way was also truefor if wisdom, as some
contend
,
consists in speaking seldom, he, by logical
deduction
,
must be a second Solomon who holds his
tongue for ever; pious, benevolent, charitable:in a
word, all the cardinal virtues were freely given to him,
and he was as great and good a man, if you would
credit his tombstone, as any who rotted in the
churchyard
with him.
There is nothing like a stroll through a cemetery for
elevating our estimate of the wisdom of former times;
nothing so well calculated to make us deplore the
degeneracy
of our own. We there meet with infant
prodigies
without number, and every third mound covers
the remains of a statesman, scholar or philosopher,
whose merits prove the gross defects of written history.
How much better would it be for the historian to gather
his materials from tombstones, instead of depending
upon the imperfect records of partial writers, for then,
instead of presenting us with a narrative of varied
passion
and debasing intrigue, we should have a lesson
worthy of the emulation of mankind. What a bright
page it would present to the eye of the philanthropist,
since every man necessarily becomes a saint as soon
as he has lost the power to injure his fellow man.
About two years after the death of the trader, a
prevailing
fever carried off his widow; and Mrs. Morton,
who watched the death-bed of her aged mother with
filial tenderness, unfortunately took the disorder, and
soon followed her to the grave. This bereavement
severely afflicted the 'squire, whose love and respect
for her, were rational and sincere. He had some time
previous to this, established his family at his plantation
in the vicinity of the city, and now, upon Miss Buckley
devolved the superintendence of his household
concerns
.
CHAPTER IX.
C'est une grande misere que de n'avoir pas assez d'esprit
pour bien parler, ni assez de jugement pour se taire.
La Bruyere
.
We
will now return to the visiters. They were
seated over a bottle in 'squire Morton's parlour, and as
in the simplicity of the times, it was not considered
indecorous
for females to be present when offering a
libation
to the doubly-born, Miss Buckley did not withdraw
on the appearance of the decanter and cigars. Time
has created a revolution in this respect, and the bottle
has become the signal for females to retire; a change
that proves the unclassical tone of the age, for Ovid
tells us that the Ismenian matrons celebrated the sacred
rites of Bacchus, and the daughters of Minyas alone
kept within doors. The race of the former has not
yet become extinct, though it is the fashion of the day to
imitate the example of the daughters of Minyas.
Agatha was absent. M`Druid, from his natural
gallantry
,
addressed his conversation principally to Miss
Buckley, who, delighted with such unusual attention,
became herself exceedingly loquacious. The 'squire
gave indications of nervous fretfulness whenever she
opened her lips, and his spirits became depressed as
hers were in the ascendant. They resembled the two
buckets of a well, when the one is up, the other must
of necessity be down, and they invariably gave each
8*
other a clash in passing. It has already been stated
that the 'squire was high-toned and proud, and he
considered
every remark of his sister-in-law a shaft that
threatened to bring him from his altitude.
The 'squire, having in his youth held a commission
in the army, like most old soldiers was fond of fighting
his battles over again, no matter whether they have
ever pitched a tent, or been within a day's march of an
enemy. He is a rara avis indeed, who, having marched
for a few days to the beat of a drum, does not consider
himself in after-life, entitled to be classed among the
Csars and Hannibals of old. The 'squire having
recapitulated
his military adventures, with a minuteness
of detail that vouched for his veracity, the major
commenced
with his campaigns, to which Miss Rebecca
listened with marked attention. At the first pause in
his narrative, she remarked
I have often thought, major, that a military life
must possess charms, that no one but a soldier is
permitted
to dream of.
True, madam, there are many pleasures in a
soldier's
life, but then it is by no means exempt from care.
And the greatest is that which springs from
ambition
,
replied Miss Buckley. Military men are too
frequently like Don Quixote, who, having conquered
the world, sat down and sighed that he had no more
worlds to conquer.
The major bowed, and smiled assent. The 'squire
drew a long breath between his teeth, and rubbed his
leg, as if he felt a twinge of the gout, but the
signal
,
though perfectly understood by the spinster, was
unregarded. She continued
And then to be immortalized, major! To have
your name descend with those of Pygmalion, Thomas
Kempis, and other Roman heroes, is a temptation
that few can resist.
There is something in that, I must confess,
madam
,
replied M`Druid.
Not barely something, but very much, major, I
assure
you. Do you remember the words of Julius Csar
to the pilot, when crossing the Black Sea? Do you
remember the words of Ossian when he mounted the
walls of Troy?
I am ashamed to say they have escaped me,
replied
the major, bowing gravely, and the 'squire seemed
to have another twinge of his old complaint. He did not
relish the display of his sister-in-law's historical
knowledge
,
which, though not in strict accordance with
received
opinions, was possibly quite as accurate as a great
portion of that which is gravely laid down for truth, and
certainly answered her purpose quite as well. She was
about to resume the subject, when the 'squire hastily
interrupted her
Fill up, major. Here is a bottle of such wine as
you have not tasted since you set foot on the new
world. I will give you a toast too that would render
even bad wine palatable. Long life to George the
Third, and a speedy death to rebellion.
The toast went round, and the major pronounced it
the best glass of wine he had tasted since he left Bengal,
and the toast such a one as would justify any loyal
subject
in getting tipsy in drinking.
For shame of you to utter such a sentiment!
exclaimed
Miss Buckley, again opening her battery. Do
we not read in the works of Cornelius Agrippa that the
ancient Egyptians exposed their slaves in a state of
intoxication
,
to deter their children from so shocking a
vice. For shame, major! another such sentiment, and
I blot you from my books for ever!
Under so severe a penalty, I must remain as dumb
as an oyster, replied the major.
I wish to the Lord she would imitate your example,
mumured the 'squire. But what ails Balcarras?
His wine remains untouched, and he is as silent as one
of the brotherhood of La Trappe.
The earl had not opened his lips since he entered
the room, unless in reply to some question directly
proposed
.
Young Morton had also been unusually sparing
of his words.
His thoughts are on the other side of the water, no
doubt, replied Miss Rebecca, for we are told that
even the pious Nero in his exile
Curse the pious Nero! ejaculated the 'squire to
himself. Come, Lindsay, take your glass. I'll drink
to the subject of your meditations. You will join us,
Edward.
The young men exchanged significant glances, that
betrayed that the toast had turned the wine to
worm-wood
.
They however touched the glasses with their
lips.
Have you seen your sister since your arrival,
Edward
?
But for a moment, sir, at distance.
Where can the little puss be? It is strange that
she should be absent at such a time. She is a wild
girl, major, but such as she is, I have reason to be
proud of her. If she had received the advantage of
an European education, she would have been fit for the
office of first lady of the bed-chamber.
Can you inform me, major, what are the exact
duties
attached to that office? demanded the spinster.
I must protest my ignorance, replied the major,
but if they are within the compass of an Irish
gentleman
to perform, I should be proud to hold the office,
after throwing up my present commission. There is
no post in the gift of his majesty that so forcibly strikes
my fancy.
You, major! exclaimed the spinster, it would be
altogether out of character.
Pardon me, madam, perfectly in character, and the
very post for an Irish gentleman.
Though the young men had scarcely tasted their
wine, M`Druid had not been idle, and his fancy was
becoming luxuriant. Miss Rebecca blushed slightly,
and continued
There was an office among the Chaldeans of old
Becky, my dear, cried the 'squire, I really think
this wine cannot be from the anno domini '65.
Yes, sir, it is.
I cannot taste the nut, continued the 'squire,
sipping
at his glass. I fear Tom has made some
mistake
.
The wine is hardly mellow, and the flavour of
the nut scarcely perceptible.
There is no mistake, I assure you, sir. I selected
the wine with my own hands.
Your palate is certainly treacherous, said M`Druid,
for king David himself never drank better liquor than
this.
There was an office, major, among the ancient
Chaldeans
That woman would talk to the end of Plato's year,
and still have something to say! muttered the 'squire.
Becky, do, pray, see whether Agatha has returned.
She will be sadly disappointed if Edward is obliged to
depart without seeing her.
The spinster rose, and dropping a deep curtsey to
the major, withdrew. The 'squire appeared to breathe
a freer air in her absence.
The severe rebuff that the rebels have met with at
the Brandywine, he continued, will doubtless, major,
put a speedy close to this unrighteous rebellion.
Therein we differ in opinion, replied M`Druid,
there is but one way to put a close to it, that occurs
to me from present appearances.
And that way is
For his majesty's troops to embark again for
England
,
for by my faith it is clear that as long as we
remain
the rebellion will continue.
How can that be if you have sufficient force to
conquer the malcontents?
Och! by St. Patrick, that business of conquering
I have always looked upon as the least part of the
affair. It is nothing more than the beginning of the
work.
Why, what more is to be done when they are once
conquered?
We must make them stay conquered, replied the
major.
You certainly magnify the difficulty, major. What
can a handful of undisciplined yeomen do, badly armed,
poorly clad, and worse fed, against professional soldiers
and scientific commanders?
More than we shall find stomachs to digest, and
the reason is a plain one. You call us professional
soldiers, and of course we fight for pay;our enemies
fight for their homes, and in such a cause, we are told,
`even the dove will peck the estridge.' We may
scoff at them and call them ragged rascals, but I have
seen some service in my time, and by the powers I
have never yet discovered that a man fights the worse
for having an old coat upon his back.
Why, major, you would lead one to suppose that the
atmosphere of America has already tainted your
politics
.
It is a bracing atmosphere, I confess, and suits my
constitution, replied the major, but as to my politics,
I always leave them in the keeping of the ministry,
though I cannot help having a little bit of an opinion of
my own.
Agatha now entered the room, accompanied by her
aunt, and Balcarras, who had for some time preferred
his own reflections to conversation, assumed a more
cheerful aspect on her appearance.
Agatha, my girl, cried the 'squire as she entered,
we have been expecting you impatiently. Make the
king's soldiers welcome, and show your loyalty.
She embraced her brother, and coldly acknowledged
the presence of Balcarras. The earl belonged to that
numerous class who believe that in love affairs they
should use the same brevity of despatch that the first
Csar did in his victories. Three words and the
business
is settled. He was a libertine in his principles,
and such men are too prone to suppose that the women
of all foreign climes must, on the first attack, surrender
at discretion. It is but to shake the tree and the fruit
must fall. Women are quick at reading characters of
this description, and Agatha already knew the earl as
thoroughly as if she had been acquainted with him for
years. M`Druid was formally introduced to her, and
his good natured countenance brightened in a manner
that proved he was more than repaid for the drudgery
he had undergone for an hour past in entertaining Miss
Buckley.
Where have you been, my little fawn? said the
'squire, addressing his daughter.
Walking, sir, replied Agatha.
You have become fond of that recreation of late,
continued the other, but curiosity to see the victorious
army of the king as it approached the village, I suppose
attracted you abroad. It was a glorious and gratifying
sight, and curiosity in this instance is perfectly
excusable
.
When Orestes took his triumph, the people of
Rome Miss Rebecca had proceeded thus far when
the 'squire interrupted her
But, my little fawn, lightfooted as you are, you
should not have ventured out alone.
I am astonished that Miss Morton could have
committed
an act of such imprudence at a time when
stragglers
are abroad, observed Balcarras, in a tone that
conveyed more meaning to Agatha than to the rest of
the company.
The caution is well-timed, replied Agatha, and
comes with a good grace from one who has experienced
the danger of venturing abroad unprotected.
The latter part of this speech was intended for the ear
of Balcarras alone. He bit his lips and made no reply.
I am glad you have come, Agatha, said the 'squire,
for the colonel appears to have found the use of his
tongue again. Pray, have you had it in your keeping?
O no, sir; a single tongue is enough for any woman
to take care of, and sometimes more than she can well
manage, replied Agatha. Do you not think so,
colonel?
I will not presume to contradict the opinion.
Civil creature!
Miss Buckley had reseated herself near M`Druid,
and again commenced
The barbarous custom among the Goths and the
Vandals, of prohibiting women the use of speechThe
'squire became quite nervous at the sound of her voice,
and for the purpose of checking the stream of
erudition
,
said to Agatha
Come, my little humming-bird, rally his grace into
a good humour, for he has been as silent as an unfeed
advocate for this hour past.
I must know the cause of his disease, sir, before I
attempt a cure.
You are a timid practitioner; replied the 'squire.
Possibly he has been struck by the wand of some
magician. There was a time when they abounded in
this neighbourhood, and a few are still remaining.
Then I will lay my life he has been struck with the
wand of a magician, replied Agatha, archly.
Captain Morton, it is time for us to take our leave,
exclaimed Balcarras, I hear the bugle.
Talking of magicians, major, there was a custom
among the ancient Chaldeans
Miss Buckley was again interrupted by the sound of
martial instruments which announced to the visitors
that the army was preparing to march. The officers
made a hasty obeisance and left the room, but it was
not without regret that M`Druid took leave of the anno
domini '65. When they had closed the door the 'squire
began
My dear Becky, you talk too much. I will allow
that you talk very well, but then you talk too much.
Bless me, brother, you will allow me to entertain
your guests?
Certainly, but in doing it you should not depart from
the rule of your favourite ancients. They were
satisfied
to instil wisdom drop by drop, but you are for
plunging us head over heels into the ocean at once.
No man can stand that, Becky, and it is unreasonable
to expect it.
A man of sense, brother, will avail himself of every
opportunity of improvement.
Improvement!Now, Becky, though you have a
vast fund of erudition, you must be conscious that it is
as ill assorted as the lumber-room in our garret, and
that you could as readily find an article there at
midnight
,
as an appropriate subject in your upper-story.
You have disposed of nothing in its proper place, but
have continued heaping one thing upon another until all
is in a state of utter confusion.
I never expect that you will do me justice,
brother
.
I am disposed to do you every justice. If you
were only half as learned, you would be twice as wise.
But, Becky, how can you expect me to keep my
patience
when I hear you begin that infernal story of the
ancient Chaldeans. You know I attributed my last fit
of gout to that story, and yet you still persist. It
always
makes me as nervous as an aspen-tree. If you
have any bowels, Becky
O, brother!
Then for the love of heaven let this be the last I
shall hear of the ancient Chaldeans. By the agony
that I have endured I conjure you to forget that there
ever was such a race of people. They have for
centuries
been buried, and I beseech you not to disturb
their ashes.
Your wishes shall certainly be obeyed, brother, but
VOL. I.9
I should be pleased to know what subjects I may touch
upon without offence.
You may talk of the Romans, the Spartans,
Lilliputians
,
and the Brobdingnags,I care not what, so I
hear nothing more of the customs of the ancient
Chaldeans
.
And yet, brother, you appeared a little irritable
when I alluded to the triumphal entry of Orestes into
Rome.
Why that story also, Becky, has a tendency to
discompose
my nerves. You would particularly oblige
me if you would drop Orestes also.
I perceived the same irritability when I mentioned
Don Quixote and Thomas  Kempis. What objection
pray, have you to them.
None in the world. They were both very clever
fellows in their way, but then you are forever bringing
them into such damned strange company, that I should
esteem it an especial favour if you would drop their
acquaintance also, and let them rest with the ancient
Chaldeans.
I cannot give up that point, brother, for I perceive
you would not leave me a single topic to converse
about.
Jones now brought the horses belonging to the
officers
to the front of the house. When mounting, a
brief dialogue passed between young Morton and the
rustic:
Have you delivered my letter to Mr. Hartfield?
I have, sir.
Any answer?
None.
Well; no matter. He remained absorbed in
thought for a few moments. His companions were
already
mounted. Jones!
Sir! Young Morton still appeared to be
revolving
some subject in his mind, and evidently became
more perplexed the longer he reflected.
The van of the army is in motion, cried M`Druid;
and as he spoke the flags and forest of bayonets might
be seen bristling above the hill, and full bands of
various
instruments, filled the air with spirit-stirring notes.
We shall overstay our time, exclaimed Balcarras.
One moment, and I am at your service,
gentlemen
,
said Morton. He then muttered to himself
It is useless to hesitate; I have pledged myself to
accomplish it, and it shall be done. The time may
arrive
when he will thank me for it. Then addressing
the rustic, he continuedJones, I am fully aware
that you are possessed of considerable address, and I
now find it necessary to put it to the trial.
You are disposed to flatter, sir, replied the other,
but command me, and if I fail it shall not be for the
want of inclination to do my duty.
The matter is of some moment, said Morton,
and if you are successful you may depend upon
being
amply rewarded for your services. Let me see you
to-morrow. Do not fail. Diligence and secrecy are
all I exact of you. He turned his horse, and dashed
his spurs into his flank, and as the spirited animal
darted off, Morton cried aloud to Jones,
Remember
.
M`Druid and the earl followed, and they arrived
at the village before the rear of the army had taken
up its line of march.
CHAPTER X.
The watch was set, the night round made,
All mandates issued and obeyed;
And the deep silence was unbroke,
Save where the watch his signal spoke,
Save where the steed neigh'd oft and shrill,
And echo answer'd from the hill.
Byron
.
The
affair at Brandywine having terminated
unfavourably
to the American cause, Washington was
impatient
to redeem whatever credit may have been lost,
and on the other hand, the British troops, flushed with
success, and relying on their superior force and
discipline
,
were equally eager for a second meeting. The
British general flattered himself that another
battle
would be so decisive that it would be unnecessary
to spill another drop of rebel blood in order to subdue
the colonies to their former allegiance.
A few days after the American forces evacuated
Philadelphia, they encamped upon the highlands
extending
from Valley Forge towards the Yellow Springs.
The ground was difficult of access, yet being of easy
descent, it was favourable for partial actions, without
admitting of a decisive blow.
General Wayne, with a corps of fifteen hundred
men, was in the rear of sir William Howe, from which
advantageous position of the continental army, it was
supposed that in case the enemy should attempt to
cross the Schuylkill, he would be obliged to fight the
Americans on their own terms, and be so crippled in
the conflict, that he would not venture to take
possession
of Philadelphia.
We shall now leave the main body safely encamped
upon the heights, and turn to that section of the army
to which captain Swain and his company were at this
period attached. He was under the command of
general
Wayne, who, as just observed, was in the rear of
the British forces, and on the night of the 21st of
September
,
he was lying in a woods with his corps of
veterans
.
Numerous fires were lighted by the soldiers,
for neither their tents nor apparel were suited to the
season. Reader, imagine a night as dark as Erebus;
the watch set; the general and officers in their
respective
marquees, dreaming of victory and the
emancipation
of their country; the weary soldiers stretched on
the bare earth before their watch-fires, and others
slumbering in their miserable and uncomfortable tents;
imagine the silence of the camp interrupted alone by
the hard breathing of the sleeper; the regular tread of
the sentinel on his post, and the buz that proceeds from
an occasional group, who being indisposed to sleep,
rebuild
the fire, and strive to while away the night, with
speculations upon the result of the morrow, or
comments
on the events of the past. Imagine this, and
just enough more to make a perfect picture of an
encampment
of harassed soldiers at the dead of night
soldiers who were striving not only to emancipate their
native land, but to revolutionize the human mind. If
you will do this, gentle reader, I have no doubt you will
do it to your own satisfaction, and spare me the
mortification
of failing in the attempt to convey an
intelligible
picture to your imagination.
Captain Swain had been selected as the officer of the
night, and M`Crea offered to keep his old friend
company
in his tent, while upon his tour of duty. Shortly
after the first watch, the conversation began to flag, and
the captain appeared to be wrapped in a brownstudy,
which lasted for ten minutes.
9*
What are you thinking about? demanded the
surgeon
,
who perceived by his countenance that he had
got hold of a subject that he could not master.
There is one particular respecting my illustrious
ancestor, replied the captain, that I am unable to
establish, notwithstanding patient and laborious
research
,
during my intervals of leisure, for the last forty
years. Historians disagree on the subject, and I fear
I shall die without clearing up the doubt. It is whether
the lord of Passaiung actually had a wooden leg or not.
It has been boldly asserted that he was lame, and as
boldly denied, in which case how is it possible to arrive
at a fair conclusion on this important point?
We must reason from the premises, replied
M`Crea.
Well, doctor, you have much book-learning, said
the captain, and I should like to hear your argument.
I promise you the finest bullock in my meadows if you
satisfy my doubts.
Well, then, continued M`Crea, it is admitted on
all hands that Peter Stuyvesant was lame, and wore a
wooden leg?
Yes, lame as a duck, replied the captain.
It is also admitted that he conquered the Fort of
the Holy Trinity, while under the command of Sven
Schute.
Yes, it is so recorded, and the historians do not
disagree on that point, replied the captain, in a serious
tone.
Then the difficulty resolves itself to this position.
Could a lame Dutchman with a wooden leg, conquer a
Swede in the full enjoyment of all his members?
Never! exclaimed the captain, starting from his
seat, you have settled a point in half a minute that
has bothered my brains for half a century. The bullock
is yours. Zounds, I should not be astonished, if in
addition
to the loss of a leg, he had lost his right arm also.
In looking through history, we find numberless
historic
doubts, of equal importance, as gravely discussed,
but by no means as satisfactorily settled.
Whenever the captain broached the affair at Fort
Casimer, though naturally a taciturn man, he was prone
to become loquacious. He considered it the most
brilliant
defence to be found in the records of history, and in
comparison with it the conduct of Leonidas at the pass of
Thermopyl or the self-devotion of Arnold of
Winkelreid
sank into insignificance. We say, whenever he
broached this subject he was disposed to run it to the
dregs. A second fit of absence came over him.
What are you ruminating about now? demanded
the surgeon.
I have been thinking, my friend, replied the
captain
,
what must have been the feelings of that
illustrious
warrior from whom it is my pride to be descended,
when he beheld the flag of Stuyvesant, floating above
the walls over which the Swedish flag had lately
flaunted!
Much the same as those of Jugurtha, I suppose,
replied the surgeon, when led captive through the
streets of Rome.
I have searched Campanius and Arfswedson,
continued
the captain, to learn how he conducted
himself
during this reverse of fortune, but those historians
are by no means satisfactory in their details. As you
have so ably cleared up the doubt respecting his wooden
leg, I make no question that with a little trouble you
could satisfy me on this subject also.
I will investigate the point, said the surgeon.
Arfswedson, it is true, continued the captain,
would have us believe that he tamely capitulated
without striking a blow, and that he signed the
capitulation
on board of Stuyvesant's flag ship. That he
suffered the whole fleet to pass the fort without as much
as firing a gun, and other circumstances derogatory to
the immortal Sven. Libellous reptile, thus to traduce
the character of the ablest soldier that has yet appeared
in the world.
Keep your temper, said the surgeon.
Of what avail is a life of public service! Of what
consequence the most brilliant exploits, since an
envious
dunce with the scratch of a pen may pervert the
whole tenor of a man's existence.
True, replied M`Crea, there are many who died
for the public good, and yet are stigmatized as traitors,
while others who lived but to plunder the public treasury
are canonized for their patriotism and public services.
In every camp, replied the captain, there are
some to fight the battles, and others to run off with the
spoil; and the rascals, in this instance, would even
steal the laurels from the brows of my ancestor.
Their conversation was interrupted by the approach
of a soldier, who halted at the entrance of the tent, and
assumed a military position, his heels together, and his
long arms close to his sides. This apparition, who
stood in the full blaze of the watch-fire, remained
speechless, until addressed by his captain
Well, sergeant, how wears the watch?
All's well, replied the sergeant, and remained
stationary
.
Sergeant Talman was a man of few words, but it
must not be inferred from this that he was a man of
few ideas also, though he was a single-minded man.
There was only sufficient space in his brain for one
idea at a time, and he seldom employed many words to
give it birth. He was an exception to the general rule,
that those who think least talk most.
The sergeant was at least six feet in height, and his
lank body had been so carelessly joined to his lower
members, that they formed an obtuse angle, which
defied
the most rigid military discipline ever to extend to
a straight line. His long chin, however, he held erect,
by way of example to that more obstinate portion of his
person. His head seldom moved either to the right or
left, and he was never known to smile, though his
countenance
constantly bespoke perfect satisfaction with all
the world, notwithstanding his huge military whiskers.
Smiles are the effect of association of ideas, and as the
sergeant never had more than one at a time, his risible
muscles led a life of idleness.
Have you no report to make, sergeant? demanded
the captain.
None, sir, replied the sergeant, touching his cap.
Then what brings you from your post before the
expiration of the watch?
Brings me! nothing brings me. I came of my own
accord.
But why come at all, if you have nothing to say?
I have something to say. I have brought a
straggler
.
From the enemy? demanded the captain.
Not from the enemy, replied the taciturn
sergeant
,
and came to a dead pause.
Zounds! go on, exclaimed the captain. You
are like a pump without a handle; there is no getting
any thing out of you.
Mauns Talman was descended from one of the
heroes
of Fort Casimer, on which account captain Swain
not only tolerated his peculiarities, but looked upon him
as one of the best soldiers in his corps. He
particularly
admired his military appearance and cast of mind,
and frequently protested that he was the only true
sample
remaining of the primitive Swedes.
Go on with your story, Mauns. Go on with your
story, said the captain, impatiently.
What story, sir? demanded the single-minded
sergeant
.
I was telling no story, that I remember.
The straggler you spoke of! Where is he, and what
of him?
O! true, sir. Master Jurian has arrived at camp,
replied the sergeant, and I came to show him the way
to your quarters. That is all. I had well nigh forgot
my errand.
Jurian now appeared. Talman demanded of the
captain whether he had any further orders, and being
answered in the negative, touched his cap, turned on
his heel, and silently stalked off in the direction he had
come.
What a fine military walk! exclaimed the captain,
gazing after him. I am not astonished that honest
Sven performed such exploits of noble daring, with an
army of such men at his command. Come in, Jurian,
and be seated. Welcome to camp, my boy. Jurian
entered and was greeted by M`Crea. The captain
continued
The
doctor and myself have been discussing
an important historical subject, and as you are familiar
with these matters, I should be pleased to know what
you consider the most striking picture that history
presents
?
Really, sir, replied Jurian, they are so various
that it is difficult to make a selection.
Then name a few of the many, and we will choose
for you.
The return of the exiled Camillus to Rome,
continued
Jurian, at the instant they were weighing the
gold to ransom the city, produced on my mind a vivid
impression. The haughty and insulting deportment
of the barbarian who had thrown his arms into the scale,
is finely contrasted with the calm determination of the
Roman, who, in the emergency, possessed sufficient
presence of mind to recollect the extent of his
prerogative
,
obtained by his newly conferred dignities.
Certainly a striking picture, replied the captain,
but the quibbling of Camillus rather belonged to a
court of justice than the field of battle.
Perhaps so, continued Jurian. I will then
instance
the death of Socrates, or that of Seneca, who
with his own hands opened his veins, and calmly
philosophized
while the fountain of life was draining.
An unnatural picture, replied M`Crea. The
heathen who had formed his ideas of a future state
from his enjoyments here, and clothed his gods with
sensual appetites more degrading than his own, might
die with the calmness of a stoic philosopher. But since
new light has blazed upon the world, he must be more
than man to whom death appears divested of his
terrors
.
The death of the veteran Dentatus, who, placing
his back against a rock, with his single arm kept the
host of murderers at bay until they ascended the
precipice
and cast stones upon him, appears to me a much
grander picture than that of your philosopher.
The reason of your partiality is plain, replied
Jurian
;
you are disciples of the same school.
How can you make that appear? demanded the
surgeon.
He also studied the prolongation of human life,
replied Jurian, though his theory differed
somewhat
from your own.
But why draw all your examples from Roman
history
,
demanded the captain. The world is wide
enough; there is no necessity to confine yourself to
that patch of ground.
Then let us cross the Atlantic, replied Jurian.
Ay, come to the new world, boy, exclaimed the
captain, there is a field worthy of investigation.
What think you then, sir, continued Jurian, of
the fortitude of the Mexican, while extended on a bed
of burning coals, by the order of Cortes, to compel
him to discover hidden treasures. His reply to one of
his countrymen, who uttered loud lamentations, while
undergoing similar tortures, speaks his character at
once, and for severity of reproof and laconic brevity,
is not surpassed by any thing of the kind in the annals
of polished Greece or Rome, even at those periods
when they studied to be laconic`Do I repose upon a
bed of roses?'
A smart reply, said the captain, evidently
disappointed
,
but rather too poetical for the occasion.
Did you ever read Arfswedson, my boy?
Never, sir, replied Jurian.
Nor Campanius?
I do not recollect to have heard of him. Who
was he, pray?
You may talk of your Tacitus, Herodotus, your
Plinys, and your Plutarchs, continued the captain,
but after all, Campanius is the only true model of a
historian. True, the magnitude of his subject may
have elevated his style, but the circumstance of
selecting
a theme worthy of his talents, rather enhances
than detracts from his merit.
The captain had always entertained a high respect
for the literary attainments of Jurian, but this
confession
convinced him that there was still ample room in
his storehouse for a vast deal more lumber.
You have presented several pictures, continued
the captain, but as none of them are to my taste, I
will take the brush in my own hand and paint what I
have often witnessed. O! it was a joyful scene, some
forty years ago, of a sabbath morning in spring, to
behold
the countless canoes on the Delaware approaching
the stately church at Wicaco, each well freighted with
buxom girls, dressed in their short round jackets and
homespun petticoats. Among the group assembled at
the church door you might here and there see a
venerable
Swede, who still retaining a partiality for the
primitive
costume of the province, was clad in his
calfskin
vest and jacket, tanned with the hair on, and
buckskin
breeches. His venerable locks surmounted by a
little cap with a flap before it. It was a picture more
impressive and beautiful than any thing that after-life
has presented.
Such is usually the case with the scenes of
boyhood
,
replied M`Crea.
And in those days, continued the captain, it was
a joyful thing to go to a Swedish wedding. Their light
cedar canoes were invariably launched, and a whole
fleet would paddle off merrily together. You may talk
of your gondolas at Venice and your moonlight scenes,
but they are no more to be compared to a Swedish
wedding in former times than I am to the hero of Fort
Casimer.
You say, sir, they always went in their boats,
replied
Jurian, but how if there were no communication
by water?
Zounds, they would find water, and without witch
hazel, too! exclaimed the captain. Your true Swede
would rather travel five miles in a boat than one by
land, and between the Delaware and Schuylkill it were
hard, indeed, if he could not indulge his propensity.
They seldom used horse-flesh where nature's own
highway would answer. They were a happy and
simple
race of people. Instead of the abominable plant
that has created so much bloodshed among us, they
made tea of our native sassafras, and from the
persimon-tree
they had the ingenuity to extract both beer
and brandy.
The devil's own decoction, no doubt, replied
M`Crea. He has kept the whole world brewing
poisons
since the time Eve pressed the apple.
Now tell me, exclaimed the captain, with an air
of triumph, and without noticing the interruption,
whether the homely picture I have roughly sketched,
is not worth a whole gallery full of your horrible
designs
of men bleeding to death, or composedly making
poetry while roasting on living coals?
I must confess that it is a more agreeable picture,
by far, replied Jurian, and one altogether new to
me.
I knew it would be, replied the captain. You
must read Campanius, and the scientific travels of
professor
Kalm, and you will find much equally novel and
instructive. You should blush, in the midst of all your
knowledge, to betray such shameful ignorance of the
history of your own country.
The conversation now took a different turn, M`Crea
VOL.I.10
rated Jurian for having left him so unceremoniously a
few days before, and concluded his lecture by asking
what had become of the sword with which he had been
furnished.
It was a treacherous blade, replied Jurian, and
failed me upon the first trial.
The devil! have you been at work already!
exclaimed
M`Crea.
And his sword failed him! cried the captain,
betraying
the deep interest he felt. Satisfy me of one
point, my boy, you have not been disgraced?
The conflict, sir, was between man and man, and
you see me here, replied Jurian.
Enough! continued the captain, I do not ask to
know your quarrel, but should another arm be wanting
before it ends, you know to whom you are in duty
bound first to apply.
Thanks, my generous benefactor, replied Jurian,
grasping him by the hand.
Old as I am, continued the captain, I would
not begrudge to spill a little of the best blood of honest
Sven in any quarrel of yours.
No quarrel of mine, I hope, sir, shall ever be
vindicated
by blood so precious to me, replied Jurian, and
again pressed the old man's hand. I am weary, sir,
and would sleep if possible. Is their room in your tent
for me?
Ample, my son, and a blanket to spare, too. He
handed a blanket to Jurian, who, wrapping it around
his body, threw himself upon the bed of straw. M`Crea
prepared to follow the example. The captain
continued
This is the first night that you have lain in a tent,
Jurian. A harder bed than you have been
accustomed
to, but that is no reason that your slumbers may not
be refreshing and sweet.
Fatigue may make them so. Good night.
Good night, and heaven bless you, my boy.
M`Crea threw himself on the straw beside Jurian;
and in a few minutes the hard breathing of the sleepers
saluted the ears of captain Swain, as he sat at the
entrance
of the tent contemplating the fitful blaze of the
watch-fire.
CHAPTER XI.
From the vale
See they come!And will ye quail?
Leaden rain and iron hail
Let their welcome be!
Pierpont
.
Captain Swain
had continued his solitary watch for
several hours. The fire in front of his tent had nearly
burnt down, and the smouldering embers by fits sent
forth a vivid glare, and then sunk into darkness again.
He had watched it gradually mouldering away for some
time, before he arose to replenish it. He was a man of
the kindliest feelings, and his thoughts were at his
home. The dead silence of night maintains a magic
influence over the human mind, and at that solemn
hour it appears to be a different essence from that with
which we are animated during the day, surrounded by
the bustle of the world. The good become better, and
the evil perhaps more prone to sin.
The noise made by captain Swain in rebuilding the
fire, roused the attention of Jurian, who arose and
came forward, shivering with cold.
Why you tremble, my son, said the captain, as
the young man spread himself before the blaze.
A man needs must shake, replied Jurian,
When all around the wind doth blow,
And coughing drowns the parson's saw,
And birds sit brooding in the snow,
And Marian's nose looks red and raw.
And this, sir, is a frost to make any one's nose look all
the colours of the rainbow.
That I'll swear to, exclaimed M`Crea, crawling
from the tent, his head swathed in half a dozen
night-caps
,
and his apparel in greater disorder than usual.
He drew nigh to the fire, and presented rather a
ludicrous
figure as the light glared full upon him. I
must thaw myself, or I shall soon become as torpid as
a swallow in December.
We have reason to pray for another brush with the
enemy, observed the captain, in order to put our
lazy blood in circulation.
That would make it circulate with a vengeance,
rejoined the man of the lancet, but I am not for that
sport, although I have shed more blood in my time than
any three men in the service.
And as fatally, too, replied Jurian, laughing.
Your wit is as stale as the last rations that were
dealt out to us, replied M`Crea.
An officer, who for some time was seen rebuilding
another fire at a short distance from them, now
approached
.
A bleak night, this, captain Graham, said Swain
to him, as he drew nigh the fire.
And to me it has been a sleepless one, replied
Graham. How goes the watch?
All's well.
Have the pickets been relieved? demanded
Graham.
An hour since, replied the other, at which time
all was quiet.
I know not why it is, replied Graham, strange
forebodings of ill have taken possession of my mind.
I can account for it very readily, replied M`Crea;
you supped too luxuriously on your last rations, and
now would frighten us with spectres generated by
gluttony
.
You may have your jest, surgeon, continued
10*
Graham, but groundless as my apprehensions
appear, even to myself, such is their influence, that
I would beat to arms without a moment's loss of time,
had I the command.
Sleep will do the poor fellows more good, captain,
than a midnight review, replied M`Crea.
How silent the camp is, continued Graham. No
grave-yard could be more silent.
It is the hour when sleep is deepest, said the
surgeon
.
The neighing of horses in different parts of the
camp now broke the dead silence, and a sound like the
rushing of the winds was heard.
Did you hear that! demanded Graham.
I did, exclaimed M`Crea. It was but the
moaning
of an autumn breeze through the wood.
And hark, the horses are neighing! They
recognize
the sound. It is more than an autumn blast, I
promise
you, said Graham.
Look over the camp, said captain Swain. Do
you see any portion of it in motion?
Not as much as a corporal's guard, replied
Graham
.
That sound again!all is not right! exclaimed
Swain.
As they stood listening with the deepest attention,
a haggard figure suddenly appeared before them. He
stood in the full glare of the blaze, and for a few
moments
he remained silent, those who beheld him
doubted
whether he was a human or supernatural being.
He was bare-headed, and his grizzled hair, which
extended
down to his shoulders, hung in confusion about
his face. He raised his hands to part it over his
forehead
,
and then extended his arms towards the group
around the watch-fire. An Indian blanket covered his
attenuated form. He paused to recover breath, and
then shouted in a voice of thunder:
Awake! the Philistines are at hand. Awake!
and gird on the sword and shield, or ye will sleep the
everlasting sleep!
He hurried away and disappeared as suddenly as he
had appeared. The group looked at each other in
consternation, while the wild cry of the mysterious
visitant
still echoed through the silent camp, awake,
awake! A moment after, and a sentinel rushed in
breathless, and exclaimed
The pickets have been forced. The enemy is in
the camp. A shot was now fired, and the sound of a
tumult in the northern part of the encampment was
heard.
Beat to arms, cried captain Swain, and the hollow
sound of the drum broke the deep silence of the night.
The camp was now in motion, and a mass of soldiers
was seen by the glimmer of the watch-fires to approach
the spot where captain Swain and his friends were
stationed
.
The muskets of the approaching soldiers
glimmered in the light.
Behold they come! How silently they move on,
exclaimed Graham, butchering our sleeping comrades
with their bayonets.
Let the full band play. Swell a strain that would
rouse the dead, cried Swain to the musicians, and his
command was succeeded by a wild blast of soul-stirring
music. The enemy still moved on in silence, and by
stealth, like the midnight assassin, the watch-fires
serving
to guide them to the bosoms of their sleeping
victims
.
Fly to the quarters of general Wayne, continued
the old captain, addressing the sentinel, and tell him
what has occurred. The sentinel was out of sight in
an instant, and Graham left the spot to awaken and
marshal his company. Mauns Talman now rushed in
bloody, and fell at the feet of his captain.
Mauns, you are bleeding! How is this?
A gash in the back, sir. Tickled in my sleep with
a bayonet, that's all. He writhed on the ground with
pain, and his captain stooped to raise him, and sighed
My poor Mauns, and must I lose you?
Lose me! no sir, I will keep close to your side,
replied the single-minded Mauns.
My brave fellow! Sound your music there; louder,
louder yet! Surgeon, look to his wound. M`Crea bent
down to examine it.
Raise my scarf, doctor, said Talman, and bind
it tight around the wound to staunch the blood. With
a little care I will be a whole man again. M`Crea
took one of his night-caps off, and bound it with the
scarf over the wound, remarking that he was a
hole
man, indeed. The wretched pun was beyond the
comprehension
of honest Mauns, who accordingly made no
reply.
How do you feel now? demanded the surgeon,
having staunched the wound.
A little faint still, but much better. I can take my
station, and I see the line of the Darby boys is already
formed. Saying which he moved off to join his
company
.
The enemy had thus far approached in silence, but
now they sent forth a savage yell that was answered
from all parts of the camp, which proved that their
murderous plan had been completely successful. The
half torpid and affrighted Americans might now be seen
by the feeble light of the fires, flying in all directions,
pursued by the foe, and some just starting from their
sleep, were bayoneted to death before they were fully
awake to what was passing. All was hurry and
confusion
.
Give me another sword, cried Jurian, but let it
be of better temper than the last. I shall make good
use of it, I promise you. M`Crea entered the tent and
procured him a sword. He returned, drawing his own
weapon. His cocked hat was stuck upon the top of
his night-caps, giving him an appearance the very
reverse
of martial. The hurry and confusion increased,
and amidst the shrieks of the wounded and dying, the
only intelligible words heard, were forward, forward!
and these resounded from every direction. The main
body of the enemy still advanced. The companies
commanded by Graham and Swain were drawn up to
impede their progress. Captain Swain took his
station
,
and M`Crea and Jurian stood together a short
distance
from him.
Curse this killing of men in the dark, muttered
M`Crea, I have no objection to it in broad day-light,
when a man may see what he is about; but to be
roused
from one's sleep to perform a bungling operation
Stand fast, stand fast! exclaimed Swain and
Graham
at the same moment. The soldiers remained firm,
and kept their eyes fixed on the dark moving mass that
now drew nigh to them. The words forward, forward!
resounded through the ranks of those approaching.
Make ready! exclaimed Graham and Swain, which
was succeeded by a simultaneous tick through the
extended
ranks. A pause ensued, during which not a
breath was drawn. The fires near the spot where Swain
and Graham had drawn up their companies, were now
burnt down to the embers, and the soldiers were
obscured
by the darkness, from the view of the advancing
enemy. Still the dark mass was seen to approach in
regular order, and the bewildered Americans to fly in
consternation before it. At length it came in the full
glare of a watch-fire burning brightly. Each man might
have been singled out, and his savage determination
read in his countenance. Their bayonets were fixed
and their muskets brought to a charge, and they
advanced
in regular but quick step across the light space,
as if anxious to enter into the obscurity of night again.
Stand fast! cried Graham to his men, who
evinced
impatience for the onset.
Stand fast, my boys, and wait for the word!
re-echoed
Swain, and the full cold tone of his voice
silenced
at once the murmur of impatience that run through
the ranks. The silence that ensued, was like the hush
of elements that foretells the coming storm. A few
moments elapsed. Stand fast, stand fast! resounded.
A few moments more, and the points of their bayonets
would have touched. Fire! shouted Swain in a
voice that was heard, above the discordant cries, to the
extremity of the camp. This was instantly followed by
a loud report of musketry, and the firm rank of the
advancing
enemy was broken. The shock was
unexpected
;
they paused, and fell back.
Charge with your bayonets; charge home, my
boys! shouted Swain in a voice that would have
roused
the soul of a coward to action. Charge, charge!
repeated the clear, full voice of Graham.
They led the way, and their followers rushed upon
the broken ranks of the foe. A scene of carnage
ensued
,
and such was the headlong fury of the little band,
that it soon failed to preserve the order with which the
onset was made. They were now in the midst of the
foe fighting singly. M`Crea kept in the wake of
Jurian
,
who dealt destruction wherever he appeared.
There was another who followed him with the same
devotion. It was Corwin the maniac, who had given
the first alarm of the approach of the British. M`Crea
was at length stricken to the earth by a blow with the
but end of a musket. Jurian did not see him fall, and
was soon lost sight of in the confusion. The soldier
who had knocked M`Crea down, reversed his gun, and
was about to terminate his life with the bayonet.
Corwin watched the motion, and threw himself upon
the prostrate body of M`Crea, exclaiming, Good for
evil is the command of God. The soldier stabbed
at him, and the bayonet passed through his blanket, but
fortunately a pressure in the crowd at that moment,
hurried the soldier forward.
Jurian in a few moments was in a distant part of the
camp. Bleeding and exhausted with fatigue, he had
not sufficient strength to parry the thrust made with a
bayonet at his bosom. He staggered beneath the shock
and fell. His conqueror bestrode him, and raising his
musket in both hands was about to pin his victim to the
earth, when a huge figure, mounted on a powerful horse,
exclaimed,
Forbear! or strike and I strike, at the same time
presenting a pistol at the head of the soldier.
What do you mean? demanded the soldier.
The life of that boy must be saved, replied the
other.
Why so? He is in the ranks of the rebels?
No matter, though he were in the ranks of hell,
his life must be saved. You know me?
I do.
Then begone; I will answer for what I have done.
The soldier disappeared, and Jurian arose from the
earth, and had time to take a hasty glance at the
mysterious
preserver of his life. He was in stature rising
six feet, and proportionately muscular. He wore a
white broad brimmed hat that overshadowed his
countenance
,
and was dressed in a drab coloured surtout:
around his waist was a broad leathern belt, and a pair
of pistols stuck in it.
Are you hurt? asked the stranger.
Yes; I am bruised and wounded, but not mortally.
His appearance indicated as much, for his clothes were
torn, and he was covered with dirt and blood.
If that be all take care of your life, for others set
a higher value upon it than you do yourself.
This is strange language from a foe, replied
Jurian
.
Strange, but true. Your father!
Ha! what of him? Speak; what of my father?
You have a father living.
God be praised. Direct me to him. Go on; go
on.
This is neither time nor place for explanation,
replied
the stranger. Read this, and obey it strictly.
He handed Jurian a letter, and dashing his spurs into
the flanks of his horse, suddenly disappeared. Jurian
approached a fire, by the light of which he read to this
effect.
Meet me at the sign of the Crooked Billet, on the
evening of the first of October, as I have something to
communicate that concerns you nearly. Fail not to be
punctual.
An Unknown Friend
.
If Jurian's astonishment was excited by the conduct
of his unknown preserver, this laconic letter rather
tended to augment than diminish it. How he should
thus suddenly have become the care of an unknown
individual, filled him with wonder, and his perplexity
increased, as he reflected that the secret of his birth,
which had been maintained inviolable for so many years,
was on the eve of being divulged, and by a being, that,
to his knowledge, he had never before beheld. The
conduct of the individual, his appearance, the time and
place chosen to deliver the letter, gave to the
transaction
such a romantic colouring, that Jurian was disposed
to question its reality, but the fact that his life had been
almost miraculously saved, and the apparent interest
which the stranger felt for him, immediately dissipated
the idea that there could possibly be either mistake or
intentional deception. Besides, what object could
be attained by deceiving or trifling with the feelings of
an obscure individual like himself. Conjecture only
served to increase his perplexity, and at a moment when
curiosity was wrought to the highest pitch, he caught
a glimpse of the stranger at a distance, recrossing the
encampment, and he hastened after him, to obtain, if
possible, an immediate explanation.
The confusion in the camp had by this time
diminished
,
and midnight assassination given place to
regular
warfare. General Wayne, on this trying occasion,
preserved his usual coolness, and promptly rallied a few
troops, who withstood the shock of the enemy, and
covered
the retreat of the others.
Jurian followed the stranger, who appeared to be
leaving the field of battle alone. He rode leisurely, and
the young man increased his speed in hopes of
overtaking
him, but his strength was too much exhausted to
effect this object. Still he followed, and when the
stranger was out of sight, he was guided in his pursuit
by the sound of the horse's hoofs. This pursuit was
continued until the sound was no longer heard, when
he threw himself on the ground to rest before he should
retrace his way to the camp.
Morning had not yet appeared when he rose to
return
,
dejected in spirit, and wounded and bruised, so
that he moved with difficulty. He had wandered for
some time, directed by the noise of the camp, and was
in the midst of a thick wood, when he heard a sound
like voices singing a solemn strain. He was on the
side of a rocky declivity, at the foot of which ran a
stream of water. He descended half way the hill in
the direction whence the music proceeded; it ceased,
and he paused a few moments to listen, when it was
resumed
,
and seemed to issue from the bowels of the
earth, immediately beneath his feet. The strain was
loud, melodious, and fervent.
The approach of morning had in some degree
dissipated
the darkness, so that objects were now
discernible
.
Jurian discovered that he was on a projecting
rock, and that if he had advanced a few yards farther,
he would inevitably have been dashed to pieces by his
fall. The loud strain of music had now sunk to a low
cadence, so low that it was monotonous. Jurian's
curiosity
was excited to behold the being who paid his
devotions
in this secluded spot. He descended around
the edge of the rock by means of the underwood, and
when he had arrived at the base, he found that it
projected
in such a manner as to form a natural cavern.
He paused and listened. The voice still continued to
VOL. I.11
chaunt a solemn air, and Jurian fixing his eyes on the
spot whence it proceeded, discerned by the uncertain
light, the outline of two human figures, one stretched
upon the ground and the other standing erect beside
him. He was not long in recognising in the tall
bare-headed
figure, Corwin the maniac, and on approaching
them, found the other to be surgeon M`Crea. They
were unconscious of his presence.
The parable of Nathan, exclaimed Corwin, in a
sepulchral tone, has been verified in thee. Thou
hast taken from the poor man the little ewe-lamb which
he had bought and nourished up; which drank of his
own cup, and lay in his bosom, and was unto him as a
daughter.
Can it be possible that thou art he? said M`Crea,
faintly. That haggard face affords no clue to recall
those well-known features.
Even he, replied Corwin. A merry heart doeth
good like a medicine, but a broken spirit drieth the
bones: and I have grieved for that which was of more
worth than the statue of gold in the plain of Dura.
O, God! burst from the heart of M`Crea, and he
hid his face with his hands. Corwin continued,
What was the judgment of David? That the rich
man should restore the lamb fourfold, because he had
no pity. Canst thou fulfil the judgment that the king
pronounced on his own head, or wlit thou, like the son
of Jesse, await its fulfilment from above? Beware, for
even as with him, the sword shall never depart from thy
house.
It has entered, and has not yet departed, for I
remain
alone of all my race.
Smitten, even as Ephraim was smitten, exclaimed
Corwin. Thy glory hath flown away like a bird from
the birth.
Jurian approached them, and assisted Corwin in
raising
the surgeon to his feet. He had been much
bruised
,
but not dangerously wounded, and appeared more
affected by his interview with Corwin, than the injuries
he had sustained in the fight. He remained silent.
Corwin continued, addressing Jurian,
Into thy hands do I commit him. Guard him as
thou wouldst the apple of thine eye, for I will cleanse
the blood that is not yet cleansed. Then turning to
M`Crea, he said, go rend your heart, and not your
garments, repent and leave a blessing behind you.
Their attention was now attracted by the shrill notes
of a distant bugle which gradually became more
distinct
.
The sun was just rising, and his broad red
beams dissipated the dense fog that hung around the
surrounding hills. It rapidly passed away like flying
clouds, or rather an extended sheet of undulating water.
The sound of the bugle grew louder, and suddenly a
horseman emerging from the wood, stood in full view
upon a bare field on the top of an adjoining hill.
Jurian
immediately recognised the gigantic figure that had
so mysteriously interposed for his life a few hours
before
.
His first impulse was to rush in pursuit of him,
but reflecting on M`Crea's helpless condition, he
checked
his impatience. The horseman remained stationary,
and the hills re-echoed the notes of his bugle. In a
few minutes a troop of about a dozen were seen issuing
from various parts of the wood. They were hastily
marshaled and again disappeared at full speed, the
mysterious bugleman at their head. M`Crea having
declared his ability to walk, they prepared to leave the
cave. Corwin wrapped his blanket around his
emaciated
form, and cried, in a deep voice, go, and sin no
more. He stalked from the cave, and rapidly
descending
the declivity, was soon out of sight. M`Crea
leaned upon the arm of Jurian, and they pursued their
way to the American army.
CHAPTER XII
This is the most omnipotent villain that ever cried stand to
a true man.
Falstaff
.
Paul Gordon
, who has been mentioned in a
preceding
chapter, might be compared to a problem in
metaphysics, for the more you reasoned concerning
him, the deeper you became involved. He was an
engrossing
subject of conversation, but it was impossible
to arrive at any satisfactory conclusion as to his
identity
.
Every week furnished additional evidence of his
industry in his vocation, until his name excited more
terror among the yeomanry, than the approach of the
invading army. He roved the country fearlessly, and
in the tap-room of every inn was on terms of social
intercourse
with those against whom he declared open
war upon the highway; and the simple farmer, as he
drank to their better acquaintance, little dreamt that he
would have reason to deplore a second meeting.
Paul, though not possessed of much of the dove-like
tenderness, was not all unused to the melting mood;
and in one of these moments of weakness, he had
bestowed
a portion of his heart upon one of mother Eve's
frail daughters. Madge Haines, which was her name,
resided in a secluded cottage about two miles from the
public road, and as her means of support were not
apparent
,
she did not long enjoy a fair name among her
neighbours. Human nature is prone to condemn what
it cannot comprehend. At length it was whispered
that a man at sunrise was seen to leave the cottage,
which occasioned at first many sage speculations, but
the mysterious visiter before long appeared so
frequently
,
that he was suffered to come and depart,
without
being looked upon either as a comet or a spectre.
Such was the state of affairs at this period of our story.
Madge held but little intercourse with her more prudent
neighbours, and they had become weary of commenting
upon her conduct.
One evening, as she was sitting alone in her cottage,
impatient for the arrival of our knight of the stirrup, a
horseman rode up and tapped at the door. As she
expected
no other visiter at that hour than Paul, she
opened it, but instead of him, she beheld a comely
youth, who was an entire stranger to her. As she
stood holding the door half open, and occupying the
whole aperture with her body, she presented a figure
not at all fitted to captivate such as have formed their
taste in these matters after the Medicean Venus.
Madge was tall and muscular, with an arm much
better calculated to wield the club of Hercules than a
distaff. Her hair, which was sandy, hung about in
confusion
in defiance of a toothless comb stuck upon the
crown of her head, which by logical deduction was
intended
for an ornament, as it could not possibly answer
any useful purpose. Her features were large, and not
of the most engaging cast of expression. Her arms
were bare to the elbow, the skin of which was
profusely
besprinkled with freckles. A dirty kerchief was
carelessly
thrown over her neck as a token of modesty, but
it served very imperfectly to conceal her bosom. A
short-gown and petticoat of the most homely materials,
and which, from the total absence of the effects of
water
,
appeared to have had a touch of the hydrophobia,
completed the figure of the Dulcinea of the chivalrous
Paul, who, in this instance, it cannot be denied, did not
11*
give a very strong proof of his taste in these delicate
matters.
The stranger having taken a hasty glance at the
figure of the fair Madge, demanded the distance to the
Lancaster road.
Two short miles, replied Madge, by the
horse-path
,
could you strike into it.
That replied the stranger, I very much doubt,
for I am completely bewildered. Is there no one at
hand to direct me?
No one, replied Madge, I am a lone woman;
but if you go on to the next house, Joe the cow-boy
will put you into the right road for a trifle.
The stranger demanded the way to the farm-house,
upon which Madge stepped from the door to point it
out to him.
As he turned the head of his horse in order to follow
her directions, the sound of some one rapidly
approaching
was distinctly heard. The stranger paused.
Why do you tarry? said Madge, the way to the
house lies straight before you. You cannot miss it.
There is some one coming, replied the other,
who, perhaps, may save me the trouble of going out
of the way.
Madge betrayed some impatience at his remaining,
and urged his departure, telling him that it was not a
step out of his way, as he would have to pass the house
before he could get into the lane that led to the main
road.
There can be no harm in waiting a few moments,
however, replied the stranger, which he did, while
Madge, having returned to the house, stood with the
door half open, and stretching her tall figure, looked
impatiently in the direction whence the sounds
proceeded
.
In a few moments a horseman, mounted on a fine
animal, rode up to the door. He was apparently rising
six feet in height, and athletic in proportion. He wore
a large slouched white hat and a drab coloured surtout,
which gave him the appearance of a substantial farmer,
belonging to the society of Quakers. He checked his
horse, and said in a careless tone,
Good evening, friend, a pleasant time this for
travelling
.
A pleasant evening, sir, but I am at a loss to find
my way, replied the stranger.
What, is that you, Mr. Hartfield? exclaimed the
new comer. No, I am not mistaken, he continued,
eagerly shaking Jurian's hand, for it was he. Well,
in truth this is a lucky meeting; as lucky as though it
had been planned.
Jurian, on a second glance at the stranger,
recognised
in him the man who had saved his life on the night
of the massacre, and delivered the letter which was the
cause of his absence from the army.
I am glad to meet with you, said Jurian, for I
need not tell you that I came in pursuit of you.
I reckoned as much, was the reply.
But you have the advantage of me in knowing my
name, said Jurian.
Oh! for that matter, returned the other, I have the
advantage of most of my acquaintance. I know every
man, woman, and child, in this and the adjoining
counties
,
and yet am known to but very few. Captain
Swain knows me bravely; ay, much better than his
creed, I'll warrant you.
Your name, pray?
Fairfieldfarmer Fairfield.
Fairfield? repeated Jurian, I never heard the
name in all my life.
May be not, may be not, said the other, for
though you are considered a knowing one in these
parts, there are many things that your books do not
speak of, and I am among the number. But which way
are you travelling at this hour, sir?
Surely, you know my errand.
True, true. It is strange I should forget. You'll
find that I am not so dull a fellow, but that you might
have a worse companion; but as a spur in the head is
worth two in the heel, we may as well dismount, and
ask our hostess here to arm us for travelling before we
proceed any further.
By all means, gentlemen, replied Madge,
dropping
a curtsey, you may command my poor cottage,
and all it contains.
Jurian opposed the measure, but as the other urged
that his horse required a breathing moment, they
dismounted
,
fastened their animals to the fence by the
roadside
,
and entered the cottage.
Come, bustle about, good hostess, said the
stranger
,
as he seated himself in the darkest corner of the
room, drew his large beaver over his forehead, and
folded his arms upon his bosom. Bustle about, and
let us see what your cupboard contains in the drinking
way, for we have no time to waste upon the contents
of your larder.
Madge placed a bottle upon the table, and left the
room with a pitcher in her hand, for the purpose of
getting
some water. A pause ensued, after which the
stranger carelessly observed
You are melancholy, Mr. Hartfield.
Am I not on a melancholy errand? You best can
tell.
I have always heard that it is a melancholy thing
for a man to lose his father, but this is the first time I
ever heard that it was the same case in finding one.
Cheer up, sir, you should be merry.
Madge returned with a pitcher of water, which she
placed upon the table and bade them drink, at the same
time removing the light to the adjoining room, where
she placed it in such a position, that it faintly
glimmered
into both apartments, the door between being open.
The stranger arose from the dark corner where he was
seated, and approaching the table poured some of the
liquor into a cup, and desired Jurian to imitate his
example
.
And now, he added, I will give you a
toast that you will pledge me in, whether whig or tory
the rightful cause.
That is a pliable toast, indeed, said Jurian, but
as I believe the cause in which my fortunes are launched
to be the rightful one, I pledge you with all my heart.
They had no sooner made an end of drinking, than
Madge's voice was heard from the inner room
Out on you now, does this become a christian and a
soldier, to be drinking and guzzling, without having a
fellow-feeling for the poor dumb beasts that serve you
so faithfully from sunrise to sunset, without being able to
speak their wants?
What's in the wind now, good woman? cried the
stranger, a storm is not a-brewing, I hope, for we have
a long ride before us yet to-night.
The greater reason, continued Madge, that you
should attend to your horses. The black by the
gardengate
is becoming quite restive for a drink, but you have
had your fill, and leave them to suffer.
Really a considerate woman this, said the
stranger
,
in an under-tone. The horse is yours, Mr.
Hartfield
,
and as he requires water, you had better lead him
to the stream a few yards beyond the house. Jurian
left the room to attend to his horse, and Madge
no sooner heard the door close after him than she
entered, with tokens of an approaching storm strongly
depicted upon her countenance.
Well, sir, you condescend to show yourself again,
after ten days' absence. I was almost inclined to think
that the gallows had got its due, and forgave your
neglect
of me; but to find that you have been all the time
in good health and spirits, is too much for patience to
bear!
A tender reception, truly, after so long an absence.
But, my dear, as to the gallows having its due, I hope
you have not been in jeopardy of late.
Paul Gordon, cried the amazon, standing more
erect, and throwing back the carroty locks that hung
about her face, Paul Gordon, I scorn your words
the gallows!I would have you to know, that until I
met with you, I was well to do in the way of making
an honest living, with a fair character and an untainted
reputation. I would have you remember this when you
talk again of the gallows.
Well, my love, replied Paul, dryly, I do
remember
when I first beheld that lovely countenance,
you were a fish-dealer, in the small way, with a
reputation
as untainted as your merchandise in the dog-days.
But you should not be eternally twitting me with this,
for I go to the extent of my tether in order to express
my gratitude for the numberless sacrifices you have
made for my sake.
There was a time, replied Madge, when you
thought you could not do too much for me, but now
Why now, continued Paul, seizing her hand, I
will do more for you than ever; the times are daily
becoming
more disturbed in this neighbourhood, and you
know I delight to fish in troubled water, my darling
so in a short time I will deny you nothing.
Grant me one request now, said Madge.
Well, name it, said Paul.
Nothing more than to get rid of that youngster
without delay, and return as soon as possible.
I shall, replied Paul, and return perhaps
to-morrow
,
my angel.
To-morrow! you will not leave me to-night,
exclaimed
Madge.
I must, my charmer.
Must! then why did you come at all?
To change my pistols, my angel, this brace is out
of repair. They are the tools of my trade, and I am
as much at a loss without them as a tailor without his
shears, or a cobbler without his awl or lapstone.
Saying
which, he arose from his seat and entered the
adjoining
room, while Madge remained silent, with her
haggard, yet penetrating eye, riveted on the door at
which he disappeared. In a few moments he returned,
fixing his pistols in a leathern belt around his waist,
which was concealed by the large drab coat that he
usually wore. He approached the chair upon which
he had been seated, and Madge kept her eyes upon
him in silence, until he resumed his seat. On raising
his eyes, Paul observed the well known tokens of
discontent
depicted in the countenance of his Dulcinea.
How now, sweetheart, said our hero, you
appear
displeased because business calls me from you
well, I have no reason to complain, as it denotes your
affection for me, but as a smile becomes you so much
more than a frown, I beg you to look as cheerful as
possible at parting.
She looked at him steadfastly in silence for a few
moments, and then calmly addressed him:
I know your character now, and before long you
may become acquainted with mine. You begin
to despise me, but have a care that I return not your
due in the like coin. There is some one who has found
more favour in your eyes than myself; I know it; but
mark me, I will find her out, and, as I am a woman,
my revenge shall not fall short of my injury.
Paul listened to this address with all the phlegm of
a stoic philosopher, for as it was not the first time he
had been saluted with similar language, it had lost
the charm of novelty. He approached the table, and
silently washed it down with another potation of liquor.
Madge, on beholding his indifference, eyed him in
silence
,
until her passion arose to the point of explosion.
She drew herself up, and was just preparing to bid the
thunder roar, when the entrance of Jurian protected
the devoted Paul from the impending storm. The
amazon turned away, and entered the adjoining room
to conceal her mortification at this intrusion; but the
sharp ears of Paul heard the storm rumbling at a
distance
,
from which he had been so opportunely rescued.
He felt little inclination to brave its fury, and showed
some impatience to escape as soon as possible.
Well, Mr. Hartfield, he exclaimed aloud, as
Madge's murmurings became more audible, it is time
for us to be moving.
Cannot the explanation take place here?
Not here, not here, replied Paul, his impatience
increasing, the Crooked Billet was the place
appointed
.
Night is closing in, therefore the sooner we are
jogging the better for both of us. Our horses have had
time to breathe, and thanks to our hostess, we have had
our glass, so let us lose no time. He suited the word
to the action, and approached the door; Madge entered,
and hastily passing between our hero and the door,
demanded
,
in a tone not altogether as fascinating as that
of the fabulous sea-damsels, whether he was really
going; which inquiry was accompanied with a look but
little calculated to induce our rover to stay. Paul
answered
in the affirmative, and pushing towards the door,
bade her good night rather unceremoniously, and
mounted his horse, while she stood in the door,
looking
steadfastly at him, in hopes that her parting look,
though not sufficiently attractive to detain him, might
induce to a speedy return. Paul dashed his spurs
into the flanks of his horse, at he same time shouting
good night, which tender adieu, however, was lost
in the noise of the animal's hoofs. Jurian followed,
and Madge, muttering something, which we do not
think proper to stain our paper with, dashed the door
to in a rage, and went to indulge her feelings in solitude,
where we will leave her for the present, and recount
the adventures of the travellers.
CHAPTER XIII.
'Tis a fine fellow, by this light he is
An honest rogue, and hath a good conceit.
The Four Prentices of London
.
Who did strike out the light?
Was't not the way?
Macbeth
.
At
this period, about five miles from Philadelphia,
beside the road leading to Lancaster, stood a small inn,
where whig or tory might bait, and have no questions
asked, for according to the philosophy of mine host, a
shilling hard money from a liege subject of king George,
was quite as harmless, and certainly much more
tempting
,
than the same amount in continental paper, from
the rough hand of the most devoted patriot of them all.
Mine host of the Crooked Billet was a jovial fellow, and
did honour to his calling, for his rosy gills plainly indicated that he had an aversion to idleness, and rather
than the bar should stand still, he frequently became his
own customer, merely for the sake of keeping his hand
in.
His figure was not unlike a hogshead standing on
end, being but little taller, and of nearly the same
circumference
.
He was a man of unconquerable good humour,
and though distinguished in his younger days for
upholding
the dignity of his nature upon the slightest
provocation
,
yet he would coolly crack the head of his
VOL. I.12
antagonist in a scientific manner, and laugh heartily at
the joke. On the other hand, whenever it was decreed
that he should be the sufferer, he still laughed and
enjoyed
it, we will venture to say, as much as any man
ever enjoyed a drubbing.
His reputation for pugilistic accomplishments
extended
far and wide, which at length acquired for him the
nickname of Nicholas the Bruiser. Nicholas had
laboured in his vocation at the Billet for some years,
without appearing to get one step forward on the road
to prosperity. He remained stationary, for it was
impossible
to make a retrograde movement, without
getting
to the very chin in the mire. The reason assigned
by his enemies for this unpromising condition, was the
selfish practice already mentioned, of patronizing his
own bar; but notwithstanding this, matters of late had
assumed a more cheerful aspect. The tap-room was
better furnished, the liquors of a better quality, and the
old drab suit, which had become as familiar to his body
as the skin that covered it, had given place to a
complete
suit of brown, of a more recent fashion. All this
moved the special wonder of the neighbours of
Boniface
;
for as business had not increased, they could not
account for his prosperity, and he did not evince any
disposition to be very communicative on the subject.
The evening to which we have brought our
narrative
,
the bar-room of the Crooked Billet was occupied
by the gossips of the neighbourhood, listening to the
exploits of corporal Drone, who, according to his own
account, had won more pitched battles than Julius
Csar, and possessed a much greater share of
patriotism
than Regulus of old. Having enlarged upon the
charms of a soldier's life, and his own merits in
particular
,
he threw himself back in his chair, crossed his
legs, and lustily trolled out the following song:
Over the hills we gaily go,
To fight the proud invading foe;
Our country calls, and we obey,
Over the hills and far away.
Whoe'er is bold and would be free,
Will take his gun and follow me,
Though sneaking cowards skulk at home,
While we in quest of glory roam.
Over the rocks and over the steep,
Over the waters wide and deep,
We'l1 drive the foe without delay,
Over the hills and far away.
And when return'd from bloody wars,
Adorn'd with laurels and with scars,
Let beauty be the soldier's prize
Who dreads no wounds but from her eyes.
Then toss about the flowing bowl,
And drink to each true patriot soul,
Who rushes to the deadly fray
Over the hills and far away.
During the corporal's song, two soldiers dismounted
at the door and entered the room. Drone paid no
attention
to the new comers, but had no sooner finished
than he resumed his narrative at the place of breaking
off. He had the floor, and felt disposed to keep it.
Those who have been in congress will comprehend the
feelings by which he was actuated.
"As I was saying, Nicholas, at Chad's Ford, I
performed
such deeds as make my hair stand an end but
to think of. Six of Knyphausen's men attacked me at
the same time. Their whiskers alone were enough to
give a man a panic, and they smelt of garlic to such a
degree"--here the corporal made a long and expressive
whistle--"that it was death to breathe the same
atmosphere
.
Pestilence was abroad. Yet these did I
encounter alone, and conquer."
"Whiskers and garlic and all," said Nicholas.
"Ay, pestilence, and the seven deadly sins."
The corporal took a long whiff through the fragment
of his pipe, filling his lungs with smoke, which he
slowly
puffed out at the corner of his mouth, with an air that
impressed the company with a proper idea of his
importance
.
The corporal draws a long bow, said one of the
officers to the other.
A long bow, sir? He may draw a long sword when
he thinks proper, but he has no bow, that I see,
replied
the single-minded Mauns.
Ah! captain Swain, is that you? exclaimed the
corporal. You see me here taking my ease, for a
soldier must have his hours of relaxation, or he would
sink beneath the toils he is obliged to undergo.
And you, corporal, sometimes sink beneath your
relaxation, replied Nicholas, dryly, shaking his fat
sides. The laugh was against the corporal, who
gravely
answered, that Nicholas was a wag, and would have
his joke, though at the expense of his friends.
It will not cost a great deal, corporal, if you pay
for it, replied Nicholas, and his suppressed laugh was
changed to a convulsive chuckle.
Nicholas, you are a wag, repeated the corporal.
Zounds, I would rather sustain a charge from a
platoon
of infantry, than one from Nicholas.
Would you? retorted mine host, then hereafter
you shall pay cash for every dram you touch at my
bar, for I also have become tired of charging.
They all laughed but honest Mauns, who understood
a pun about as well as he did Hebrew.
A fair hit, replied Drone, forcing a grin, but
your charging is not quite as serious as that of the
enemy
.
Look at my rifle-shirt! It bears more honourable
marks than the buckler of Hector.
And your breeches, replied Nicholas, still
chuckling
,
must also be highly prized by the same rule.
Yes, exclaimed Drone, this ugly rent is some
of the work of old Hornflint, on the night of that
savage
massacre, which stands without an example in
christian warfare. See, here's another; but this I shall
never stitch up, for I received it in saving the life of
mad Anthony on that bloody night. I shall never
forget
that wound.
I dare say; nor farmer Giles' hen-roost, replied
Nicholas, dryly.
Ha! what do you mean? demanded the other,
scarcely able to put a good face upon so severe a
rebuff
.
The farmer's dog Towser can better explain,
replied
mine host.
The corporal was familiar with Nicholas's mode of
adjusting disputes, and therefore thought it prudent to
reply complacently
Nicholas, you are a wag, and must have your joke;
but you may laugh at my expense as long as I drink at
yours. So fill up the mug, and let us have a
roundelay
.
A song, a song, cried several voices at the same
time.
Silence! zounds, cann't you be silent? cried the
corporal, in a tone of authority. No excuse,
Nicholas
,
but begin.
Silence being thus enforced, the landlord cleared his
throat and commenced. In order to render the concord
of sweet sounds more melodious, he called in the
assistance
of his nose, which produced a monotonous
drone, that run through the whole song, like the note
of the bass-pipe of an organ.
The whig for liberty may fight,
While the laurel greenly grows,
And fancy there is true delight
In marching barefoot through the snows:
But faith, I must confess with me
That this would not at all agree.
The tory proud may curse the cause,
And say the rebels all should swing;
12*
May laugh at continental laws,
And brave the gallows for his king:
But faith, I must confess with me
That this would not at all agree.
So I with tories curse the whigs,
And make my way with Flemish stories;
And while the buckskin soldier swigs,
I know my cue, and curse the tories:
For since I keep a bar, you see
'Tis better with all sides t' agree.
A damned Jesuitical song, exclaimed the
corporal
,
and only fit for the ears of such as cut their cloth
according to friend Ephraim's fashion.
For a profane song, replied Ephraim, who was of
the company, I am disposed to think favourably of it,
as it inculcates the principle of good fellowship with all
mankind. Yea, verily, it pleaseth me.
True, you are for the lion lying down with the
lamb, continued the corporal. But pray, friend
Ephraim, what is it brings you abroad at this hour?
I am on my way to my own threshold, replied
Ephraim.
Are you alone?
Quite alone, replied Ephraim.
Then you have soon got rid of your company,
continued the corporal, for it was but yesterday that
I saw you with half a dozen head of as fine cattle, on
your way to the city, as ever were turned out of our
meadows.
Business must be attended to, was the laconic
reply of Ephraim.
Corwin the maniac now entered, without hat or shoes,
and his long matted hair hanging over his countenance.
He slowly approached the group, and cast a vacant
stare upon all around.
Here comes old Pilgrim's Progress, exclaimed
Drone. Well, Waterbrain, which way lies your course
at this time of night?
Towards the moon, replied the other, in search
of my poor wits.
Then tarry where you are, for, faith, they are not
worth the journey. But how do you travel, pray?
By water, by water.
Show us your chart, man; what stream is it flows
in that direction?
The ocean of tears, replied the maniac, and I
have shed sufficient to insure me a safe passage. There
is no danger of shoals, hurricane, or shipwreck.
And at best the loss of your cargo would not make
you bankrupt. But how go the wars?
Bloodily! answered the maniac, still standing in
the same position, and with a countenance devoid of
expression. Bloodily; now is the eagle and the
raven's carnival; they have their choice of carcasses.
As you are a sage politician, which party do you
side with; whig or tory?
The right side, of course, replied Corwin; he is
a fool or a madman, who is not on the right side. Yes,
yes, you should ever be on the right side in these
matters
,
or keep thy own counsel.
A sensible remark that for Waterbrain, exclaimed
the corporal. But which is the right side, pray?
That which is not the wrong, said the other, his
countenance still immoveable.
God help thy wits!
Amen! ejaculated Corwin, and mend our ways
and apparel too, for the winter is approaching.
A timely petition; why don't you respond? said
Nicholas to the corporal.
I shall repair my wardrobe, answered Drone, in
the field of battle, and fight the next enemy I meet, for
his covering.
Your chilblains will be in a flourishing condition
before spring, replied Nicholas.
Horses were heard to stop at the door, and
immediately
afterwards Paul Gordon and Jurian entered.
Welcome, Mr. Fairfield, said Nicholas, I am
glad to see that you cannot pass this way without
stopping
to bait, and pay a friendly visit.
I am not one of those who forget good treatment
as soon as it is over. So give us a glass of such stuff,
Nicholas, as requires no bush.
Paul stood leaning against the bar, and Nicholas went
behind it to wait upon him. Jurian drew nigh the
company
,
and on perceiving captain Swain, sat down
beside
him, and they entered into conversation. An
interesting
topic occupied the rest of the group.
The times are truly dangerous, said Ephraim, for
what with the foraging of the contending armies, and
the depredations committed by that marauder Paul
Gordon
,
it is as much as an honest man can do to live, for
neither life nor property is safe for twenty-four hours
together.
That's very true, neighbour Horn; they manage
between them to take cabbage enough from us, said
one, who by his thimble and thread appeared to be a
tailor.
Still, Paul Gordon, with all his faults, is not without
his good points, replied another, whose leathern apron
and smutty countenance denoted his calling.
Then he must be ashamed of them, said the
corporal
,
for he keeps them so closely concealed, that
the devil himself will not be able to find them.
And he will never go to the trouble of a search,
added the smith, so Paul is not likely to have justice
done him.
Nor does he wish it, exclaimed the tailor, for he
knows he deserves a halter more richly than any thing
else.
For shame, neighbour, exclaimed Paul, who had
overheard their conversation, is this your gratitude?
Gratitude for what, stranger? demanded the tailor.
Have you so soon forgotten his bounty to your
wife?
A plague on him and his bounty! exclaimed the
tailor, in a tone that betrayed that the subject was by
no means an agreeable one.
Scarcely a month ago, neighbours, continued
Paul, this man's wife was going to market, and was
overtaken by Paul, who, on entering into conversation
with her, found her full of alarm lest she should be
stopped and plundered. He quieted her fears, and like
a true gentleman protected her to the skirts of the city.
Is this so, neighbour Snip? demanded the smith.
I cannot gainsay it, replied the tailor.
But that is not all, gentlemen, continued Gordon,
on parting with her, he bestowed a purse of hard
money to make her comfortable, and now you hear how
this ungrateful man rates him for his generosity.
Damn his generosity! squeaked the tailor,
waxing
wroth at the recollection.
But can you deny the fact? demanded Paul.
No, exclaimed the other, but did he not, after
she had sold her marketing, plunder her of the amount,
and the purse too, as she was returning home? Answer
me that.
So the story goes, replied Paul, but that must
have been when his evil genius prevailed. The best
of us are not at all times ourselves, you know.
Ephraim, during the foregoing dialogue, kept eying
Paul in evident trepidation. He shifted his position,
until he succeeded in getting the whole company
between
him and the object of his terror. The quick eye
of Paul followed him wherever he moved, and even
while he was bantering the tailor, Ephraim perceived
that his eye was still upon him. He however remained
silent, perhaps still entertaining some doubts as to the
identity of the individual, and recollecting the
unfavourable
result of the accusation at the Hive, when he was
equally certain.
This bugbear, said the corporal, who had been
smoking his pipe for some time in silence, is as arrant
a poltroon as is to be found, and I will make it
manifest
before he is a week older. Little Ephraim here
has offered a reward for his apprehension.
I have offered no reward of the kind, replied
Ephraim, his trepidation increasing, I disclaim it.
You shackling little apology for a man, cried the
corporal, will you attempt to pick my pocket in this
barefaced manner?
I disclaim the reward, repeated Ephraim, I
disclaim
the reward.
Nay, friend Horn, your memory must fail you,
replied Paul, I have one of your handbills in my
pocket now, and will give it to Nicholas to stick against
his bar.
He coolly handed the paper to the landlord, which
tended to multiply the doubts and fears of little Ephraim.
So that being settled, continued the corporal,
bear in mind that I hold you to the bargain. This
Paul Gordon, as I was saying, is but an arrant coward
at best. About a month ago, he waylaid me on the
Westchester road, but if I did not give him cogent
reasons
for never attempting a similar experiment, my
name is not corporal Drone.
A very good story, cried Nicholas, but why did
he attack you since he might have robbed a gibbet to
more profit, and with perfect safety.
The corporal sat more erect, and frowned, hoping
that an important air would be considered an answer to
the impertinent question.
Explain, corporal, explain, continued the
persevering
Nicholas, for really it is a point that puzzles
me.
You are no military man, master Nicholas,
replied
Drone, gravely; at the same time casting a
gracious
smile upon the company, which was intended to
convey a vast deal more than it actually did.You
are no military man, master Nicholas.
True, replied mine host, but what is that to the
purpose? Would any man run his neck into a noose
merely for the sake of the halter? Unriddle, corporal,
unriddle.
You may have heard of such a thing as fame!
This speech was accompanied by a look as full of
meaning as the first.
O! I comprehend you now, replied Nicholas,
chuckling. He would establish his reputation at one
blow, by reaping the harvest of your valour.
Precisely so, responded the corporal, with great
solemnity.
Captain Swain and Jurian were engaged in
conversation
,
and paid little attention to the foregoing. Mauns
Talman's mind appeared to be absorbed by the hilt of
his sword, with which he had been playing for some
time, and the vacant look of Corwin, who sat near them,
indicated that his thoughts were distant. His attention
was at length awakened by some remark, and his eyes
rested upon the prominent figure of Paul as he stood
at the bar. They brightened with a gleam of
recognition
,
and he muttered to himself, Paul Gordon.
What is that you say, Waterbrain, demanded the
corporal.
The marauder stands before you, replied Corwin,
rising, and pointing at the bar. Behold Paul
Gordon
.
The effect of this intelligence was electrical upon the
company. Several sprang to their feet, others remained
motionless, while Drone and Ephraim could scarcely
keep their seats for shaking. Captain Swain drew his
sword and rushed forward, Mauns by his side. Gordon
drew a pistol from his belt, and presented it
Not one step nearer, captain Swain, or you die.
The soldiers paused, and Drone and Ephraim shook as
though they had been touched by the palsy, for the
weapon
was pointed towards them. And now, sir,
continued
Paul, I drink to our better acquaintance,
saying which, he swallowed the remainder of his drink.
By the memory of Sven, cried the captain, he
shall not carry it thus. The wolf is in the toils; secure
the door, Mauns, and I will have him in spite of his
popgun.
The sergeant moved towards the door, and Jurian
took his place beside the captain. Nicholas was still
behind the bar, and was seen speaking through a small
window that opened into an adjoining room.
You too, Mr. Hartfield! exclaimed Paul. Is
this your faith? Remember what brought me here.
The point of Jurian's sword fell, but he kept his
position
.
Lay down your pistols and surrender, cried the
captain.
If you were not so grave a man, captain, I would
swear you were jesting, replied Paul.
Then have at you. Look to the door, Talman.
Not one step further, I say, unless you wish to try
your digestive powers upon cold lead.
Frighten children with your popgun, cried the
captain, and advanced to the attack. The next instant
the room resounded with the report of the pistol, but
it failed to take effect, as Jurian sprang forward and
struck it to the floor.
Remember, cried Paul, what brought me here.
He drew a short heavy sword, and stood upon the
defensive
.
It seemed as a feather in his sinewy grasp.
Jurian was doubtful what part to take, while the old
captain and Mauns joined in the attack. Paul parried
their blows with the skill of an experienced
swordsman
,
his gigantic strength and activity imparting
confidence
.
All was confusion. The only cool spectator
was Nicholas, who, with his arms folded, leaned upon
the edge of his bar, and watched every stroke with the
feelings of an amateur. A light stood near him. The
contest continued with unabated determination, when
Nicholas slily shoved the light from its stand, and it fell
to the floor. A moment after, the only remaining light,
in a distant part of the room, was also extinguished.
The combatants were enveloped in darkness, and the
clash of weapons ceased.
Look to the door, Talman, look to the door, cried
the captain, and let no one pass.
Who the devil put out the lights? demanded
Nicholas
.
No matter for that now. Fetch others and lose
no time, replied the captain.
But I want to know who it was put out the lights,
repeated the pertinacious landlord.
Bring others, and quickly, or by the memory of
Sven, I will put out your light also.
You shall be obeyed, captain, but still I should like
to know who dared to take such a liberty in my house.
Nicholas tapped at the little window already
mentioned
,
and called for a candle. Some time elapsed,
and the order not being obeyed, the captain gave
additional
symptoms of his impatience.
Bestir yourself, bestir yourself there, cried
Nicholas
,
for we are all in the dark.
You cann't have it before it's lit, replied a shrill
voice from the inner apartment.
The light was finally produced. The captain was
discovered in the centre of the room, Talman was
standing
by the door, which was closed, but Paul had either
disappeared, or assumed the shape of a lad of about
thirteen who stood beside Talman. He was barefooted,
shaggy as a colt, and was dressed in the cast-off
small-clothes
of Nicholas, already mentioned. These formed
pantaloons for the lad without any alteration, but in
consequence
of their latitudinal dimensions, it required the
constant aid of his left hand to keep them in their
proper
position. He was a perfect miniature of Nicholas,
without the aid of the long-remembered drabs. The
boy remained stationary until his father called upon him
to light the candles. The captain searched diligently,
but in vain, for Gordon. The last place he searched
VOL. I.13
was beneath the table, where he discovered the
corporal
and Ephraim lying together as the lion and the
lamb. Drone arose, and drawing his rusty sword, ran
towards the door, crying out
Which way did the coward go?
He didn't go this way, replied honest Mauns.
Pursue, pursue! continued the corporal; give
me a horse, and I will soon have him back again, neck
and heels.
You are certainly a fine fellow, corporal, said the
smith, laughing; but unluckily there is one great
defect
in your composition.
And what is that, thou lusty son of Vulcan?
demanded
Drone, still flourishing his sword; what is
that?
Your courage, replied the smith, does not make
its appearance till your antagonist is out of sight. But
for this defect you would be a very clever soldier,
indeed
.
The corporal knit his brows and retired in silence.
The means by which Paul had escaped, remained a
mystery, for honest Mauns protested that he had not
passed the door. Captain Swain having searched in
vain for him, was about to leave the inn, when the
corporal
called to him, and desired to be reported at head
quarters, as he should certainly be in camp before he
was a day older. The captain smiled, while Nicholas
and the smith laughed lustily.
And you, my son, said the captain to Jurian, will
you not return with us to the camp to-night?
Not to-night, sir, replied Jurian.
We are on our way thither, and should be glad of
your company.
Overlook my absence for a few hours, sir; I shall
not trespass long upon your indulgence. But to-night,
I have that in view which nothing earthly can divert me
from.
Pursue your own course, my son, but remember
the advice of a gray head is sometimes worthy of a
second thought.
Yours, sir, should always be remembered, and
especially
by me. But to-night it is impossibleyou must
excuse me for this night.
Captain Swain left the room with Talman, and a few
moments after, Corwin followed them. They had not
proceeded more than a quarter of a mile from the inn,
when they halted beneath the cover of a wood until
Corwin came up to them.
Well, Corwin, demanded the captain, how do
matters go on in our moral city since the red-coats have
quartered themselves in it?
The British army made its triumphal entry into
Philadelphia
on the 26th of September, and was escorted
by numbers, who, in after-life, became the loudest
declaimers
against British tyranny. Your true politician
will ever be on the strong side, and there is nothing
that he can so readily change as his opinions.
Even as with the revellers of Babylon, replied
Corwin. They drink wine, and praise the gods of
gold and of silver, of brass, of iron, of wood, and of
stone. But the craft of the Gibeonite shall not avail
him, for he shall be taken in his own craftiness.
Have you any thing to communicate of
importance
?
demanded the captain.
Corwin made known such matters in relation to the
enemy, as he had picked up in his wanderings. Among
other intelligence, he stated that the force by which the
city was invested consisted of four battalions of
grenadiers
,
under the command of lord Cornwallis, and that
the main body was still encamped at Germantown.
They separated, and the soldiers shaped their course
towards the American army, at that time encamped at
Skippach creek.
CHAPTER XIV.
I have the general's hand to pass through the world at
pleasure
.
Blurt, Master Constable
.
Jurian
, after mounting his horse and leaving the inn,
was at a loss which way to direct his course. His
mind, for hours, had been engrossed with one object,
and at the moment he believed its accomplishment was
at hand, he was fated to bitter disappointment. Still
he hoped that Gordon would not desert him, and
discouraging
as the result had been, an explanation would
yet take place. The moon was just rising in a
cloudless
sky, and myriads of stars contributed to render the
night more brilliant than day. He sat upon his horse
some time, undetermined what course to adopt, and
already regretted that he had not accompanied the
captain
and honest Mauns. All hope of Paul's return
having
vanished, he finally resolved to follow them, when
the faint note of a distant bugle reached his ear,
which had scarcely died away, before it was succeeded
by a second strain. It was the same that he had heard
the morning after the massacre. He did not wait for
another signal, but clapped spurs to his horse, and
started at full speed in the direction whence the sound
proceeded.
He was guided by the sound of the bugle which was
heard at short intervals. Every succeeding strain
became
more distinct, but when he imagined that the
pursuit
was drawing to a close, the sound died away.
He had rode for near half an hour, and some time
had elapsed since the last strain of the bugle. He
was now at an intersection of roads, and was at a loss
which to select. He paused to await the signal, during
which he heard the sound of a horse approaching along
the by-road. Expectation was now at the highest, and
in a few moments a horseman appeared jogging
leisurely
along. At one glance, Jurian perceived that
there was nothing of the bold dashing air of Paul about
him. He bestrode his horse with as little animation
as a meal-sack, and had broken the animal to the
regular
up-and-down jog that distinguishes the countryman
from your true lover of horse-flesh. Disappointment
succeeded hope, as the horseman drew nigh, and was
about to pass with the commonplace remark of A fine
evening, stranger, but taking a second look at Jurian,
he checked his horse, and exclaimed in a tone of
astonishment
,
what! Mr. Hartfield, can it be you? I
should as soon have thought of seeing a ghost as you
here at this time of night.
Good evening, Jones, replied Jurian, recognising
the countryman. Did you not hear the sound of a
bugle a few minutes ago?
I did, sir. Some idle trumpeter, I suppose,
serenading
the moon, having little else to do since the army
has entered winter-quarters.
Have you met no one?
Not a soul, sir, since I left the lower ferry, where
I stopped on an errand on my way up.
Were any strangers there?
A single horseman, sir, who wore a broad-brimmed
hat and a drab surtout, was about to cross the river.
Jurian's interest was excited.
Did you know the man?
Never saw him before, sir. The boatman called
him Mr. Fairfax, or Fairfield, or something of the
kind.
13*
Which course did he go? Could I possibly
overtake
him?
That, sir, is out of the question, for as he entered
the boat, I heard him remark that he would be in the
city in a few minutes. Did you wish to overtake him?
I did. Most earnestly did I wish it.
I am sorry things have fallen out so unluckily;
but as I am going to the town, should I meet with him,
I will mention what you have said.
Do so. You are going to the city, say you?
Yes, sir. The 'squire and all his family are there
at present. The change has made quite a new creature
of the old gentleman. There is nothing but revelry
from morning till night; ay, and from night till
morning
,
and he joins in it all, in spite of his gout and
crabbedness
.
And how does Miss Agatha like the change?
O, sir, she plays her part bravely, and makes no
small figure, I warrant you. It would do your heart
good to see how swimmingly she carries it.
Women have a natural tact at fitting themselves to
any sphere in which they may be thrown, replied
Jurian
,
in a careless manner, which, however, did not
conceal his deep chagrin. He continued: does Miss
Morton, say you, join in the general rejoicing that
prevails
in the garrison of the invader?
I will not speak positively, sir, replied Jones,
but since you are now so near at hand, had you not
better satisfy yourself?
How satisfy myself?
By entering the city, sir. That's the best way.
Impossible!
I have the watchword, sir, continued Jones,
and even without it could readily get you past the
sentries. If you desire it, I will accompany you, and
whenever called upon, place you here in safety.
Besides
,
you may chance to meet with Mr. Fairfield.
True; that is an inducement, indeed, to run all
hazards.
I will use my best exertions, replied Jones, to
bring you together.
Jurian embraced the proposition without weighing
the consequences of detection, and off they started
towards
the Schuylkill ferry. The night was beautifully
serene; the moon shone brightly, and as her beams
played upon the dancing waters, they appeared to
convert
every ripple into polished silver. The stars
glimmered
forth with uncommon brilliancy, and not a cloud
was seen above the horizon. As they approached the
river, the ferryman, seated on the side of his boat, was
singing a rude chorus, and made up in vociferation what
he lacked in harmony.
They rode into the boat, and were rapidly borne
across the river. The distant sound of the drum and
fife, playing the tattoo, were distinctly heard through
the calmness of the night; and, on the nearer approach
of our horsemen to the city, the regular tread of the
picket-guard, at his post, reminded Jurian that he was
about to enter dangerous territory. The moon shone
so brilliantly that all around appeared to be an entire
globe of chrysolite, and the sentinels in different
quarters
could be distinctly seen long before within hailing
distance. The horsemen rode briskly, but before they
had crossed the line of encampment they were saluted
with
Stand, ho! the word!Jones checked his horse,
and his companion followed his example.
Ho! the word! cried the sentinel presenting his
musket.
Brandywine! replied Jones.
You are wrong. Back! cried the sentinel.
That was the word when I left the town, said
Jones.
It has been changed.
Jones hesitated for a moment; and then turning to
the sentinel said, in a low voice, my friend, can you
read by this light?
Yes; if it be not a dnably cramped hand.
It is fair and legible, replied Jones, at the same
time handing him a scrip of paper, which the sentinel,
after reading, returned, and bade him pass. It was a
pass, with the signature of Cornwallis, authorising
those on duty to permit the bearer, and those who
accompanied
him, to enter the city without being
molested
.
Jurian and his guide now proceeded, without
encountering
any obstacle, until they arrived in the centre
of the city.
Immediately on the British taking possession of
Philadelphia
,
Mr. Morton removed his family to the city.
It has been stated that family pride was his
predominant
weakness, and he dreaded nothing more than
that his blood might at some time be alloyed by a
stream that flowed through veins composed of an
inferior
quality of clay to his own. For his son, he felt no
apprehension; but Agatha had already betrayed too
much interest for one of plebeian birth, not to feel some
uneasiness on her account. He determined to try
what effect a change of scene would produce, and, in
order to render it more fascinating, he gave free scope
to indulgence. He kept open house, where all officers
of rank were sure to find a welcome, and this, it may
be observed, is a certain mode to procure good
company
throughout the globe; but when your means fail
the deduction is a natural one, and I will trust to the
sagacity of the reader to make it.
Agatha, removed from seclusion in the country
to the bustle of a garrison, had her spirits buoyed up,
and those feelings which she had cherished for years
in some measure lost their influence. The world
appeared
to her in a new light; and the fashionable lady
of the metropolis, was a very distinct personage from
the unsophisticated country girl. Still there were
moments
,
even in this round of pleasure, when the ghosts
of departed days would arise and whisper that this
fickleness was criminal, but, like all other ghosts, they
vanished on the appearance of the first beams of the
morning, which called her forth to participate in some
new scene of amusement.
Colonel Lindsay had become very assiduous in his
attentions. He was engaging both in his person and
address, and had succeeded in some measure in
removing
the unfavourable opinion that Agatha in the first
instance had entertained towards him. Mr. Morton
was early aware of his partiality for his daughter, and
rejoiced at it, for the colonel was esteemed a brave
officer, and, what was of a vast deal more importance
to the 'squire, he was capable of tracing back his
pedigree
to some shirtless scoundrel, of whom nothing
more had been recorded than that he wore a long
claymore
and had a strong arm. A pedigree has always
been considered a very pretty thing, no matter how
many rusty links we find in the chain.
To return to Jurian. His feelings were not the most
enviable on finding himself in the midst of the British
garrison, for in case of detection he should be viewed
in the light of a spy, and on the other hand, should the
knowledge of his adventure reach the American army,
his motives would be equally liable to a false
construction
.
Why are you cast down, Mr. Hartfield?
exclaimed
Jones. Come, cheer up; I am a true pilot, and
will carry you safe to a harbour, I warrant you.
You ask why I am depressed; could I be in this
place at such a time and be otherwise? I am here by
stealthin the scene of my childhood, amidst the
enemies
of my countrywhere the invader is revelling in
luxurywhile the defenders of our rights are exposed
to the inclemency of the elements, without food or
raiment
.
The contrast is ill calculated to please.
Speak lower, replied Jones, for here come a
set of red-coats, who may chance to differ in opinion
from you.
Four or five officers approached, their spirits
elevated
with wine.
Stand and unfold yourself, cried one, belching
with the fumes of his liquor. We cannot be too
vigilant
in these times, and I will have an answer, by my
hilts.
Move on, M`Druid, it grows late, and we have no
time to waste in folly.
Call you this folly, colonel Lindsay? by my hilts
the real business of life appears to be a mighty foolish
thing to a man as deep in love as you are. So again I
say, stand and unfold yourself.
Colonel Lindsay will answer for me, replied
Jones.
That I will, replied the Scot, he is the servant
of Mr. Morton, and an honest fellow, so come along,
major.
An honest fellow, that I will swear to, if he passes
the threshold of old 'squire Morton. The 'squire's an
honest fellow, for he loves to drink until his nose is as
red as my jacket. His wine is honest too,as honest
as ever touched the lip of true believer. Miss Agatha
is honest, the old spinster is honest, for who the devil
would make her otherwise; and, by my hilts, they are
all honest together. But who is this you have with you,
master Jones?
Why he is honest, too, replied Jones. Jurian
wore an overcoat that concealed his military
equipments
.
Then let him pass, and, colonel Lindsay, we are
at your service. But, master Jones, a word in your
ear. As you may chance to see us again before a
century
,
could you not manage to have a bottle of the anno
domini '65, on the sideboard, ready to receive us?
Come along, M`Druid, cried the colonel,
impatiently
.
You now have your skinful of wine, and yet
must be entering into a stipulation for a future
occasion
.
Faith, my darling, you have but a narrow
conception
of the gauge of my stomach, if you think my skin
full already. I am a match for father O`Flanagan a
the bottle.
They passed the jorum about,
And merrily sang the old vicar,
Until his fat gills and his snout,
Became the hue of the liquor.
Sing goostrum doodle sing pip.
Remember, Jones, that '65 is the brand.
I know it well, sir, and rare old stuff it is.
I have had but a slight introduction, replied the
major, and wish to cultivate a better acquaintance
He made the company stare
For Bacchus to him was a fable
And when he fell flat from his chair,
They roll'd him under the table.
Sing goostrum doodle sing pip.
Finish your song some other time, major, and let
us be moving.
Next morn when he went to the chapel,
His face was a fiery ball;
He preach'd about Eve and her apple,
And Adam who made the first fall.
Sing goostrum doodle sing pip.
He learnedly labour'd to show
And fancy became rather frisky
No man would the cholic e'er know,
Had Eve made her fruit into whiskey.
Sing goostrum doodle sing pip.
We have heard enough of your goostrum doodle,
major, so come along.
I will not detain you any longer, gentlemen,
replied
the major. Jones, you will not forget anno
domini '65. Forward
No man would the cholic e'er know,
Had Eve made her fruit into whiskey.
The officers moved down the street, which re-echoed
at intervals with the major's chorus. Jurian followed
his guide until they arrived at a place where their horses
might be secured for the night. They dismounted, and
Jones, desiring his companion to remain where he was
until he should return, led the horses away.
CHAPTER XV.
There's no man
But once in's life may sin beside his nature,
Nay, perhaps, contrary: this is a deed
I must abhor to justify.
Marmyon's Fine Companion
.
Jones
, having secured the horses for the night,
returned
to the spot where he had left Jurian, and desired
him to follow him. They walked some distance in
silence, when Jurian, at a loss to comprehend the
manuvring
of his guide, inquired which way he was
going.
Trust to me, was the laconic reply.
And be led blindfold?
That's unnecessary, sir; for I dare swear you
know every corner of the town as well blindfold as with
your eyes open. Jones affected to smile.
Then explain your movements.
That is also unnecessary.
Then not a step farther will I go.
As you please, sir. Good night.
Villain, have you dared to trifle with me?
Trifle! I am not much given to that sort of
amusement
,
sir, replied Jones, carelessly.
Then why was I brought here?
Follow me, and you shall learn; but ask no
questions
.
Yes, one; and I must be answered.
VOL. I.14
Well, sir, what is it?
Am I to see Miss Morton?
I have said you shall, and I always perform my
promiseswhen convenient. But you must submit to
my guidance.
How can I credit you, when every step we take is
in an opposite direction from the house?
You are right, said Jones, with provoking
indifference
,
but if you are dissatisfied with me, procure
another guide.
This alternative was proposed, because the
countryman
knew that it could not be accepted, and perhaps
for the purpose of awakening the young man to a sense
of Jones's importance on the present occasion. Jurian
hesitated for a moment; he felt that he was in the toils,
but knew not how to extricate himself. Did Jones mean
to play him false? What object could he have in view?
The fact of betraying to the enemy an obscure
individual
,
could benefit the cause but little. His dilemma
assumed different aspects in an instant, but he found it
impracticable to avert even the most unfavourable by
leaving his guide; nay, by taking this step, he would
run the risk of being apprehended as a spy, but by
remaining
,
Jones might possibly redeem his pledge; at
all events, if discovered, the countryman's testimony
would explain the object of his visit. He resolved to
follow Jones, though his views with regard to his
conduct
were by no means distinct.
Move on, said Jurian, I will see what object
you have in view; but if you have dared to deceive
mehe touched his sword significantly.
Oh! certainly, replied Jones, coolly; and had it
not been for the obscurity of the night, the other might
have seen something like a smile of contempt on the
harsh ruddy features of the countryman.
They again moved on in silence, and turning into a
small street, Jones finally stopped in front of a house
lighted up; a soldier with his musket on his shoulder,
was pacing to and fro on the pavement.
Here we will halt for the present, said Jones.
Jurian looked around to see if he could recognise the
place; another soldier, similarly equipped with the
former
,
appeared at the entrance to the house. He was
evidently on guard. Jurian perceived that he had been
betrayed, and drawing his sword, exclaimed
Villain, you shall not triumph in your treachery!
He rushed on the countryman, who seized his
sword-arm
in his iron grasp, and coolly took the weapon from
him, which he again returned, saying
Sheathe your spit, I beseech you, but not in me.
Mark my words, young man; you cannot spare me yet.
Have patience a little longer, and I shall prove myself
your best friend, though you now imagine me your
worst enemy. Then approaching the sentinel in the
entry, he said, in an undertone, Inform his lordship
that Paul Gordon awaits his commands.
This, though intended only for the ear of the
sentinel
,
did not escape Jurian, who involuntarily ejaculated
Paul Gordon! in such a tone as plainly indicated
that he was not prepared for a development of this
nature
.
Yes, rejoined his companion, I am Gordon. It
is now unnecessary to deny myself to you, Mr.
Hartfield
,
and though my public character, like that of all
public men, has been painted in dirty colours, I'll make
bold to say, you'll find me quite the thing as a private
gentleman.
This was spoken in a tone partaking more of irony
than earnest, and approaching the young man, he
familiarly
extended his hand, while Jurian, with his arms
folded, remained stationary, and fixed his penetrating
eyes full upon the countenance of Gordon, who for an
instant felt abashed and awed by the rebuff, but as he
had not been in the habit of paying much respect to any
other than physical distinctions among men, he soon
regained his self-possession, and said
I perceive that your pride has taken the alarm, but
unnecessarily; for when you know me better, you will
find that our ways of thinking dovetail it to a shaving.
Your mind may be compared to the forest-tree, rendered
more beautiful by culture and being transplanted, and
mine to the same tree in all its rudeness and vigour,
fast rooted on its native mountain.
The sentinel now announced to Gordon that his
presence
and that of his companion were required in the
council-room. They entered the house, and were
ushered into a chamber, where several officers were
seated around a table strewn with writing implements.
Gordon made his obeisance, and Jurian acknowledged
their presence by a slight inclination of the head, as he
stood awaiting the result of this mysterious interview.
At length one of the officers addressed Gordon. He
wore a pair of gold epaulettes, was of spare habit, thin
and dark visage, which was rendered more forbidding
by a pair of black eyes that ogled each other.
So, I perceive you have accomplished what you
promised. This is the young officer concerning whom
you spoke to me?
The same, my lord, replied Gordon.
A comely youth, continued the officer, and
doubtless well qualified to perform the duty we shall
impose upon him. The other officers assented to this
remark, and the first continued to address Gordon:
You have acquainted him with the nature of his
employment
?
Not I, my lord, was the reply.
And why not?
I was thinking he would have been loath to come
if he knew all, and so I kept dark, your honour,
knowing
that if a man is to be wheedled into the performance
of a dirty job, fine words must be made use of, and
your honour has more of them at command than I have,
so I did not venture to broach the subject.
And he is ignorant of the object of bringing him
here?
As the sucking babe, replied Gordon, and left the
room shortly afterwards. The officer turned towards
Jurian, and said
There has been a mistake here, sir. I was in
hopes that we fully understood each other, but I find it
otherwise; however, a few words will make us
acquainted
with each others views. Your name is
Jurian Hartfield.
You are attached to the continental army?
So I consider myself.
You but lately joined it?
True; but lately.
Your father is in the service?
That, indeed, I know not.
I was led to believe so. Jurian made no reply.
The officer continuedYou are an American by
birth?
That point I am neither prepared to refute nor
establish.
Then you know not the place of your birth?
True; I know it not.
You then may be looked upon as a citizen of the
world?
Ay; of the world.
Viewing each spot with like indifference?
continued
the officer.
No; that connected with my earliest associations,
the scene of my purest enjoyments, must ever be
distinguished
from the rest of the globe.
Enjoyments! I have been told that you are a
joyless
being.
Indeed! Perhaps your informant did not know me,
replied Jurian, forcing a smile.
Possibly not. Admitting that you were born in
14*
this province, are you not as virtually a subject of Great
Britain as though you were a native of the fast
anchored
isle?
Assuredly, as long as I am treated as a subject.
Then how is it that we find you in the ranks of the
rebels?
Human institutions are established for the
accommodation
of the human family, and as soon as they
become
burdensome they should be cast off. The power
that created has the power to destroy.
Is this then your political creed? An obligation
as soon as it becomes burdensome may be cancelled
by one of the parties without the consent of the other?
Precisely so, where the consideration is all on one
side, which I take to be the case in relation to the
colonies
and Great Britain.
When I desired to see you, I supposed you
entertained
different sentiments on this subject.
Desired to see me! This is to me all very
mysterious
,
how a British officer, as high in rank as you
appear
to be, should ever have heard of so obscure an
individual as myself.
And yet, obscure as you esteem yourself,
continued
the officer, you have it in your power to render
an essential service to your king.
Indeed.
And permit me to remind you that he is a master
who never suffers his servants to go unrewarded. You
may depend upon wealth and distinction.
You speak in parables.
You are acquainted with the condition of the
colonial
forces?
I am.
And have it in your power to become informed
respecting
their plans and resources?
True, to a certain extent.
That information, continued the officer, if
communicated
to me from time to time, would be of
essential
service, and be paid for liberally.
In plain language, you wish me to become a spy.
You use too harsh an epithet, say a loyal subject.
A traitor to his fellow man can never be a loyal
subject. You have mistaken me, sir.
Ha! do you spurn the offer?
Yes; and him who makes it. Elsewhere I might
not so passively have confined myself to mere words.
Right; I admire your spirit, but since you are
among us, you had better accept my proffered
friendship
instead of throwing down the gauntlet of defiance.
You are involved in pecuniary difficulties; some of
your obligations are of a nature that call upon you by
every tie of honour to discharge, and the means are
now within your grasp, but you refuse to avail yourself
of them.
You appear to be familiar with my circumstances,
replied Jurian. True, I am under obligations that I
am bound by the most sacred ties of honour to
discharge
,
but not at the sacrifice of honour itself.
At this moment young Morton entered the room.
He affected astonishment at seeing Jurian, and
approaching
him, extended his hand.
My friend, said he, I rejoice to see you, and it
affords me greater satisfaction to meet you here than
in any other place.
And I am pleased to see you, Morton, returned
Jurian, although we have met under happier auspices
than at present.
But if my presentiments do not mislead me,
replied
Morton, this interview may lead to others, but,
under present circumstances, I question whether that
would add to your happiness.
Perhaps not, but why do you question it?
I believe you still so much my friend as to be
concerned
at beholding my misery, returned Morton.
Never shall I be otherwise.
If so, we should meet as seldom as possible.
I do not comprehend your meaning.
It is well you do not.
Nay, explain yourself.
Do not ask me; it is out of your power to relieve
me, and the knowledge will only distress you.
I must insist on knowing.
Well then, you see me on the verge of ruin, said
Morton, in a tone that only reached the ears of his
friend.
I am petrified. What has led to this fatal result?
The young men moved to a distant part of the room,
and the conversation was carried on in an undertone.
Jurian repeated his question.
Gaming! exclaimed Morton, the worst fiend that
ever hell let loose to tempt man to destruction! In the
royal army there are many who, born in affluence, and
reared in extravagance and dissipation, have brought
all their vices with them across the Atlantic. With
such I daily associate, and, knowing my propensities,
you need not wonder that I was easily induced to
imitate
their example. It would have been a miracle had
I avoided it; the consequence is, I have squandered
large sums, am in debt beyond the power of repayment,
am in hourly dread of being exposed and disgraced,
and fear to apply to my father for assistance, for I have
already taxed his generosity beyond his patience.
Have you determined yet what course to pursue?
No; I am incapable of thinking on the subject.
You see me literally in despair.
Despair! ruin! and disgrace! Morton, you are
my friend. The truest I have ever had. You served
me at a time when but one other would have served me,
and I am still your debtor.
Why mention that now? It wounds me, for it
appears
as if I imparted my distresses by way of reproach.
Think not of it, and dismiss the subject, I beseech
you.
Think not of it! It is impossible for me to think
of any thing else. Answer me, Morton, would the sum
that I am indebted to you relieve you from your
embarrassments
?
You wound me.
I insist on knowing, as a matter of right.
This is idle, for if out of your power to return it, a
knowledge of the fact would answer no other end than
to augment your distress.
Then it would relieve you?
Do not misinterpret my words; I said not so.
But meant it. Be more explicit. If it will be of
service
,
it shall be returned without delay.
You astonish me!
It shall, by heavens!
Then I confess it would silence the immediate
demand
upon me, and afford me time to make
arrangements
to meet my other difficulties.
Enough; you shall be saved at any sacrifice.
What is it you mean?
No matter. My honour is pledged to you, and I
will fulfil my promise, though I forfeit the pledge.
Jurian
now approached the officers, and stood beside the
table in silence for some moments. The eyes of all
were turned upon him. At length he said, in a low
collected voice
My lord, I have reflected on your proposition, and
after the conversation I have had with my friend, I am
disposed to view it in a more favourable light.
I rejoice to hear it, and I assure you, you will never
have cause to repent of your resolution.
That point I alone will be able to answer, replied
Jurian.
To satisfy you, continued the officer, that the
services you are capable of rendering are duly
appreciated
,
here is an earnest of what will follow. Saying
which, he placed a well filled purse in his hand.
Jurian
recoiled at the touch. He never until that moment
experienced so acute a sense of degradation.
Right, he exclaimed, forcing a smile, it is at
times necessary to bribe men even to be honest, and
you could not expect to make a villain at a less price.
Our negotiation being concluded, my lord, I now
humbly
take my leave, assuring you that we shall meet
again, upon the honour of a traitor. He then turned to
Morton, and handing him the purse, said, There, take
it, and relieve me of one half the odium that I have
drawn upon myself.
How is this? What have you done?
No matter what. Saved my friend! Forfeited my
honour to redeem his! The last part of the
exclamation
was uttered in a low tone, that escaped the ears of
Morton. Farewell.
Whither are you going?
To any other spot than this. Elsewhere I may
be more calm. It is hell to the guilty to linger in the
scene of their shame.
Shall I accompany you?
No; I would be alone. I am now only fit to be
alone. He left the apartment, and as he passed
through the door, Balcarras entered. Their eyes met,
and kindled with mutual defiance. The place they
were in, however, prevented an immediate explosion.
We shall meet again, said Balcarras.
Possibly we may, replied the other, but in the
mean time, take my advice and read little sop.
No more folly; we must meet again.
As you please, but I imagined that our last
interview
would have spoiled your appetite for another.
Remember
the raven and the serpent. This was
accompanied
with a smile of derision. Balcarras entered the
room without making a reply, and Jurian passed out into
the street. When he had disappeared, Morton had time
to reflect upon the disgraceful part he had played, and
received with an ill grace the congratulations of the
commanding officer upon the success of the stratagem.
Morton could not disengage his mind from the fact that
Jurian had sacrificed every hope of future happiness to
his friendship; and had yielded up honour itself in order
to fulfil what he was in honour bound to perform. He
knew that he was capable of working up his mind to
the execution of any deed, but he also knew, that such
was the texture of that mind, that it could not exist
under a sense of degradation. Morton seriously
repented
that he had participated in the artifice; true, he
wished to see his friend on the royal side, but not in the
dangerous and disgraceful station which had been
allotted
to him.
Jurian had not proceeded far from the scene of his
defection, before he was accosted by name. He turned
and beheld the colossal figure of Gordon.
I am proud to salute Mr. Hartfield as one of us,
and before we go any farther, let us enter into a
compact
A compact! of what nature?
A very straight-forward one, of mutual advantage.
Keep my secret, and yours is safe also, that's all.
A full sense of Jurian's situation now flashed upon
his mind. Thrown from the proud standing that he had
hitherto maintained, and reduced to companionship with
the unprincipled menial who stood before him. His life
and honour too were in the keeping of such a creature,
and feeling this, the young man lost the energy to repulse
the familiarity of his companion. He merely replied
Your secret's safe.
I do not doubt it, replied Gordon, as it rests
with a gentleman of honour.
Jurian shrunk at the reply, for he could not tell from
the manners of Paul, whether he spoke in irony or
earnest
.
They moved on in silence until they came in
front of a large mansion, where they paused.
After what has passed, said Jurian, the question
I am about to ask may appear idle. You have trifled
with my feelings too faranswer me truly: Do you
know any thing concerning my father?
No more than the man in the moon, sir, replied
Paul.
Fool that I have been, to suffer myself to be thus
easily duped!
Though I have failed in that promise, continued
Gordon, I have performed another, which is doing
pretty well, as the world goes. Never impeach a man's
honesty, who fulfils half of his promises.
What other promise do you refer to?
I said that I would use my exertions to discover
farmer Fairfield, replied Paul, gravely, and I have
succeeded. Jurian made no reply, and Paul
continued
There
was a third promise, sir, which I will also
perform, and then consider our accounts as fairly
balanced
.
The object of your visit to the city was to see
Miss Morton, and if your mind still holds that way, I
will bring you together.
Jurian expressed his desire to obtain an interview,
and Gordon bade him remain where he was until he
reconnoitred to see whether the coast was clear, for
they were in front of 'squire Morton's house. The
lamps were still burning. It may be asked why
Gordon
was so officious in bringing the lovers together.
He knew that the magnitude of his reward would be in
proportion to his success in securing the services of
Jurian, and he also knew that there is more persuasive
eloquence in woman's eyes, than ever flowed from
rhetorician's
tongue. He imagined that one interview with
Miss Morton, while contending with his present
feeling
,
would render his destiny irrevocable, and in that
case Miriam would no longer be remembered.
Gordon entered the house, and proceeded directly
to the parlour, where he discovered Miss Morton alone.
The room bore marks of a recent entertainment.
Several
of the half-burnt candles were extinguished, and a
large table in the middle of the floor was strewed with
glasses, fruit, nuts, and half empty decanters. Paul
was some moments in the room before Agatha
discovered
that any person had entered, nor did she raise
her head until he addressed her
Miss Morton, with your permission, I have
something
of consequence to communicate.
Jones, is that you? well, what is it you have to
say?
During my absence from the city I have seen Mr.
Hartfield.
I trust he is in health.
More so in body than in mind, replied Paul; he
appears to be greatly changed, since he last visited the
village.
And I too am changed! thought Agatha. Well,
Jones, is that all you have to say?
He expressed a wish to see you, and a
determination
to effect an interview at all hazards.
Not here, good heavens! not here, he cannot be
mad enough to attempt it, she exclaimed in alarm.
He insisted, continued Paul, on my getting him
past the sentries, and accompanying him to your place
of residence.
What is it you say?
He is here, and begs permission to see you,
continued
the other, in a cold tone of voice, that fell like a
death-knell upon the ear of Miss Morton. She fell back
in her seat, and exclaimed
Oh! mad man! to run into the toils, from which
there is no escape! and a few moments afterwards,
turning to Paul, who stood eyeing her in silence, added,
I will notI must not see him; you can bear my
determination
to him, and heaven grant that he may
escape
in safety.
I will bear your message, replied Paul, although
it is a cold one to deliver on such a night as this.
Stay then. It would be inhuman to treat him
thus, thought Agatha, when he has hazarded both life
VOL. I.15
and reputation to see me. Tell him, Jones, that
dangers
surround us on all sides; that for his sake, for my
own, we must not meet.
It shall be done, replied the other, but had you
not better tell him so yourself?
Convey the refusal, she continued, as delicately
as possible, for I would not wound his feelings, and
more particularly at such a time as this.
If that be the case, said Paul, permit me to
suggest
that a refusal from your own lips would give less
offence than from the lips of another. And I am the
dullest fellow at these matters, imaginable.
Miss Morton remained silent; doubtful how to act.
If I suffer him to depart without seeing me, she
mentally said, he will mistake my motives, and with
reason consider me destitute of feeling; and on the
other hand, as he is already here, an interview will not
increase his danger, although the doors of my father's
house are closed against him. And then turning to
Paul, she said aloudI will see him, if it is but to
reprove him for the imprudence of his conduct, and
caution him against a repetition of it.
A very charitable determination, thought Paul, as
he withdrew to fulfil his mission.
CHAPTER XVI.
Now for a welcome
Able to draw men's envies upon man:
A kiss now that will hang upon my lip,
As sweet as morning dew upon a rose,
And full as long.
Women beware of Women
.
Gordon
had scarcely passed the door before Agatha
regretted the message she had sent; but it was now too
late to recall it, and she remained in suspense, listening
to every sound, until she heard his footstep reascending
the staircase. Her heart beat violently, and in vain
did she endeavour to regain her self-possessionfor
she felt that by thus furtively meeting a man who was
forbidden her father's house, she was doing an act from
which her sense of propriety should revolt; and though
not criminal in itself, should it become publicly known,
it would be inevitably construed to her injury. Paul
ascended no higher than the first flight of stairs
pointed
out to Jurian the passage to the room in which he
had left Miss Morton, and withdrew. Jurian entered
with a faltering step, and Agatha, trembling with
agitation
,
rose to receive him.
I should bid you welcome, Jurian, I should fly to
meet you, were it in any other place than this.
And I, he replied, would fly to meet you in any
place beneath the canopy of heaven. Agatha, you look
dejected; you do not rejoice at this meeting.
I could not feel otherwise than happy, she replied,
at meeting you after so painful a separation, but I
cannot relieve my mind from apprehension on your
account
;
why have you hazarded your life for a
momentary
interview?
Because death itself would be preferable to the life
of suspense I lead.
This is romance, Jurian.
Call it what you will, he exclaimed, it may be
termed romance by those who can behold every earthly
hope fade around them with indifference; but as I
conceive
that the only object in life is to be happy, when
happiness has fled, I do not consider it a romantic
action
to hazard a miserable existence to regain it.
Nor do I; but no condition should render life of so
little importance to the possessor, as to induce him to
jeopard it upon every idle occasion.
And is this an idle occasion? He paused, and
taking her by the hand, repeated, with increased
earnestness
,
speak, my Agatha, do you consider this an
idle occasion?
I said not so; but surely you should not have
hazarded
so much to meet me.
He gently drew her closer to him, and after a
struggle
to conceal his emotion, exclaimed
You do not love as I love. You are incapable of
entering into the feelings of my heart, or you would not
think any sacrifice too great to effect a meeting. What
I most dreaded has been accomplished. You are no
longer the same being that you were. Our separation
has entirely estranged you from me, and your heart is
now ready to quaff the flattery of another.
The elasticity of spirit, natural to his character, had
disappeared. His recklessness of manner had given
place to unaffected melancholy, and he spoke in a tone
of earnestness that proved his sincerity.
Disappointment
,
and a sense of degradation, had completely
changed his nature. He felt that they no longer met
on equal terms, and that by his own folly he had
rendered
himself unworthy of her.
Speak not of that, Jurian.
Is it not so?But why should I ask you to
confirm
my forebodings!I feel it cannot be otherwise
and perhaps I do not deserve that it should be.
Agatha withdrew herself from his embrace, and
scarcely articulated
Was it to reproach me that you are here? If so,
rail on, but if not, do not embitter the few moments we
are together.
True, my thoughts are bitter enough, God knows,
without poisoning the few moments that might be
rendered
otherwise.
I have never seen you thus, even in your saddest
moments. What means this change?
I am indeed a wretch! Fallen in my own esteem,
and meriting the contempt of the world.
So pale and spiritless! Jurian, what has
happened
?
Ask me not. My tongue would cleave to the roof
of my mouth before it would betray my shame, even to
you, Agatha, who have known my thoughts from
childhood
.
My soul is on the rack, and what adds to my
torments is the fear that you will join in contemning a
wretch who seems to have been ushered into existence
for no other purpose than for the finger of scorn to point
at.
Why doubt me now?
You are surrounded by those whose prejudices
have descended from one generation to another, until
they have become inseparable from their nature. Your
mind is a delicate plant, Agatha, and if that blight
come over it, it will witherthere is no hope for you
in this world. Your heart is mine; at one period
perhaps
I deserved it; then be cautious how you
imbibe
the prejudices of others, for rational as they may
appear, they cannot fail to terminate in sorrow.
You caution me against sorrow, and yet make me
wretched. Whither does this tend?
15*
Answer me, is the stain upon my birth so indelibly
stamped that the ocean of tears I have shed cannot
wash it away? Speak and satisfy me. Though you
appear in the form of an angel, are you still a creature
of this calculating world?
Think not so basely of me, as to imagine me
insensible
to your worth, and incapable of estimating the
many acts of friendship received at your hands.
Still friendship! Beloved of my soul, had you
sighed
for one of the starsexpressed a wish, however
wild and fantastical, I would have stretched to the
utmost
extent of my nature to have accomplished it. My
pulse has throbbed in accordance with your own. My
heart has discarded its own, and adopted the feelings
of your bosom. My sympathies and antipathies were
all imbibed from you; and yet you say this is no more
than friendshipif so, what is love?
A passion, Jurian, that it would have been well had
we never dreamt of, and now, perhaps, it may be
criminal
in us to cherish.
And wherefore criminal? Is a passion as holy as
the sainted entertain for each other, less pure on earth
than it would be in heaven? Whatever my faults may
be, Agatha, want of devotion to you is not among the
number.
Every muscle of his countenance quivered with
emotion
,
as he struggled to suppress the intensity of his
feelings. His bosom heaved, and his respiration
became
thick and difficult.
A pure stream seldom flows from a corrupted
fountain, replied Agatha.
The blight of heaven is on me, he exclaimed,
and it is in vain for me to struggle, since every
created
thing rises up to spurn me. How have I merited
this? What act of mine has called down the wrath of
heaven? Why am I doomed to bear the unceasing
persecution
of mankind? But I submit. He took her
hand within his own, and after a pause, saidMy
dream of madness is over, and I awake to despair.
Farewell, and if you can, forget me.
Your heart is full.
Even to breaking, Agatha. The last blow is given,
and I am now prepared to meet every affliction the
world can impose. My nature is changed; my mind
is crushed to the earth, for it has been lashed with
scorpions
so long that nothing can now excite it.
The ardour of his feelings appeared to have
completely
subsided, and he addressed her in a calm and
melancholy tone.
Jurian, I would not have you part from me thus.
How should we part? Surely not as we last
parted
,
when you promised to be mine.
My promise was never to become another'sbut
not thine.
And wherefore not mine? Your heart is not
estranged
from me.
Startled, but not estranged. Act as you may, it
can never be estranged.
Then why will you not promise to become mine?
You long have loved me, and love me still; then why
not promise?
Becausebecauseher voice faltered, and her
cheeks became more pallid.
Speak on, dear Agatha. Though a cloud now
darkens my destiny, it may yet be removed. Brighter
days will break upon me. Speak on, my love.
Because another has a stronger claim than mine.
What other? What stronger claim can there
possibly
be on earth?
Oh! Jurian, why play a double part with me? I
should be the last in the world towards whom you
would act with duplicity.
A voice was heard from an adjoining room, singing a
plaintive strain. The notes were wild and thrilling,
and yet so low that they seemed to proceed from a
greater distance.
[1]
[1]
Imitated from Schiller.
The greenwood roars, and the clouds fly fast,
The damsel roams in the sea-beach blast,
And thus she sings to the dreary night,
While break at her feet the waves with might,
Her eyes above sadly roving;
My heart is now broken, the world is a void,
All earthly bliss is forever destroyed.
Thou father of heaven, thy child call away;
I have livedI have lovedthen no longer delay,
For life hath treasure but loving.
That voice, so wildly sad! It thrills to my very
soul. Who is it, Agatha?
Miriam Grey.
She here? Good heavens! When did she come?
A few hours ago.
Poor misguided girl!
Fatally misguided, indeed.
Wherefore is she from her home? What does she
here?
She asks for shelter for the night. You best can
answer why she has deserted her mother's roof.
Jurian felt confused. He perceived that she was
acquainted
with what he most earnestly wished to be
concealed
.
But why had Miriam sought shelter there?
Suspicion answered the questionGordon resided
beneath
the same roof, and it was natural that she should
seek him at such a time. He was now convinced of
the faithlessness of Miriam.
How does the poor girl seem?
Broken-hearted, yet struggling against her feelings.
There is no sight so melancholy as to behold a mind
like hers crushed as it has been.
Crushed, even as the flower by the rude
ploughshare
never
to blossom again! and yet it sends up a
grateful incense in return. O Miriam! what a mind
was thine!
And now to behold its ruins! Jurian, you have
much to answer for.
Much! but not that, Agatha, not that.
Shame on thee! Do not add falsehood to crime.
Has she accused me of wronging her?
No; what I have learnt was from broken sentences
that escaped her in her anguish.
Nor will she accuse me, Agatha.
Of that I am aware. Her heart may break, but
pride will tie her tongue. If you have not the honour
to do her justice, she will never urge her claim.
My heart bleeds for her.
Hers has been broken for you. Do an act of
justice
,
and heal them both.
You know not what you urge. It is now too late.
It is never too late to repair a wrong.
The voice of an angel pleading for the fallen!
But the fallen is less guilty than he who is
supplicated
for mercy. Remember the time must come when
you too will require a mediatorthen turn not a deaf
ear to me.
O! Agatha, to hear you pleading for another,
convinces
me that the sacred ties between us are forever
broken.
Those ties can never be broken. They have been
too long cherished now to be destroyed. They may be
weakened, but not destroyed. I may find myself
deceived
in you, Jurian, but change as you may, you will
be to me as a brother still.
The hope that Agatha would at some period return
his affection with equal ardour, was now extinguished.
He believed her regard for him to be still unabated, but
the manner in which she had interceded for Miriam
convinced him that this would avail him nothing. A
sense of his own unworthiness also tended to his
depression
of spirit. He stood silently leaning upon her
chair, loath to depart from the only being whose
presence
could diminish the acuteness of his feelings.
Agatha remained motionless, without venturing to raise
her eyes from the floor upon which they were vacantly
cast, lest they might betray the struggle she had
undergone
in pursuing the course she had adopted. They
were startled from this situation by a burst of a full
band of music, immediately beneath the window. After
an overture, the following verses were sung by a clear
and melodious voice, to a lively Scotch air:
The stars are fix'dthe moon is bright,
Come love, we'll take our wayward flight,
And leave a world so dark as this,
To sail through realms of wildest bliss;
It matters not where we shall light;
It is enough for us to know,
We fly together where we go;
Together cleave the gloomy night.
But if thy sail
Should chance to fail,
While floating through th' ethereal main,
To earthly eyes thoul't seem afar,
A meteor light, a falling star,
That soon is caught in heaven again.
Let sages call it earthly bliss,
And say it suits a world like this.
Well, since that's the case, my dear,
'Tis fitting we enjoy it here,
And let them growl who cannot kiss;
Their joys may be more pure, divine,
But faith not half so sweet as mine,
Or graybeards, sure, would censure less.
If their dull books
Were like thy looks,
I too would scan their pages, love;
But as they are, I'd rather be,
One moment, faith, a fool with thee,
Than wise with them for ages, love.
The song over, the instrumental music continued.
Jurian recognised the voice; he cast a look at Agatha,
their eyes met, but he said nothing. His feelings had
already received so severe a blow that no additional
disappointment could rouse him to complaining.
Another
song was now heard from the serenaders, which
was shouted forth in a manner that would have justified
the rage of the Thracian matrons towards the poet of
the Argonauts. As the poetry was as rude as the
minstrelsey
,
we shall not commit it to our pages. The sound
of Mr. Morton's voice below alarmed the lovers, and a
full sense of Jurian's situation flashed upon the mind of
Agatha.
My father has returned, she exclaimed, and
should you be discovered!
Fear not for me; fate has done its worst.
To remain here is madness. Hark! he is inviting
the serenaders in. He will bring them to this room,
and you must be discovered. Come, this way, this
way. She seized hold of his hand and led him hastily
towards the door. O! heavens! they are already
ascending the stairs. Quick, or we are lost.
They glided rapidly through the dark passage that
led from the room, and ascended another flight of stairs,
unperceived by the revellers, who had not yet ascended
more than half way towards the first landing. The gruff
voice of the major was heard
By my hilts, you may ridicule my vocal powers,
for compared to colonel Lindsay, I am no more than
an owl to a nightingale at these amatory matters, but at
a hunting or drinking song, I would not cry peccavi to
old Orpheus himself.
Having practised at Donnybrook fair, replied
Lindsay, laughing. Who was your poet, major, for
really he deserves as much credit as the singer.
To be sure he does, replied the other, for
myself
was the man. You may scout at my music, but
don't treat my poetry uncivilly, for I will be bold to say
I have seen much worse from the pen of a laureat on
the king's birth-day.
That you may safely assert, although he has a pipe
of malmsey to inspire him.
By the powers! continued M`Druid, in my mind
the reader stands more in need of the wine than the
poet to wash it down. It is a mighty pretty thing to be
a poet to the king, and get your inspiration wholesale
from the vintners, free of expense. I should like the
trade of all others, for if there be inspiration in a
hogshead
,
let me alone for bringing it out.
We shall not dive quite as deep for it to-night,
replied the 'squire, as he arrived at the top of the stairs,
but we shall see whether another bottle of anno
domini
'65 will not make you poetical.
I shall not answer for that, replied the major,
but it will set my eye `in a fine frenzy rolling,' which
is the next thing to being poetical, for while in that
state, by my hilts, I can imagine more things in half an
hour, than will come to pass in half a century.
Excuse us to-night, sir, said Lindsay, it is now
nearly twelve.
And are you to be frightened by twelve o'clock and
a bottle of wine, young morality? said the 'squire.
I despair of ever making a man of him, exclaimed
the major. By the time he has seen as much
service
as I have, he will discard these nursery notions,
and not wait until pleasure has given a second
invitation
.
She is an arrant jilt, colonel, and you should
always take her at the first smile.
Since life is a span,
And a soldier's a man,
Why then let a soldier drink.
There's authority for you, and no man in his senses
would ask for a better, with a bottle of old wine before
him.
They entered the parlour, and again seated
themselves
around the table they had left but a few hours
before. As the wine circulated, the loquacity of the
major increased.
It is said that one good reason is sufficient to
justify
any act, but for drinking I always have three, which
I cannot surmount, or I might possibly become as
temperate
as the colonel.
And what are your reasons, major? demanded
Lindsay.
The first is being thirsty.
But you are not always thirsty, and yet always
ready to drink.
O yes, I am always thirsty when the second reason
appearsgood wine.
So the first reason arises out of the second. Pray
what may the third be?
A boundless love for it. A growing attachment
that increases with years. It is one of the few passions
that age cannot weaken.
Miss Buckley entered, with a countenance unusually
smirking, and expressed her gratification occasioned by
the gallantry of major M`Druid and the other
gentlemen
,
in serenading them. She concluded with a low
curtsey.
By my hilts, this is rich reward for minstrel
labour
,
replied the major. It is an unexpected treat
to be favoured with the smiles of the fair at this late
hour.
The spinster dropped another curtsey, and replied
The troubadours of old, were a gallant people,
major
,
and I am glad to see their spirit reviving in modern
times.
That was an age indeed, madamthe only true
golden age, when a man could live upon music and
love; but in these degenerate times, we require more
substantial aliment; such as roast beef and porter.
Who could be poetical and feed thus grossly!
And yet we are told that the chivalric knight-errant,
Sancho Panza, was fond of the flesh pots, and his mind,
VOL. I.16
you know, was strongly imbued with poetic fervour.
His romantic attachment to his charming Teresa, is a
glowing picture, major.
Every way calculated to make a bachelor deplore
his celibacy, replied M`Druid, bowing.
The law passed by Diogenes king of Sparta to
compel
bachelors either to marry or join the army, must
have had a very salutary effect upon the community,
major? Miss Buckley was never at a loss for
historical
matter in her conversation, and such was the
variety
of her reading, that her hearers were sometimes
puzzled to comprehend her meaning. The major
replied
That, madam, was a sure way to make them all
belligerant.
O, you savage! Socrates himself would not have
expressed so illiberal a sentiment.
The 'squire, during the foregoing, had evinced
repeated
symptoms of his old complaint.
What is the matter, brother?
The gout, Beckyyou understand. I feel as if I
should have a violent attack shortly.
What a distressing complaint it is, major,
continued
the spinster; and must have been very
prevalent
among the ancients, for even Csar's horse was
troubled with tender hoofs, and though some historians
say he had corns on his feet, I am disposed to think
that his complaint was the aristocratic disease.
Very possible, madam, replied M`Druid, for
doubtless he fed high.
Being an emperor's horse, major, it is more than
probable. Horses were astonishing creatures among
the Romans; I should suppose a widely different
animal
from that of the present day, for at times they were
made senators, and took part in the deliberative
councils
.
In modern times we have seen senators made of a
more ignoble animal, replied M`Druid.
What animal, major.
An ass, madam, saving your presence.
This information is entirely new to me. I am
astonished how a fact so remarkable could have
escaped
my notice. I have read that among he Houyhnhnms
the affairs of government were entirely managed by
horses, but it is no where mentioned that the ass was
admitted among them.
A modern innovation, madam; entirely a modern
innovation, replied the major, bowing.
The 'squire could no longer keep his seat. He
moved towards the sideboard, under pretence of getting
another decanter of wine, but in fact to give a
seasonable
hint to his loquacious relative.
Becky, all things in nature require rest; even the
sun himself on one occasion stood still; but, zounds!
there is no stopping a woman's tongue when once set
in motion.
I understand, brother.
Miss Buckley had perceived the 'squire's uneasiness
for some time, and had endeavoured to touch upon no
subject that might tend to increase it; but there is a
facination in error difficult to subdue. There was a
favourite topic that she determined not to broach. This
caution had taken full possession of her mind, and she
was repeatedly compelled to bite her lips, to prevent
that which was uppermost in her thoughts from
escaping
.
The hint of the 'squire had concentrated her
thoughts upon that single idea, and its force became
irresistible. He had scarcely resumed his seat, before
out it bolted, as abruptly as a tippler from an ale-house
without paying his reckoning.
There was a custom, major, among the ancient
Chaldeans
The 'squire interrupted her by desiring her to call
his daughter, that she might thank the serenaders in
person for their gallantry. The spinster rose in
confusion
at having trespassed on forbidden ground,
notwithstanding
her resolution to be guarded. She curtseyed
herself out of the room, to every one of which M`Druid
returned a profound bow, remarking, as she closed the
door, that he had not met with any female on this side
of the Atlantic, who adhered so strictly to the rules of
genuine politeness.
Miss Buckley had not left the room many moments,
before the whole house was alarmed by a violent
scream. The company hastened into the hall, and the
'squire hobbled up the stairs as rapidly as his gout and
potations would admit. He met his sister-in-law
descending
,
and trembling with affright.
What is the matter? demanded the 'squire.
Speak, Becky, what the devil ails you?
There is a robber in my niece's chamber, she
replied
,
and hurried past to escape the imagined danger.
A robber! exclaimed all present.
Yes, a ferocious one. The sight of him has shocked
my nervous system to such a degree, that sal volatile
itself will not restore my pulse to its pristine
equilibrium
.
Curse your equilibrium! muttered the 'squire, and
hurried up.
It is well, major, that the ring of Gyges, spoken of
by Plato, has been lost, or there would be no safety for
us in these degenerate days.
She dropped a curtsey, and bestowed a gracious
smile as she rustled past the major towards the parlour.
M`Druid acknowledged her presence by a respectful
bow, and when she was out of hearing observed
So, a robber in my niece's chamber! Some lusty
Hercules has got into the garden of the Hesperides,
put the dragon to flight, and unless speedily prevented,
bids fair to carry off the golden fruit.
Agatha, in her alarm lest Jurian should be
discovered
,
felt justified in taking any step that might insure his
safety. She dreaded the consequences of his being
apprehended, and should have considered herself
instrumental
in any evil that might befall him. Her first
thought was to conceal him for the present, and when
all had retired to rest, he might escape in safety from
the house. But where could she conceal him from the
prying eyes of the domestics? No place was so sacred
from intrusion as her own chamber, and though rigid
propriety might condemn the measure, yet she felt as if
the life of a brother were in her hands, and it would be a
crime to weigh the consequences in attempting to save
him. When Miss Buckley hurried unexpectedly into the
room, the first object that presented itself was Jurian.
She uttered a shriek, and withdrew more hastily than
she entered.
When Mr. Morton reached the chamber, he
discovered
Jurian apparently insensible to his situation. He
remained seated, unconscious of the presence of a
third person.
Who are you? demanded the old man, and what
is your business here? Jurian raised his eyes at the
sound, and they fell vacantly upon the countenance of
the other.
Ah! is it you, thou puddle of creation? is it you?
Help there! cried the 'squire, and colonel Lindsay and
the major hastened to his assistance. Colonel
Lindsay
,
he continued, seize upon that traitor to his
king.
As he pronounced the name of Lindsay, Jurian
started to his feet. His form became erect, and his
dejected countenance animated. His eyes shone with
an unnatural wildness, and his lips curled with a
demoniac
smile, until his teeth were bare. He remained
silent until Balcarras spoke
Do we so soon meet again?
We have soon met, and the sooner we part the
better for one of us, replied Jurian.
Seize upon the reptile; crush the serpent! shouted
the old man with rage.
Nay, beware of the serpent, Lindsay. Put not thy
16*
heel upon his head. As he spoke, his pale visage
became flushed. Lindsay paused, for he recognised
the changes that countenance had undergone during
their meeting in the arbour. The curled lip and
clenched teeth denoted that the same passions were
awakened, and he was loath again to encounter them.
Stand out of the way, continued Jurian, and let
me pass.
Never from this house, but in custody, exclaimed
the 'squire, and approached to seize him. Jurian put
him aside, and calmly said
Weak old man, that palsied hand ill becomes the
office you would impose on it. Go, and let me pass.
He moved towards the door.
Do not suffer him to escape. Draw your swords
if he dare to resist, cried the 'squire. Lindsay stood
between Jurian and the door.
Stand out of the way, sir. This is no place for
sword-play between us, and I have no more fables to
throw away on one so incorrigible. Stand aside, and
let me pass.
The scornful smile was still on his lips, and he spoke
in a deep collected tone, that awed the soul of the Scot.
Lindsay drew his sword as Jurian approached, his
weapon still by his side.
Stand back. You do not pass this way.
So said the rushes to the swoln stream, and still it
moved on.
Stand back.
Beware of the fate of the rushes. There's another
fable. Let it not be thrown away.
Jurian advanced, and the Scot pointed his sword at
his breast.
One step farther, and your blood be on your own
head.
So be it; and your blood, upon whose head shall
it rest?
That will I answer for, replied Lindsay, astounded
at his coolness.
Then on your head be it.
With the quickness of lightning he sprang upon him,
and in an instant the sword was wrested from the hand
of the Scot. This is no place for a drawn weapon.
He seized Lindsay by both arms, and hurled him as
though he had been a child, to the further extremity of
the room. This was the business of but a moment.
As Lindsay fell, a loud scream was heard to proceed
from a dark corner of the room, accompanied by the
sound of a heavy weight falling upon the floor.
O God! my child! my Agatha! cried the old man,
and hurried towards the spot whence the sound
proceeded
.
The major drew his sword to prevent the
escape of Jurian, but the sound of Agatha's voice had
rendered the caution unnecessary. He evinced no
disposition
to leave the room. Mr. Morton came forward
supporting his daughter, who had swooned, and desired
a window to be opened, that she might breathe more
freely. As his eyes fell upon the form of Jurian, he
cried
Lead the ruffian to a place of security. My heart
recoils at the sight of the poisonous reptile.
Deride and persecute me to the last, old man, for
it is your nature to inflict, but not mine to bear injuries.
Look there! he exclaimed, pointing at Lindsay, who
still lay senseless upon the floor.
Monster, do you threaten me?
You, the father of Agatha!
Miss Morton, who had just revived from her swoon,
heard the tones of his well known voice.
Who calls me, she cried, starting from her father's
arms. Where is he? You have not murdered him!
O God! there he liesdead, dead! She shrieked,
and threw herself upon the body of Balcarras.
Agatha, beloved of my soul!
Take him away, take him away, cried the 'squire
to M`Druid, his presence will only tend to aggravate
her feelings.
He raised his daughter from the floor, and bending
beneath her weight, was hurrying nearer to the open
window, in hopes that the night air would revive her.
Stay one moment longer, said Jurian, who
imagined
he intended bearing her from the room, and that
it was the last time he should ever behold her, stay,
I beseech you!
Wretch, you would not murder her too? said the
agitated father.
My own soul sooner. Proud man, I feel I am as
loathsome to your sight as the venomous toad. You
have spurned me as if I were unworthy of your
presence
.
But I have patiently borne my manifold
injuries
,
and in the bitterest moments I have forgiven you
for that lovely one's sake. Then do not fear that I
shall injure her, since the love I bear her has made
me pardon you.
Lead him away.
One moment, and I have done.
He moved towards the old man, who shrunk at his
approach. Jurian threw his arms around the insensible
form of Agatha, and passionately imprinted a kiss upon
her colourless lips.
Pollution! cried her father, and thrust him from
her.
'Tis done, and I am ready to follow wherever you
please. Sheathe your sword, sir; I shall make no
resistance
against any one but him, said Jurian, pointing
at Balcarras.
I am pleased to hear it, replied the major, putting
up his sword, for I am in no humour, I assure you,
to feel your grip at present.
Lead on.
Ah! he is still here, cried Agatha, reviving,
then they have not murdered him!
That would have been mercy.
Save him, dear father, save him.
My child, you know not what you ask. Lead him
away.
Whither would you lead him? Of what crime is
he guilty? Speak, father, speak.
Plead not for a ruffian. Look there, my child.
Balcarras had risen from the floor, his face disfigured
with blood.
Father, even the worm will recoil when trodden
on.
No more, no more. Take him from my sight.
Farewell, my Agatha. Heaven protect you!
O! Jurian, we shall meet no more!and to part
thus, surrounded by your enemies! No one to
mitigate
your anguishno one to feel for you!
Not one, say you, Agatha?
O, yes! there is oneand she
Is on my bosom. Agatha tottered towards him,
and fell upon his neck. Jurian pressed her in his arms.
Have I lived to see this! exclaimed her father.
There, old man, I restore your child to you again.
I have received from her a tear of sympathyit is all
I ask, and God grant it may be the only tear she will
be called upon to shed in this world. Bless you, my
Agatha! farewell!
He placed her in the arms of her father, and turned
to leave the room, accompanied by M`Druid. In the
door he beheld Miriam standing, pale and sorrowful.
She had witnessed his parting from Agatha. As he
passed her, she followed him down the stairs in
silence
.
When they had reached the lower hall, he said,
in a low voice
You here to reproach me too! The time is well
chosen.
No reproaches have yet passed my lips.
But your looks! they speak more than words
could utter.
I would smile, Jurian, if it were possible. But it
is hard to smile when the heart is aching.
Don't smile, for God's sake, don't smile!
Yet there was a time when you were pleased to
see me smile.
True, there was a time! But that melancholy
smile now indicates deeper rooted despair, than the
most boisterous complaints. Don't smile, don't smile!
I will not, if it gives you pain.
How calm your features are. Somewhat paler
than formerly, and slightly changed, but as calm as
ever. How is this?
Would you not have them calm?
No; give full vent to your soul in reproaches, and
I can bear them all. But that look so calm, harrows
my very soul. Reproach me, and I will bless you,
Miriam, in return.
And wherefore should I reproach?
Better that I bear your reproaches than my own.
May you never experience either. You are in
distress
,
Jurian!
Fallen and disgraced; deserted and despised
even by myself despised.
But not quite deserted. Is there ought that I can
do to serve you?
Peace, Miriam, peace.
If there is command me, and it shall be done.
Silence, I beseech you.
If any thing on earth could make my heart joyful
again, it would be in serving you.
You torture me! Thou poor deluded and deserted
one. Thou hast found the way to my heart, and thy
words are venomed!
Jurian!
No more, no more. Lead on to the prison, for if
I listen longer I shall become as a child. Lead on to
the prison: that I can bear, but not this.
I will follow you.
Tears started into the eyes of Jurian, as he replied
No, remain where you are: you have endured too
much on my account already. Remain where you are,
Miriam.
They separated, and the major conducted him to
a place of confinement. Jurian observed a profound
silence, notwithstanding the multitude of questions
propounded by the loquacious M`Druid, who was
unusually
talkative, for wine was in and wit was out.
Miriam, after the departure of Jurian, repaired to the
chamber of Agatha, whither she had been removed, in
a state of extreme agitation, at the result of the night's
adventure.
CHAPTER XVII.
He has filched a page from history, and calls it romance.
To-morrow let us do or die.
Campbell
.
The
American army, while encamped at Skippach
creek, received a reinforcement by the junction of the
troops from Peeks-kill, and the Maryland militia. The
information obtained from Corwin, that a considerable
force had been detached from the British army,
determined
the commander-in-chief to fall upon them
unexpectedly
,
not doubting that if he succeeded in breaking
their line of encampment, as they were not only distant
but totally separated from the fleet, his victory must be
decisive.
The British line of encampment crossed Germantown
at right angles about the centre, the left wing extending
on the west, from the town to the Schuylkill. That
wing was covered in front by the mounted and
dismounted
German chasseurs, who were stationed a little
above, towards the American camp. A battalion of
light infantry and the queen's American Rangers were
in the front of the right. The centre being placed
within the town, was guarded by the fortieth regiment,
and another battalion of light infantry stationed about
three quarters of a mile above the head of the village.
General Washington so disposed his troops, that the
divisions of Sullivan and Wayne, flanked by Conway's
brigade, were to march down the main road, and enter
the town by the way of Chesnut-hill; while general
Armstrong, with the Pennsylvania militia, was ordered
to march down the Ridge road upon the banks of the
Schuylkill, attack the enemy's left and rear, and
endeavour
to turn them should they retire from the river.
The divisions of Greene and Stephens, flanked by
MacDougall's
brigade, were to take a circuit towards the
east by the Limekiln road, and entering the village at
the market-house, attack the left flank of the right
wing: and the militia of Maryland and Jersey, under
generals Smallwood and Freeman, were to march by
the Old York road, and fall upon the rear of the right.
Lord Sterling, with the brigades of generals Nash and
Maxwell, formed a corps of reserve.
These dispositions being made, Washington quitted
the camp at Skippach creek, and moved towards the
enemy on the third of October, about seven o'clock in
the evening. The night was uncommonly dark. The
march was rapid and silent; not a drum was sounded,
and the enlivening tones of the fife were hushed.
Parties
of cavalry silently scoured all the roads to seize
any individuals who might give notice to the British of
the approaching danger. The heavy and regular tramp
of the army, and the words of command passing from
one officer to another, were the only sounds that
interrupted
the dead quiet of the night. Washington in
person
accompanied the column of Sullivan and Wayne.
As the army approached Chesnut-hill, Washington
expected that the enemy would be prepared to receive
them at that spot, but on emerging from the wood, and
beholding the open country unoccupied, he flattered
himself that they would be completely surprised in their
camp. The picket-guards were driven in, and as the
Americans advanced rapidly down the main road, the
hurried beat of distant drums to arms, the shrill fife, and
the braying of trumpets resounded from all quarters in
front of the advancing army. It was now near sunrise,
VOL. I.17
but owing to a dense fog, it was impossible for the
soldiers
to see more than twenty yards before them. As
they ascended the hill near Mount Airy, their progress
was impeded by the fortieth regiment and the battalion
of light infantry posted in that quarter. A brisk fire
commenced
on both sides, the Americans advanced steadily
beneath it, and the British soon began to waver. A
youthful officer, by the uncertain light, was seen riding
from one extremity of the lines to the other,
encouraging
his soldiers to maintain the pass. The Americans
pressed forward, the enemy's ranks were brokenthey
fled, and were pursued into the village. A loud huzzah
from those in the advance proclaimed the tidings.
The pursuit was rapid, but had not continued long
before the division was commanded to halt. This
interruption
was occasioned by colonel Musgrave, who,
with six companies of the fortieth regiment, had taken
shelter in a house lying full in front of the Americans,
from which they poured a destructive fire upon their
pursuers. The Americans attempted to storm this
unexpected
covert of the enemy, but those within
continued
to defend themselves with resolution. A brief
council between the commander-in-chief and generals
Knox and Reed was held.
Push on, push on, exclaimed Reed, warmed with
the advantage gained, and impatient of delay. Let
Musgrave escape until a nobler work shall be
completed
.
It is contrary to all military rule, observed
general
Knox, to leave a fort possessed by an enemy in
their rear.
What! call this a fort, and lose the happy
moment
!
exclaimed general Reed. Where is general
Conway, let us hear his judgment. Conway was not
to be found.
It is madness to waste our time and ammunition
here, continued the impatient Reed; send a flag to
the house and summon them to surrender. This
proposition was agreed to, and a young soldier
advanced
and volunteered to undertake the perilous
expedition
.
A gallant youth, on my life, exclaimed Knox, I
hope yet to see the day when you shall wear a brace of
epaulettes.
And if so, returned the youth, I hope I may
carry them as nobly as my general. A flag was
presented
to the young soldier, and, as the firing abated on
the part of the Americans, he dashed his spurs into the
flanks of his impatient steed, and in a moment was lost
in the impenetrable mist that enveloped the contending
parties. A pause ensued as he approached the house,
waving the striped flag over his devoted head; the
pause was but momentary, and was succeeded by a
platoon of musketry. An instant after the horse was
seen running wild about the field of battle; his curved
neck covered with blood, which left no doubt as to the
fate of his rider.
They have killed the gallant boy, cried Knox;
bring up the artillery to the assault.
The iron lips of the cannon soon proclaimed the
determination
of the assailants, while the brisk fire of the
besieged proved that they would not surrender until the
last extremity. In consequence of this attack at least
one half of Washington's division remained for some
time inactive, during which a great part of the left wing
of the British advanced with a regular and determined
step. A close and warm engagement ensued; at length
the firm phalanx of the British began to melt beneath
the intense fire of the Americans; a joyful huzza!
denoted the advantage; and captain Swain, who was
in the advance, cried out, forward, brave hearts, the
town is ours! Forward! forward! re-echoed
along the line. They advanced but a few paces, and
the next moment a long extended sheet of fire blazed
through the almost impenetrable mist before them, like
lightning through the murky clouds. Many fell, and
the Americans hesitated to advance over the bodies of
their prostrate comrades, when a deep and hollow
voice exclaimed
Quail not, it is for freedom ye fight; for your
homes, your wives and children. Quail not at an hour
like this.
As captain Swain turned towards the spot whence
the sound proceeded, he beheld the wild and haggard
figure of Corwin. His blanket was secured over his
shoulders by a leather thong; his arms were extended
as if in the act of encouraging the soldiers to advance;
his features were animated to frenzy; and his long and
matted hair was streaming in the wind.
The eyes of captain Swain rested but for a moment
upon this singular figure, and then were attracted by a
more melancholy and affecting spectacle. At the feet
of Corwin lay the body of a bleeding soldier, who
turned
his feeble sight towards his commander and
stretched
out his hands in token of recognition. It was Mauns
Talman.
Heaven receive you, my brave fellow! sighed
the worthy old man, and turned from the afflicting
sight. His company had reloaded their arms. They
advanced, and the next moment the smoke of their
musketry added to the darkness that prevailed.
Corwin
still kept his position by the bleeding soldier, who
crawled closer, and clasping his legs, endeavoured to
raise himself from the earth, that he might not be
trampled
to death by the feet of his countrymen, who were
eagerly pressing forward to partake of the dangers of
the battle. The maniac stood firm and motionless,
with head erect, and his wild eyes turned towards the
enemy, as if the mist, that obscured the sight of others,
had no effect upon his penetrating vision. Mauns had
succeeded in raising himself upon his knees, but fell to
the earth again, through the loss of blood.
For God's sake, save me from a death so horrible!
he cried, as he sunk exhausted at the feet of Corwin.
Save you; ay, and avenge you too! cried the
maniac. Blood for blood is heavenly retribution.
Saying which he picked up the gun of the soldier; the
smoke had in some measure dispersed from the spot
towards which his eyes were directed; the white
plumes of an officer were indistinctly seen; the fatal
tube was presented, and discharged. Corwin threw
down the gun and continued looking in the same
direction
for a few moments. The white plumes were no
longer seen; he burst into a wild laugh, and shouted,
Freedom! freedom! universal and unshackled
freedom
!
He then lifted the wounded man from the
ground, and hurried from the scene of carnage,
supporting
him in his arms. He had not advanced far
before
his ears were greeted with the exclamations,
Agnew has fallen! Agnew is dead!
During this bloody conflict with the centre, general
Greene came up with his column; and as a number of
his troops were stopped by the division that had halted
in front of Chew's house, he moved a few hundred yards
north of the village, and commenced a furious attack
upon the right wing of the enemy. Great numbers of
the villagers by this time had ascended to the roofs of
their houses, and were spectators of the fearful conflict.
Colonel Matthews, of Greene's column, assailed the
enemy with such spirit, that their ranks were soon
broken, and they retreated in confusion towards the
centre of the village. Matthews pursued so closely
upon the rear of the light infantry and the queen's
Rangers, that numbers fell beneath his destructive fire,
and upwards of a hundred surrendered themselves
prisoners
to their gallant conqueror. They were about
entering the village, with victory perched beside the
eagle on their banners, when they perceived they had
lost sight of the rest of the division, owing to the dense
fog, and the unevenness of the ground they had marched
over. While in this perplexity, the extremity of the
right wing of the British, seeing that there was nothing
17*
to apprehend from the tardy approach of the militia of
Maryland and Jersey, fell back, and completely
hemmed
in the victorious Americans.
Colonel Matthews no sooner perceived his danger
than he gave over the pursuit, and prepared to fight his
way to the main body of the Americans. The prisoners
he had taken were rescued, and a bloody conflict
followed
,
which, however, was of short duration. In the
heat of the conflict, Corwin, mounted on a milk-white
steed, richly caparisoned, dashed in between the
contending
parties, waving a drawn sword above his head,
and shouting, Freedom! freedom! universal and
unshackled
freedom!
The impatience of the steed was evidently beyond
the control of the rider, for he rushed indiscriminately
among friends and enemies, while the maniac kept his
seat as if wholly unconscious of the dangers that
surrounded
him. The figure was peculiarly striking. The
war-horse, as much excited and bewildered by the din
of battle as his rider, stood for a moment pawing the
red earth, until the clangour of martial instruments and
the scent of blood rendered him unmanageable. He
tossed his head from the fresh earth he had turned up
with his foot, and snorted aloud. A soldier was dying
within a few paces, and the hoofs of the horse were
stained with his life's blood. The generous animal then
darted headlong towards the advancing phalanx of the
enemy, while Corwin continued to shout, Freedom!
freedom! universal and unshackled freedom!
His cry was lost in the report of a platoon of
musketry
as he approached. The horse threw back his
head at the report, paused for a moment, and then
rushed at full speed in the opposite direction. He had
not proceeded more than fifty yards before he stopped
suddenly, reared up, and fell backwards upon the earth.
The blood was streaming from his breasthe raised
his head, threw out one of his fore-legs, and as the din
of the battle increased, the other followed. He made
a powerful exertion to regain his feet, but after several
attempts, fell exhausted to the ground. He pawed in
desperation, which but increased the discharge of blood
from his wound; and, finally, summoning all the strength
of expiring nature, he started on his feet, and pricked
his ears at the braying of the trumpet. The flash was
but momentary; his head gradually descended; he
gasped
for breath; his knees bent beneath his weight, and
he again fell upon the bloody sward from which he
had just risen. After a faint struggle his limbs were
motionless.
Corwin had fortunately disengaged himself from the
animal before he fell: he watched him until dead, and
then directed his steps towards colonel Matthews's
regiment
.
The British were now advancing with fixed
bayonets. Two of the queen's Rangers chanced to
espy Corwin, slowly crossing the space that lay
between
the contending parties. They clapped spurs to
their horses, and in the next moment were beside the
unhappy man.
Surrender! shouted one of his pursuers.
To death, sooner, replied Corwin, at the same
time attempting to fight his way from between the
horsemen.
Then be it as you wish, was the reply. Their swords
flashed before the eyes of the maniac, and glittered in
the feeble rays of the morning sun, faintly struggling
through the murky atmosphere. They stood erect in
their stirrupsCorwin raised his head and threw up
his armsthe swords felland the next moment
Corwin
was writhing at the feet of the horses. As he fell,
the Rangers darted off in a direction where their
services
were more required.
Colonel Matthews perceiving the impossibility of
fighting his way through the enemy, and that no
assistance
was to be expected from the militia under
generals Smallwood and Freeman, reluctantly
surrendered
his whole regiment, after having
performed
an action which has deservedly obtained him a
lasting reputation for dauntless courage, and science in
the art of war. In consequence of this check, two
regiments of the English right wing were enabled to
throw themselves into Germantown, and to attack the
Americans who had entered it in flank. Unable to
sustain the shock, they retired precipitately, leaving a
number killed and wounded. Colonel Musgrave was
then relieved from all peril, and general Grey being
absolute master of the town, hastened to the succour
of the right wing, which was engaged with the left of
the column of Greene. The Americans then retreated,
and abandoned a victory, throughout the line, of which
they had felt assurance in the commencement of the
action.
General Greene, with his own and Stephens's
division
,
formed the last column of the retreating
Americans
.
They marched in a north-westernly direction
from the village, and as the pursuit was warm, upon
coming to the junction of two roads, general Greene
marched one division on the one road, and the second
on the other, that they might aid each other, and
prevent
the enemy advancing by either road so as to get
ahead of him.
While continuing his retreat, Pulaski's cavalry, who
were in his rear, being fired upon by the enemy, rode
over the second division, and threw them into the
utmost
disorder, as they knew not at first but that they
were the British dragoons. The men scattered in
dismay
,
and the general was apprehensive that he should
lose his artillery, as he found it difficult to rally
sufficient
to form a rear-guard. In the midst of the
confusion, he ordered his men to lay hold of each
others' hands, and by this means form a chain that
would stop the fugitives until they could be rallied. A
number were collected: the lines were speedily formed
again, and by the help of the artillery, the enemy was
obliged to give over the pursuit, after having continued
it nearly five miles.
Lord Cornwallis arrived with a squadron of light
horse from Philadelphia, just in season to join in the
pursuit. His Lordship, apprehensive that he might be
too late, ran at full speed the whole distance.
Thus terminated the battle of Germantown, which
continued two hours and forty minutes. The
Americans
retreated the same day about twenty miles, to
Perkiomen creek, and the British remained in
possession
of the field of battle.
History tells us, that the principal causes of the
failure of this well-concerted enterprise, were the
extreme
haziness of the weatherwhich was so thick,
that the Americans could neither discover the situation
nor movements of the British army, nor yet those of
their own; the inequality of the ground, which
incessantly
broke the ranks of their battalionsan
inconvenience
more serious and difficult to be repaired for new
and inexperienced troops, as were most of the
Americans
,
than for the English veterans; and finally, the
unexpected resistance of colonel Musgrave, who found
means, in a critical moment, to transform a mere house
into an impregnable fortress.
CHAPTER XVIII.
How weak a thing is woman when she loves!
How fierce a thing is woman when she hates!
Fredolfo
.
The
distant roll of the drums of the retreating
Americans
,
was now indistinctly borne along on the
sluggish
breeze of the morning; and the feeble rays of the
sun had not yet dispersed the murky vapours that arose
from the humid earth, and hung like a veil of mourning
over the bloody scene, as if to conceal from the broad
eye of day the carnage and desolation. The British
had not yet returned from the pursuit; and those who
remained in the encampment, had not sufficiently
recovered
from their consternation to perform the
melancholy
duties necessarily attendant upon collisions of
this nature.
The dead and the dyingfriend and enemywere
still indiscriminately strewed over the field of battle;
no one yet appeared to relieve the agonies of the
wounded; no one to mourn over and close the glazed
eyes of the departed; where they lay stiff in their gory
garments, with their deadly weapons beside them.
Here lay the war-horse in his gaudy trappings, and
the bruised earth to prove the struggle and agony of
the noble animal when dying: there the poor subaltern
destined to be cast into his place of mouldering unwept,
unhonoured, and unknown; and a little further, the
aspirant
of fame, who could boast as his winding-sheet,
the striped emblem of his country's freedomwho
preferred blotting out the stripes with his life's blood,
to basely surrendering it as a trophy to the hands of the
victor.
By the uncertain light, a few solitary beings were to
be seen wandering over the field of death, whose
presence
,
by calling us back to life, only served to increase
the horrors of the surrounding scene. A few of the
most daring villagers had ventured forth to behold the
work of destruction. Here was seen the wounded
soldier
,
who having risen from the bed of death, was
slowly tottering towards his more fortunate
companions
,
with both hands pressed upon his bleeding
wound, and pallid and gasping from the loss of blood:
there was seen the sacrilegious follower of the camp,
rifling the dead of those earthly vanities, which may be
considered as treasures in this world, but in the next
as chaff before the windas dross in the crucible.
Among those wandering about, was a tall female
figure, clad in a gray cloak, the hood of which was
thrown over her head, and concealed her features from
the eyes of the few she chanced to meet on her
melancholy
errand.
She bent her head repeatedly, the better to examine
the faces of the slain; and was occasionally seen
turning
the lifeless bodies in order to accomplish her
purpose
.
She finally approached a large tree, by the trunk
of which lay the body of a soldier, apparently lifeless;
his right arm thrown across his face, concealed his
features
from the scrutinizing eye of the spectator. She
gazed upon him for a moment, and then removed the
arm that obstructed her vision: she started back with
horror, and the arm fell lifeless upon the ground by the
side of the soldier. The aged woman stood erect,
with her bony and withered hands clenched,
contemplating
in horror the pallid countenance before her. At
length she cried
And is it thus I find thee! then the prayer of my
widowed heart, and not its curse be on theethe prayer
of the heart thy villany has broken.
She seated herself upon the ground, and raised the
head of the soldier to her lap, and parted with her
fingers
the hair that hung over his manly forehead.
Wretch, thou hast broken the last fibre of my heart,
she continued, and I came to curse thee in the
bitterness
of despairyea, to destroy that life which has
destroyed
the last hope of mine; but the hand of another
has saved me from that guilt, and changed my curse to
prayer. I pray for the guilty, for thou art gone where
the widow's curse would weigh heavy, and the prayer
of the most sinful will be heard. No, no; I will not
curse thee now, and render thee as hopeless as thou
hast rendered me.
She bent over him for some minutes, rocking her
slender form; her face, which still retained the marks
of former beauty, being turned towards heaven, and her
mind wholly occupied with her meditations.
She had not remained long in this position, when a
convulsive motion of the body proved that life was not
extinct. She shrunk back, and gazed wildly upon his
countenance. The eyes of the soldier opened.
Ha! ha! ha! he lives! he lives! shrieked the old
woman, hysterically, thank God, he lives! and at the
same time rising, suffered the head of the wounded man
to fall upon the earth. He soon recovered sufficiently
to be sensible of his situation, having swooned from
the loss of blood. The aged female stood erect beside
him, with her slender and skinny arms raised, and
extended
over the body, as if in the act of imprecation.
She continued muttering to herself
May his heart be smitten and withered like grass,
so that he forget to eat his bread; and by reason of the
voice of his groaning, may his bones cleave to his skin!
Her wild eyes glistened with frenzy, and as the
bleeding
soldier gradually recovered his senses, he beheld
in the right hand of the female a coarse handkerchief,
at one end of which was firmly secured a large grape
shot: she darted a look of horror and indignation upon
the prostrate soldier, and in her delirium assumed an
attitude as if about to extinguish the faint spark of
returning
animation. The soldier vainly attempted to
move: he raised his arm in order to ward off the
impending blow, and faintly exclaimed
For God's sake, mother Alice, you will not murder
me!
Expect not mercy from the tigress when thou hast
robbed her of her young.
Hear mein mercy hear me!
Yes, in another world, but not in this; I came to
curse you; I sought you to destroy.
She raised her withered arm; threw the cowl from
her head, and exhibited a countenance distorted and
wild with passion. She planted her foot upon the breast
of the prostrate soldier, who, too much exhausted to
defend himself, raised his hands, reeking with his life's
blood, to implore her mercybut her ears were deaf
to the call, and she was on the point of striking, when
a loud voice, near at hand, exclaimed
Alice Grey, is thy heart still so obdurate, that he
who turned the hard rock into a standing water, and
the flint stone into a springing well, cannot soften it?
Merciful heavens, who art thou! cried Alice, and
suffered her uplifted weapon to fall harmless to the
ground.
A wretch, who for thee has eaten ashes like bread,
and mingled his drink with weeping.
She raised her eyes, and beheld the haggard form
of Corwin leaning against the trunk of the tree; his
face was begrimed, and his straight black hair was
clotted with blood, which proceeded from a gash across
his forehead.
Speak! art thou of this world, or of the world to
come; hast thou arisen from the grave to curse me,
cried the woman in agitation, and averted her eyes
VOL. I.18
from the bloody spectacle. Corwin still remained calm
and immovable.
My curse availeth not, he replied, and prayers
alone should ascend from the lips of the impure; and
with the man of Uz, I may say, `I have sewed
sackcloth
upon my skin, and defiled my horn in the dust;
my face is foul with weeping, and on my eyelids is the
shadow of death.' Then what availeth the curse of a
worm so bruised and writhing?
Then turn from me, said Alice, and leave me
to my fate. I thought I should have been spared the
shame and agony of again meeting you in this world, but
now there is no bitterer curse can visit me here. Leave
me, leave me! She concealed her face in her cloak,
her frame shook convulsively, and she sobbed aloud.
Why talk of cursing? continued Corwin, we,
who are about to go where the small and the great are,
and the servant is free from his master. I curse thee,
Alice!never! thy burthen, I fear, is too heavy
already
.
But may he who led his people like a flock
by the hand of Moses and Aaron, watch over thee.
The maniac stretched his arms towards her, as in the
act of bestowing a benediction. She sunk upon the
earth, and drawing the hood of her cloak over her head,
murmured
Merciful Father! low, grovelling in the dust, behold
a penitent and guilty wretch supplicating for mercy!
Her utterance became inaudible, and was finally choked
by her tears.
Ay, pray, pray to him, and I will join my guilty
voice with thine; for he maketh sore and bindeth up;
he woundeth and his hands make whole.
She crawled to the spot where Corwin, stood and
threw her arms around his knees; after a violent
struggle
of feeling she raised her face, and the big tears
rolled down the furrows in her cheeks. He bent his
haggard eye upon her, and a tear from his heart
mingled
with those of the supplicant;as it fell, the
wretched woman exclaimed
You weep! Pardon, thou injured being, the guilty
and miserable wretch that crushed thee. Corwin
raised his hand, and pointing towards heaven, cried
There, there seek for pardon, and not from a
sinful
mortal like thyself.
There!
ere thy hope be cut off,
and thy trust be a spider's web.
He raised his eyes above, and continued for some
time lost in meditation; during which Alice lay at his
feet, clasping his knees, and her eyes fixed upon his
countenance, as if striving to trace the effect of years:
at length she sobbed to herself
Oh God! how great a change! The sound fell
upon his ears, and he again turned his eyes towards her.
True, Alice, I am altered indeed, he replied, for
the earth has brought forth thorns and thistles to me,
and I have eaten of the herb of the field. My brethren
have dealt deceitfully as a brook, and as the stream of
brooks they have past away.
Gordon arose, for it was he who had called forth the
indignation of Alice. He was bleeding and exhausted,
and stood in silence leaning against the tree.
They were interrupted by the approach of a small
party of soldiers, who moved along in mournful silence,
bearing the lifeless body of an officer. The fatal ball
had entered his breast, and his garments were
besmeared
with blood. It was the gallant Agnew, who
but an hour before had dreamt of a long life of glory:
death closed the dream. The soldiers moved on towards
the centre of the encampment, and another party
appeared
a few moments afterwards. On perceiving
Corwin
,
they apprehended him, and conducted him to the
spot where other Americans were secured. Alice
followed, and Gordon was supported from the field.
A few words may be necessary to explain the conduct
of Alice towards Gordon. Her daughter Miriam had
disappeared a short time previous, and there was no
clue left to trace the direction she had taken. A few
days passed in fruitless search, and the wretched mother
became nearly frantic with anxiety. She knew of the
attachment of Gordon to Miriam, and it was whispered
that he had betrayed her. She concluded that she had
absconded in order to conceal her shame. The thought
appeared reasonable, and was almost insupportable.
The mother left her home with the determination not to
return until she had ascertained the fate of her child,
the only source of earthly consolation. Her first object
was to find Gordon, from whom she expected
information
,
and on discovering him, her feelings were beyond
control.
A few days after the battle, the royal army removed
from Germantown to Philadelphia, but the possession
of the city was not attended with those advantages
which were expected from it, nor were the inhabitants
of the country in the least intimidated by the event.
Washington, posted on the heights of the Schuylkill,
maintained a menacing attitude; he employed his
cavalry
and light troops in scouring the country between the
banks of that river and those of the Delaware. He
thus repressed the excursions of the British, prevented
them from foraging with safety, and deterred the
disaffected
and avaricious among the people from
conveying
provisions to the camp. Moreover, Congress
passed a resolution subjecting to martial law and to
death, all those who should furnish the royal troops with
provisions, or any aid whatsoever.
END OF VOLUME I.Chad's Ford
,
September
11.
Dear Jurian
You may judge of the extent of my perplexities when
I apply to you for pecuniary assistance. Were you in
funds you would be the first I should apply to, but in
your present circumstances you should be the last.
But, as I do not know what fortune may have done for
you since our last interview, I have ventured to make
known my distresses to you. I have an insuperable
objection to my father's becoming acquainted with the
cause of my present embarrassment, and have
therefore
employed every means to extricate myself before
a knowledge of the circumstance shall reach him. To
change the subject, I feel that I should fight the battles
of my king with better heart, if my earliest and best
friend were still by my side. Reflect again upon the
nature of the contest; reflect, I beseech you, until you
view it in the light that it is viewed by
Your friend,
Edward Morton
.Meet me at the sign of the Crooked Billet, on the
evening of the first of October, as I have something to
communicate that concerns you nearly. Fail not to be
punctual.
An Unknown Friend
.